This is untested territory legally - I can't wait to see what happens to the first entity who exploits someone's uploaded work in a way the creator doesn't like and/or makes loads of money from it and doesn't pay the creator anything. To give them the benefit of the doubt, I think most "sharing" site included scary-sounding ToS to protect themselves from some uploader being a jerk: "Hey, there's an ad on the same page as my stuff, I never agreed to that, I'm suing you!" Arguably, these sites have "paid" their contributors by doing unpaid promotion work and providing hosting.  Anyone have any idea how much it would cost an individual to host and promote a video such that it reaches millions of people?  I think one of these sites will cross a line - e.g. put out a CD/DVD that makes millions and pay nothing to the contributors.  Then we'll see what happens as lawyers see an opportunity to chase big bucks through the courts.
Not anymore.  Not sure when they started, but now they routinely marry Amish from other areas of the US to prevent this. I used to see much evidence of inbreeding, retardation, club feet, etc, when I would visit Amish communities 30 years ago, but I haven't seen anything like that for years.
&gt; If you're wishing for other good circa-1980s technology, the  &gt; development tools in Squeak blow away Eclipse, Emacs (sad to &gt; say) et al. That's probably why there's so much *awesome* software written in Smalltalk. 
I'm getting a bit sick and tired of idiots modding based on whether or not they like the conclusions. We should open "wankery.reddit.com", where people can go and submit articles they agree with and then nod vigorously at each other.
He was probably to stubborn to turn back... that would be a bit embarassing...
It's not clearly apocryphal at all.  Is it that much of a stretch that this guy has a wife who, while not necissarily a techie, can ask valid questions about a technical subject, that he and his wife can hold basic conversations?  My girlfriend and I often do this sort of thing and she's an linguistic anthropologist; certainly not a computer geek.
There's something incredibly perverse about replacing a loved one with a foam cut-out...that can't be healthy...
It has a hand crank.  Chuck Norris is the only person capable of starting it.
Shouldn't that be "There's no kind of people"? It sounds to me like a restatement of Russel's Paradox. I just came up with: "There's one kind of people in the world: those who are referenced by this very sentence, and those who aren't."
Personally, I wish that the population of every country, not just America, was exposed to critical and potent journalism all the time.  It doesn't have to be right. It just has to show that thinking is allowed, dissent is encouraged, and free speech means something.
It's not hate.  It's practicing what you preach.  Talk is cheap, especially in religion.
maybe you should have asked that question when they made child porn illegal.
Hiding one's shadow during a picture is very important when it comes to photography .. however in this case .. the beauty is in the shadow .. the photographer's shadow tells what stance he stood as he took the picture .. the photographer's shadow is a unique style (unintended though)
The Girl In The Café took home three accolades at 58th Annual Prime Time Emmy Awards including the prestigious Outstanding Made For Television Movie award.
Powers of 10 is a film dealing with the relative size of things in the Universe, and the effect of adding another zero. The film was made for IBM by the offices of Charles and Ray Eames
Combine the story from earlier today of the polygamists in Utah and the 11 yr old condemned for having an abortion by the church and you get a picture of what this child bride's future would be like.
There's a common misconception among people that everything looks black and white to colorblind people .. well it's not true (only in total color blindness you see black and white). There are many different types of degress when it comes to color deficiency .. following images show you how colors change to a color blind person ..
First Britain is the largest terrorist threat to the US and now the Canadians are arming their border guards! What next?
That's pretty wild from an American perspective.  It sounds somewhat similar to England a few hundred years back though.
The high oil prices which the Western world abhors are a product of Western style capitalism at it's finest.  Supply and demand people.
"As for sensing pain, that has absolutely nothing to do with murder." For me, I feel that if a being has the ability to feel pain (whether it feels pain at death or not), then killing it is murder.  So yes, I murder cows because I eat their meat. I'm going to hell, and I don't care!! But, hey, on the bright side, I can confess my sin and be forgiven :P
lol
  To have sex with someone by force, against their will, without their consent is rape. The reason it is illegal is because in most civilized cultures humans are granted the right to bodily integrity, to be able to decide who they share their genitalia with. To enslave someone is to have control over someone else's life, they are not allowed to make basic decisions for themselves. To remove the choice from a women regarding her own internal organs is to reduce her to a slave. You can argue that life begins at conception all you want, but it does not change the fact that if the woman is forced by law to carry an unwanted pregnancy to term, that is a form of mental rape and physical slavery. To argue anything else is illogical.     
&gt; but I can't figure it out In your last choice, instead of click, do a shift click.  You can then compare the new cards to what was on screen.  You can see that he has in fact removed all the cards that were there. I remember seeing this like 6-7 years ago.  Looks like it's still going around the net.
You have talent for management.  You're hired. :-)
&gt; From: william C.  Sir, I took your experiment twice with the same positive results. Just yesterday I saw the same experiment overlaid over a "David Copperfield" presentation. I have no explaination other than perhaps a belief in experience-based reality. After participating in your experiment I decided that you picked the proper card because I wanted you to in the first place, and that I created the conditions to make that outcome come true by affecting my own perception of reality. Otherwise, perhaps the cards chose me instead of me choosing them? Regards, Bill Somehow, exactly correct. Somehow, exactly wrong?
*Yes, it is written in the Stars and it is your destiny...*
I think you made some excellent points as well, but I just wanted to clarify. By *war* in my original comment I was referring to Iraq. Mine was a comment on what the political machine here has done to public opinion: firmly instilled the notion that supporting America necessitates supporting *this* war and in *this* way and that there can be no other way, which is simply a fallacy concocted by an administration that got entrenched in a war for one reason and then had to create alternative reasons (or excuses, be they correct or incorrect) when the first vanished. "He who is not with me is against me" doesn't translate to "He who disagrees with my action must disagree with my cause."   
like those losers at Google?
Only ~55 million kilometers separates them from each other.
Don't forget Auburn Calloway, who tried to [hijack]( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/FedEx_Flight_705) a DC-10 in 1994 and crash it into the FedEx Memphis headquarters. Funny how this was never publicized and everyone assumes that September 11th was the first use of airplane as a flying bomb.
Not a free lunch -  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/england/beds/bucks/herts/5295244.stm  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/magazine/4630938.stm   http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/health/4305783.stm   http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/health/4052963.stm   http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/uk/4013895.stm   http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/health/2407027.stm   http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/health/1146752.stm These aren't just some kind of made-up propaganda - I've seen this kind of thing happen and spoken with psychiatrists and nurses who have told me they see it all the time. 
Herman Goering (Nazi SA commander): "Naturally the common people don't want war; neither in Russia, nor in England, nor in America, nor in Germany. That is understood. But after all, it is the leaders of the country who determine policy, and it is always a simple matter to drag the people along, whether it is a democracy, or a fascist dictatorship, or a parliament, or a communist dictatorship. Voice or no voice, the people can always be brought to the bidding of the leaders. That is easy. All you have to do is to tell them they are being attacked, and denounce the pacifists for lack of patriotism and exposing the country to danger. It works the same in any country."
Where's Olive?
it is 2  blank verse  unintelligible  like rosie  can't be  bothered  stardom
Sure, that sounds like fun. Guess away. This could be nearly as entertaining as the ESP card trick comments.
Now *that* sounds like a big piece of Hollywood crapola. King Kong stank. Who needs *another* war movie?
The Bush administration may not have lost any credibility with you but opinion polls show that it has lost credibility with the public in general.
Wonder how much we paid for that airport.
Couldn't we just build a [series of tubes](http://www.boldheaded.com/podcast/steves_viral/DJ_teds_techno_tubes.mp3)?
CNN are traitors, they revealed our classified warp drive technology, they might as well go ahead and publish the location of our clone army breeding facility.
No secret here. Americans hate who they're told to hate.
I was going for the Russell's Paradox effect. And your sentence isn't really a Russell's Paradox problem, because the speaker is unambiguously in the one kind of people: those who are referenced by this very sentence.  It is, however, amusing in the "There are three kinds of people in this world: those who can count, and those who can't" sense.  When I constructed the sentence in the grandparent, I had to make sure that the speaker would be referenced by the last clause iff he was not referenced by the last clause.  So if he's in the first category (those referenced by the last clause), he cannot be in the second by the Law of Excluded Middle (assumed in all these "There are two kinds of people" jokes...), yet he must be because of the statement's content.
Before you post the real explanation, have the humility to assume that other redditors are as smart as you... because they're probably smarter.
Actually, my sister generally hates women-only groups, because women apparently become catty bitches when no guys are around.  But she also hates being harassed and leered at.  So yes, given those choices, I bet she'd go for the women-only car - but she shouldn't have to make that choice!  Why can't we have unsegregated cars where people respect each other?
I don't agree.  Maybe it's just the fact that I live in California, but almost all of my friends back in high school were much more concerned with their parents knowing they smoke tobacco than pot.  Cigarettes are definitely worse for you... by a long shot too.
They produce a show that is hip, smart, funny, irreverant, and intelligent.  What sort of views might the creators of *South Park* hold? &gt;Stone and Parker said that if you had to put a label on them, they were **libertarian** — and that didn't mean Republican to this crowd.
Is it "bashing" when it's factual?
More to the point, they were levied with war debts they simply couldn't pay, and so tried to inflate the currency to raise funds, which led to massive hyperinflation and widespread economic instability. This makes me really worried about *our* war debts (which thankfully aren't a huge portion of the GDP *yet*, but are rapidly going in the wrong direction).  U.S. debt is denominated in dollars, which makes an inflation of the currency even more likely (unlike Germany, we *could* wipe out our war debts by printing money).  That's just as bad for American citizens though, and will win us no friends abroad. I'm actually far more worried about U.S. inflation due to terrorism than I am about terrorism itself.  I suspect Osama bin Laden's purpose in blowing up the twin towers wasn't to tear America apart, but to make us so paranoid that we tear ourselves apart.  And he's been doing a fairly good job of it so far.
this is exactly why the term islamic fascism is so accurate, clear and useful. islam is not the problem. terrorism is not the problem. islamic fascism is the problem. terrorism is a tactic, islamic fascists, not terrorists, are the enemy. the focus on terrorism is a misleading distraction.
I really hope Pluto stays a dwarf planet because one, I never have really considered Pluto a planet and two, they are going to have to add a bunch of other "planets" with Pluto. Planets are supposed to be special, dammit!
[Dupe](http://programming.reddit.com/info/foh3/comments). Or so I think. Comparing "1 day ago" and "1 day ago" isn't the easiest thing to do.
Two of those are antecdotal, which is not scientific. One of them is just telling us about hte rising statistics of drug use... not an inherently bad thing. And the rest of them describe pot as causing mental health problems, which are very hard to pin down.  Psychology is not a strict science and mis-diagnosis is extremely common. On the other hand, the positive effects of marijuana are more clearly documented and are MUCH more scientifically observable.
right, because all might-be-a-terrorist folks are going from the same place to the same place.
That's not buying time, it's buying convenience. If you get held up on the way to work, that's not money lost, and it's sad to think so (probably causes road rage too). Similarly, the dude in the link is arguing about the convenience, which might not be worth as much to someone as the benefits of using public transit.
Flying on an aeroplane is a privilege, not a right.
the best
Over 3 Million Listings, Instant Home Valuations, Interactive Maps and More.
I think I said this already here at reddit, but anyway . . .  I used to support Isreal.  That was before I found my brain.  They obviously want to be a mini US, always pushing other countries around like a big bully.   It's ok when we do it, but other countries aren't allowed to do the same.  Hypocrites, all.
If it was really travelling that fast, the crew could just go back in time and fix the mistake.
I disagree, but I am biased. I think OO in JavaScript should be kept hard because it's inherently a prototyping language. I really don't want to see JS become an OOP + prototyping language, and I really don't want to see JS become an OOP language. I like the prototyping paradigm; I enjoy the simplicity of not being exposed to complex inheritance or access rules, and I think it's suited to web development [1]. I enjoy JS syntax; I don't want to see that clouded with access or inheritance modifiers. I think certain other paradigms are better suited to prototyping; for example, aspects-oriented programming is a lot more function-oriented and could even simplify OOP implementations in JS [2]. [1] Lua has proven that it works for scripting as well. [2] I envision a future where functions (which are objects) are pointcuts and join points are `Function.prototype` methods and you can do neat things like `alert.after += function {...}`.
Sure, blame the arrow, not the archer....
Even funnier, the Wikipedia article refers to the intended hijacking as a kamikaze attempt.  I don't believe I have ever heard the 9/11 attacks referred to as such.
None of this is a new language feature. This is a technique building upon delegates using the fact that you can create an array of delegates (or any type) in C#. This is no different than creating an array of (first-class) functions and iterating over them, calling each one in a more dynamic language: You're not using any new feature; you're simply using old features better [1]. [1] Here, that's not really true since C# has extremely wordy syntax for delegates, and delegates are a bad replacement for first-class functions.
Well the problem is that no one condemns him.  What's even more funny about this whole situation is to think that David Duke has to travel to Syria to find a welcome TV audience. http://www.memritv.org/search.asp?ACT=S9&amp;P1=941
http://www.memritv.org/search.asp?ACT=S9&amp;P1=941 Hey, if we can send anyone over let's send David Duke back to Syria where he can get another warm reception on state TV!
There were also some amusing error messages in old Lisp systems. Like these from MacLisp due to Guy Steele:  VERITAS AETERNA--don't SETQ T   NIHIL EX NIHIL--don't SETQ NIL
Ohhhhhhhhh!  He apologized?  Do you mean the way Trent Lott apologized for his commment?  Something that "hinted" of racism rather than being associated for years with an organization formed on the basis of racism? Tell you what.  If you are so interested in the KKK, take a guess at where they have to travel to get their message out. http://www.memritv.org/search.asp?ACT=S9&amp;P1=941
I certainly do, though he's come a long way toward repentance, I think. What ever does David Duke have to do with anything?  Never mind. I don't think I care to follow the non sequiturs any longer.
Sure.  It's a matter of intent.  If there's a God who wills all things according to His purpose, He can just as easily have people always regrow their limbs, right?  But that's clearly not how things work in this world we're in.  And yet people still are missing limbs in this world where they don't grow back.  God actually intends these things to happen. Why?  Forget for a second why God doesn't heal amputees, a far tougher question to face is this -- "why doesn't God heal _me_?"  Even Paul, an apostle from the Bible, tells that he prayed repeatedly for God to remove him from some agonizing situation... and God didn't.  What's the deal? There are a lot of complicated explanations, but for Christians it all comes down to this.  God says to all people, "I love you.  Trust in Me."  You either you believe this or you don't.  If you do, no explanation is necessary.  If you don't, no explanation is possible. Hard to swallow, isn't it?
Hey, where can I get a good deal on a vest and ski mask?
Your point?
&gt; C# seems to have hundreds of different collection classes, used inconsistently in the .NET libraries. And they're all under `System.Collections` [and are oh-so hard to count. They are: ArrayList, BitArray, Hashtable, Queue, SortedList, and Stack. (Hundreds, I know [1].)](http://msdn2.microsoft.com/en-us/library/system.collections.aspx) And they all implement interfaces defined in .NET (IComparable, IEnumerator, IDictionary, IWeLoveInterfacesHowAboutYou), ensuring consistency between collection types and mentioned countless times in documentationz not to mention that the collection types themselves are extremely well-documented. Oh yeah, it's a real mess. [1] The rest are abstract classes or those weird case comparer classes that nobody uses except the people who write .NET.
Everyone drools over Google, but notice how they can only work on stuff that scales to millions of people. You can't work on niche products.
&gt;Did they write it in Ruby? That is the worst attempt to jab at a language I've ever seen.
&gt; you assume the worst (white,black, boogeyman whatever ) - you profile and take action. Ah...but that's not profiling then is it? Assuming the worst regardless of what the person looks like is what we *should* be doing, as this author points out.   
You could probably start it up with a second small motor. Remember it runs at 102rpm so you only need to turn the motor over about twice per second to get it going. And you only need to overcome the engine's internal resistance (from bearings, piston seals etc) in order for it to start.
You say that the climate model is "tenuous at best", yet your previous comments show you don't understand it at all. In any case, I believe that there is a chance that the predictions could be wrong, however when you look at the potential consequences then you _have_ to take some action.  The state I live in is currently experiencing the worst drought in recorded history. It has cost billions in government subsidies and new infrustructure needed to handle  the situation. If the predictions about global warming are correct then this cost of this drought will seem insignificant. You are talking about droughts and floods wiping out farmland, leading to global famines. Storms and rising sea levels will mean that billions of people will be displaced. As advanced as you may think we are, we cannot handle the consequences. Look at how poorly the evecuation and cleanup in New Orleans went. Now imagine that taking place in hundreds of cities worldwide. At the moment there is no insentive for those contributing to the problem to make a difference. People will consume whatever they can, and ignore the consequences. Corporations have shown time and time again that they are willing to put short term profits above everything else. Even _if_ we knew for sure that global warming was going to produce disasterous effects do you think that they would do the right thing? Working towards fixing the problem may result to a hit to economic activity, but at least it will be controllable.   Measures like carbon trading schemes would provide econimic insentives for the companies to do the right thing. Its benifits are two-fold. It will create new industries and benifit companies who invest in new technology, and it can be scaled up over a period of time which means that we can combat the problem without placing immediate strain on existing companies. Clean energy is going to take decades to produce and become dominate. The majority of the world's electricity is produces by coal power plants, yet we have no way to retrofit older plants, or even build new ones to make them "clean". Such technology looks like it is at least 15 years off, even if we fully commit to it now. If we continue to do nothing then we run the risk of realising in 50 years that there is a massive problem, but we have no way of fighting it.
Olbermann just might be the Edward R. Murrow of our generation
This is an example of how much you people understand history.  Do you have any idea of what happened after the US left Vietnam?  Do you care?  Probably not, communists killing 3 million people is nothing compared to what the good that they brought with them.
I love how the author smoothly transitions from process priorities to thread priorities with nary a blink of an eye. This is only then explained in a comment (search for "&gt; Don't" since his comment system is too good to have permalinks) after somebody brings it up.
this is ancient i know...i am a human female, by the way, and i tend to over cut the hair to very short then let it grow for 10 months at a time with no apparent need for cutting until a certain compulsion kind of makes me do so.  strange and ritualistic behavior.
I downmodded you because &gt; I think you can make the case that [racial profiling] would be more effective than random searches contradicts the point of this story.
Guess he didn't have enough faith!
&gt; Vim7.0 tabs suck From the rediquette: &gt; Editorialize in the headlines. From common sense: &gt; People have no idea what you're talking about if you link to a vim tips page and go "Vim 7.0 tabs suck, skeet skeet." From me: &gt; I think dean is actually referring to the comment made by nowayjose.
Garlic, crosses, and fire?
How has Senator Byrd come a long way?   David Duke's appearence in Syria is an example of where white supremecists have to travel to find an audience interested in their philosophy of hate. I think you followed it pretty well.
Thank goodness they told me in time!
&gt; I was really sure that Rails had some quick/easy way to do this, but I couldn't find it. If there's an easier Railsish way to do this, please let me know in the comments. I'd like an explanation for this; has Rails, a framework, been so influential that it has developed its own look and feel or is `strftime` not Rubyish enough? Otherwise, I see it as a contradiction that Rails, as a Ruby framework, would have a different look and feel than the language it's being written in.
"Remove Personalized Results for User 'J-Dawg of Nazareth'"
George Metesky,  Luke Helder, and Eric Harris and Dylan Klebold were not politically, religioiusly or otherwise ideologically motivated, they just hurt/killed a lot of people.  That doesn't qualify them as terrorists (except perhaps in George Bush's America, where standards have dropped considerably.) The Boston Tea Party was politically motivated, but nobody was hurt.  The offenders even swept the decks of the ships before they left.  If that property destruction was a terrorist act, it's a pretty marginal case. Finally, profiling at its best is not exclusively racial but based on statistics and psychology.  It means going by the numbers without paying heed to politically sensitive issues.  It works very well for El Al. I'm not necessarily for, but this article oversimplifies.
I think it's within the school's rights to make him cover up the alcohal and the cocaine images, but I think that's the end of what they're allowed to censor. And I say this because it's usually a school rule that you're not allowed to wear a shirt with drugs, alcohal or swear words on it, without expecting someone in the school to tell you to change it.
Add to which a load balanced cluster will not solve all problems. In fact if you aren't careful and disciplined it can  create new and exciting forms of breakage, especially with database connection pooling. 
Best laugh I've had all day.  Thanks!
I didn't get the impression that the article was a criticism of an organization's right to determine the criteria for membership. I got the impression that the article was a criticism of an organizations determination of who was eligible for membership. I may defend your right to do stupid things, but that isn't going to stop me from calling them stupid.
"Jumping into the mouth" is pejorative as it could have been simply put as "locution borrowed from the right-wing pundits by the President" or the President's speechwriters.  As if it wasn't the President's choice to borrow the term.  Yes, it's pejorative.  I'm amazed I have to point this out.   As for Islamofascist, let me just say that you can usually detect a rhetoric-based attempt to make your opponents look silly or stupid by an unnecessary change in the opponent's wording or choice of words.  "Islamofascist" is a much better word for making those who talk of "Islamic fascism" seem out of control, paranoid, and feverish.   Another good test - if you were trying to engage a Bush-supporter in real discourse would you use this language to him/her and expect the conversation to bear fruit?  Maybe you spend too much time talking to people who agree with you?
Well, we'd like to believe that we've advanced a little beyond the animal kingdom.  May not be true, but c'mon.  A species needs its illusions.
very interesting article ... look forward to trying out this technique with my camera
Maybe I'm mistaken, but I'm pretty sure that I read that the memorial that's going up is going to cost tens to hundreds of millions of dollars???  Sheesh.
I love this explanation. It's tenfold better than [what passes for explanation over at Wikipedia's Y combinator article](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fixed_point_combinator).
This is really amazing.  There really are real treasures to be found there.  I am a big fan of the translations of Thomas Taylor the Platonist, but getting reprints of his works is not usually cheap.  There they are on Google, free to browse or download as PDFs. Sadly the effect of so many users hitting the linked books is causing this when you try to download the linked boks as PDFs: &gt;We're sorry...  &gt;  &gt;... but your query looks similar to automated requests from a computer virus or spyware application. To protect our users, we can't process your request right now.  I really did want to have a local copy of Aesop...  I guess it should clear up in a few days. [added] Ooops - looks like the error is a result of my browser (Camino) since I was able to download the PDF with Safari.   Here is a really beautiful work by the philosopher Plotinus: http://books.google.com/books?vid=OCLC02976906&amp;id=0HR9y7wrs-kC&amp;pg=PR7&amp;lpg=PR7&amp;dq=%22Thomas+Taylor%22
Keith Olbermann tears Rumsfeld a new one in a very coherent set of comments.  Some of the best comments I've heard/seen/read on the extremism of the current administration.
&gt; like Bush and fellow Texans Bush isn't a Texan and don't stereotype Texans.
I'm not exactly sure what you're trying to say.  If the wages of unskilled workers go down, then the price of goods produced by unskilled workers will also likely go down, which allows one to make a living with a smaller income. It's a self-compensating system.  This is why you can often get stuff for cheaper in poor countries.  (That and the fact that vendors in poor countries are selling to poor people, so they can't charge too much.  But the same thing happens to a rich country if the unskilled worker demographic grows large enough.)
Timecube!!!!
Good article on SWOT Analysis.
An author of yaoi comics (gay comics for women) comments on when it is OK and when it is not OK for authors to kill fan favorite characters.
Well the language isn't exactly elegant to my eyes, it isn't as messy as LISP either. One thing I didn't notice was framework support. What does it offer in the way of Windows, Web, and Database programming?
'Secondly, an average city biking speed of 10mph? Come on.' Your city did away with redlights?  Impressive.
Expected/10.
&gt;It should be noted that [hourly monetary value of leisure] &lt;= [hourly wage], otherwise we wouldn't work in the first place! By your logic, we would never do anything but work! What determines our work/leisure mix is the value we put on the *marginal* unit of free time. As we work more and have less free time, the marginal value of leisure increases. When leisure is plentiful we are willing to trade it for a few bucks. The author was using a constant dollar value for the price of time for convenience of calculation.
And some people are deathly allergic to peanuts and will die on their very first exposure to mere peanut dust.  Does that mean we should outlaw peanuts?  Every substance on the planet will cause a bad reaction in some number of people, so you cant use individual instances of an adverse reaction as an indicator of which substances are generally helpful, benign, or harmful.   p.s. I'm not making that up about some people having lethal reactions to inhaled peanut dust.
Excelent reference... 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/G%C3%B6del,_Escher,_Bach
Around here at least redlights and stop signs are "optional" for bikes.
For a second I thought "They mispelled Iranian--no, Uranium."  Shows where my mind is.
I hope they also cover the voting machine fraud.  That seems like an even more egregious, inexcusable fraud.
So it's just like Australia.  ;)
Its a dangerous line. But i think having an IQ of 25 and needing to be cared for 24x7 crosses the line between eugenics and common sense. I'm not saying kill the disabled at birth, but genetics have evolved these kinds of safe guards for a reason. I personally am glad that there are some natural controls in place to keep people from poluting the gene pool (they eventually become retarded and die off). Im sure this is not the first time in history that this has happened.
&gt; The problem with your interventionist perspective First off, asking a question is not interventionist. &gt; We do not choose our parents, we don't have that "right." Which is exactly why having kids in unethical.  Any time you are going to make a drastic change in someone else's life, you should get that person's consent, which is de facto unavailable.  Talk about intervention! &gt;we cannot take it upon our selves to govern others beliefs--only to defend our own. What about defending the defenseless?  Would you jump in to stop someone who was about to attack and cripple a child?  What about if their actions would produce a crippled child by some other means? &gt; I'm not saying it would be bad to tell them what we believe is happening to them and suggest alternatives, but any coercison would be, IMHO, eugenic. Sure, by definition it would be eugenic.  That's not the same as being unethical; supplying folic acid to pregnant women is eugenic also. Not to mention, the reason they do it in the first place is due to coercion of others into what I presume is their cultish belief system.   
It hadn’t occurred to me until now that the time span on this was a little shady. Jill Caroll was held for two and a half months, these two are out in two weeks. From the mouth of morons. Jill Caroll was held in IRAQ which is, for the purposes of this subject, the wild wild west. The Palestinian Territories have a level of organization to the madness. From the very beginning, even Hamas was calling for teh release of the Fox News crew. In Carroll's case, it took a few weeks before the major media even covered the story. I think the writer of this article is trying to charge that Fox News is a division of the Bush Administration. But the U.S. is not responsivle got Palestinian border crossings. Why does this article rate so highly on Reddit? It is a hack piece that deserves to be down voted.
Hmmm -- According to the BBC, Sheikh Khalifa, crown prince of Abu Dhabi since 1969, is said to be a pro-Western moderniser. The population is also 80-percent Sunni.  And (according to InfoPlease), after the UAE was identified as a major financial center used by al-Qaeda in transferring money to the hijackers, the nation immediately cooperated with the U.S., freezing accounts tied to suspected terrorists and strongly clamping down on money laundering. But despite all that, there's no reason for them to fear that Shiite extremists will decide they need to crash commercial airliners into this tower, right? Er, uh, what about that War on Terrorism thing I keep hearing about?  Don't they have to worry about that at all?
import this
Because they look pretty badass, which is a public good.
Yes but you at least would like to meet those friends, talk with them (not just *to* them), and have some common ground with them.  It isn't about using your friends, it is about being friends based on some shared experience.  I don't accept "but these books were selected as the official 'Bible Canon' in a big committee long ago and they say such and such" as a valid experience.
Same principle as bottled water, but you have to admit at first glance it sounds like the world's most decadent concept.
No, she gets it but played along by not saying so explicitly. She and her boyfreind picked different cards, they were both missing, which was weird. *At first,* she thought those were the only two removed. She's discreet enough not to say what came second.
Where did this photo come from? Who shot it and at what distance? Has anyone ever alleged previosusly that he was gay? Have you see what a hottie his wife is????
islamic terrorists murder more people every day than the ku klux klan has in the last 50 years. [(source)](http://www.law.umkc.edu/faculty/projects/ftrials/shipp/lynchingyear.html) as repulsive as they are, the KKK doesn't hold a candle to islamic fascists when it comes to evil. 
awesome
'70s Malthusian "Population Bomb" nonsense...
I think some were tongue-in-cheek.
Not bad, but it's missing a few. Like it or not, there are a lot of influencial non-unix file systems.
Olberman is a baffoon. I still think he was a better sportscaster than political pundit. MSNBC is the lowest rated cable news network and old Olberman has the lowest rated show in the PM. His partisan hackery is the reason why.
&gt; So why did you quote my comment and now say you were "talking about abortion"? I just told you.  That is what I was talking about.  I missed what you wrote originally when skimming your comment. &gt;I took offense to this, because it was a silly extension to make, and it had no qualifications whatsoever. Your offense is due to your own internal conflict.  I merely asked if you supported keeping people on life support. &gt;And I don't see how I contradicted myself whatsoever. You contradicted yourself by first saying I was finding "extensions to your thoughts which don't exist", and then confirming that, in fact, you did support keeping people on life support (with qualifications).  Thus, those thoughts did exist. &gt;As for me, it is incredibly unlikely that I have been or will ever be pregnant You might be surprised that males sometimes help to make decisions about abortion with their partners. &gt;I was offended that you seemed to characterize me as moralizing and mandating You sure are reading a lot into it.  I just asked if you supported keeping braindead people on life support. &gt;If you think there is contradiction in the sentiments that That isn't what I was talking about. Next time, try asking for clarification rather than getting offended.  You might save yourself some time and keep your blood pressure down. 
ok so wheres the link to these ads?
hardly, it's completely different!
Hey -- I thought this was going to be an article about Shaq. 
Put a sock in it or it's the lions for you!
I looked into taking the bus to work, as I'd much rather spend the time reading a book than sitting in traffic. I live in northern jersey, my office is just a little over ten miles away, a twenty five minute drive in rush hour traffic. Turns out, the only way to get from where I live to where I work is via NYC, which extends the trip to 30 miles and one hour, forty five minutes, at a total cost of 12 bucks one way. Yeah... Personally, I'd love to take my bike to work. But there's simply no easy way to get from here to there via bike, the roads, sidewalks, and neighborhoods just aren't bike-friendly. Then of course you run into the problem snow, ice, rain, cold, and excessive heat which would make such a commute even more impossible probably half the days of the year.
One of the best pieces he's done.
Yes but they add to it that it is now considered void which is fine with me.
Yeah, the ad may not look so effective to us redditors.  But we're not the target - it doesn't seem farfetched that cultural differences would result in a markedly different interpretation in Iraq.
Apostasy = You reject them completely. Heresy is you want to be part of them but you are going against the grain and THEY reject you.
Next time I see you at a urinal next to me, I'll be sure to say hello.  Sometimes women should be protected from the filth of men. Women only train cars, while not prohibiting women from the rest of the train, is not comparable to mandatory burkas.
Because the article starts at 1932, and the hyperinflation had ended almost a decade earlier.
I think there could be a confounding variable in your simple correlation analysis.  Or a few dozen.
Do you really love the lamp, or are you just saying that because you saw the ad?
"Completion:  2006 (mall); 2007 (tower)" They're just a wee bit behind schedule.
The author of this article did not offer one shred of evidence that the "South Park Republicans" would vote for anyone other than Republicans.
LOL. :D
An airsoft player is normally active in many different airsoft games. However in a basic airsoft game the following should be some of the items these players consider bringing to the game. All of these items aren’t necessary but are recommended.
That's a brilliant idea!  To kill the joke, I haven't modded you up for it.
For those who prefer not to fill up their email inbox with ml messages, Nabble lets you watch specific threads and alerts you to updates on only those threads, among other niceties.  To do this, you first have to subscribe to the Erlang mailing list.  Send the following plain-text email to [majordomo@erlang.org](http://erlang.org/faq.html): [subscribe erlang-questions-posters](http://erlang.org/faq.html) erlang-questions-posters@erlang.org is a special list that allows you to post to the main erlang ml (erlang-questions@erlang.org) without all other posts being sent to your inbox.  Then you can use Nabble to turn on notifications for specific threads.
I can already see how the fundies would respond to this one: "Yeah, well, god works in mysterious ways." The catch all for anything that makes absolutely no sense. We might as well stop trying.
Wow, timmy boy sure looks angry.  Must have been unhappy with the manicure he got in prison.
which is sad because profiling increases the odds of preventing that major incident.
OMG, I get it now!  I live in Utah (far north of these people thank goodness) and I've always wondered why they're always throwing people (mostly men) out.
You know the interesting part about that is whenever I ask someone of a particular denomination about why another purported member of that denomination feels very differently, I get a "no true Scotsman fallacy" explanation. "Well, a *real* Catholic..."   I have heard so many conflicting interpretations from Catholics and yet all of them claim that their interpretation is correct and backed up by God/The Bible/The Pope/what-have-you. &gt; I wished all christians were more like you... Why aren't they? 
How is this a response/rebuttle to his statement?  How does low ratings in anyway discredit the statement Olberman was making?  I'm sorry, but if your opinion is to count for anything, you're going to have to list some specific reasons why his statements were anything other than relevant.  Simply calling someone names and trashing someone because he disagrees with your position is precisely the lack of real debate that this country is missing.  Frankly, I think you just made Olberman's point for him!
So let me get this straight. You are saying that any anecdotal evidence is worthless, that the article speculating on whether there could possibly be a causal link behind the correlation of soaring mental illness and drug abuse is not worthy of consideration and that the scientific studies also don't count. Well try to bear in mind that I wasn't trying to prove anything here, but just point out that there is more than one side to this story. If you have a situation where psychiatric wards are seeing a lot of people with cannabis-related psychosis it may be anecdotal but it should tell you something unless you are in a state of complete denial. The fact that you don't yet have hundreds of studies conclusively proving a link is not a smart basis for decision-making. If you are under about the age of 50, most or all credible sources of information you will have seen since your tender years will have been overwhelmingly positive, from Jimi shambling onstage and jamming a spliff in his headstock to Bob Marley to Mike Skinner. I pretty much learnt to read from the freak brothers.  What most people don't see is the inside of a high-security psych ward and not so many get a chance to discuss this with nurses who work in the field. The result is that people are ignorant of the dangers and the warning signs. Have you never met someone who gets the fear and then thinks they should maybe smoke a bit more and get past it to the next level? And there's something about smoking that can really put people in denial, like any talk of the downside is taken almost as a personal affront (I'll be pretty surprised if my comments here don't get heavily downmodded by the reddit ganja crew). All I'm saying is have an open mind.
That would be a good weakness for a Superhero. Like Jelly Man... 
This is what happens when government programs are dependant on hyped-up fear. It's the same logic that says we have to overturn the secular government in Iraq and give the real terrorists just what they want in a recruitment bonanza, otherwise we're raising the white flag to terrorism.
"I made... one million dollars... from my last job." 
Brilliant!!  What a wonderful way to waste electricity!
And the vast majority of successful businesses, web or otherwise?
Obligatory [link of the webcam](http://www.mathew.st/webcam.php).
Same here, but for the past few days. If the error was after a submission or a comment they were deleted and the back button didn't bring them back, which is bloody annoying.
Nee Jabba no badda
Just what do you mean by "white people"?
yeah and he's kissing Brad pitt. No no, travolta is not gay. He's just cultist for believing in scientology
An inspiration to us all...  Lecken Sie Käse Herrn Gunterswart, lecken Sie das Boot und Käse lalala
If so, then praise the Lord and pass the irony.
I bet some of the people against it publicly participate in it privately. In L.A. some years back they passed some law about gov't employees and domestic violence that pulled like half the city's cops off the beat... Reminds me of Congressman David Dreier who got the "Roy Cohn Award, in recognition of 24 years of working against gay and lesbian rights while living as a gay man yourself." http://www.laweekly.com/news/news/the-outing/1322/ 
We're using our old PC running Linux for this.  It would be up anyway as a file server so it's not any extra electricity to make it route too (other than what a 2nd NIC takes, I guess).  Plus the NAT does an excellent job of protecting the windows boxes behind it. However, this guy's instructions were way over complicated and he still didn;t get it right -- ge goes to the trouble of installing dhcpd and then says "but you've got to configure all your machines with static ips!") d'oh!
"Jumping into the mouth" is a phrase I had not heard until I read this article.  Googling it, I find that it appears to be typically used literally, so it is not an idiom as far as I can tell.  As a one off, if taken as it is meant, it appears to just means having words put into one's mouth, which is exactly what was occurring.  Not especially pejorative as far as I can tell, given that everyone on both sides knows perfectly well that Bush is certainly not speaking extemporaneously, but is reading/repeating the words and phrases his speechwriters and handlers have prepared for him to say. I admit that I can be a bit dense sometimes, so I'm not sure what your point about Islamofascism/Islamic Fascism was, but it didn't appear to be an explanation of the semantic difference, which is really what I wanted.  I'd also note that I have seen the term "Islamofascist" in common parlance of the wingnutosphere prior to seeing the term "Islamic Fascism" used.   As for engaging Bush supporters, Yglesias was clearly preaching to the choir in this essay, not trying to engage those hostile to his views.  I have read a number of his posts/works in various blogs/magazines, and I will say that he can be a bit immature in his writing, can make points that are pretty weak at times,and can make a poor turn of a phrase here and there.  But I like him, he is a good guy, and he is both honest, and willing to admit his errors after he makes a mistake.  All that said, while I wouldn't say this was a bad essay, it could have used work in that first paragraph.  The mouth jumping thing was more weird than pejorative IMHO.  All the same, the essay was certainly not intended to engage anybody but those who were already on board.  It certainly was more of an exhortation, an attempt to rally the troops, not an attempt to engage Right Wingers.  I sincerely doubt that talkingpointsmemo is really read too widely outside the leftists.  (BTW Josh Marshall is a better writer than Yglesias IMHO).  Personally I converse with folks on the right, folks on the left, and those somewhere else, and do what I can to persuade them that this administration is making errors in its approaches to the problems it faces.  When talking with those on the Right keeping one's cool and trying to be sincere and making simple points is a better approach than berating or overtly criticizing Bush, since many on the Right are caught up in a kind of hero worship that causes them to defend Bush in a kind of knee-jerk reaction if they see someone is visibly hostile to Bush.  One must be much more subtle to get a point home.  So I would not use the rhetoric that Yglesias used in this article to try to persuade someone on the right.  At the same time Yglesias wouldn't either.  That's not who the article was intended for. [edit - fixed a few typos]
I gotta agree with zhyla, that's just about hate. Even though it's a joke, and a funny one at that, it is saying the semi-truth that many people would like to see all evangelicals die.
So they're just "more" evil?
George Bush recently expressed skepticism to a mother of dead soldier who told him that her son could have led a happy life if he had lived. Bush quipped, "How do you know he would have been happy?" Indeed.  Let me reverse this to you, how do you know having an IQ of 25 constitutes suffering?  I used to work with people with birth defects and deformities.  I was always amazed at how "normal" their emotions were dispite their intellectual limitations.  Moreover, many parents of such children (and eventually adults) love them dearly and dote on them constantly.  Who are we to condemn their joy and love? 
Music to chill to, groove out, dance with, think of, feel it or float on. He included my Webcast station, EpiphanyRadio.org (http://www.epiphanyradio.org).
It's an excellent argument well made - like not making everybody wear glasses. There's a similar problem with salt intake. About 40% of people are salt-sensitive, yet the statistics are assumed to apply to everybody - so the majority have their salt cut needlessly while the dangers are actually underestimated for the 40%. It's really difficult and expensive to test for salt-sensitivity so public health organisations make blanket recommendations - and lives will be saved as a result at a not-too-great cost. You can also make the case that something like crack is terrible for everyone who takes it on a regular basis whereas the same isn't true for cannabis.  However, my position is not pro or anti-legalisation but that the danger from cannabis is wildly underestimated by users.
You are a fool, John Bentley.
Just noting, Olbermann himself has always spoken this frankly.  However, Keith Olbermann only has one show.
Could you cite a more recent and more accurate study of the cost of ethanol production?
My thoughts exactly. Nice play with old hardware but hardly sensible. Would be nice to see some estimate on that.
These aren't "activists." These are people of the mentality that says no election ends until their candidate wins.
A "police state"? Do you *really* think we have a police state? We haven't lost any of our major freedoms. Freedom of speech and privacy have come under attack in the last few years, but the courts have almost always ruled against the absurd accusations brought up by the Bush administration. As is always the case, a comparison to Hitler is a gross exaggeration.
by body count? yes.
Why can't those million lines be replaced?  This is how new companies get started.  Leave old crusty company, start new one and do what they used to do only more efficiently. Not saying that would work here, but it might be a possible solution?
Boo creepy foot doctor.  Hooray beer.
&gt;We should learn from them.  &gt;What Israeli security could teach us What I learned from them is that they merely shifted terrorist attacks to other targets.  You might as well say they can learn about Coffee Shop security from us, because ours don't get blown up.  You need to look past the proximate effect of their "security" policy and see that they have serious problems everywhere else: schools, clubs, cafes, bus stops, buses, in traffic, you name it -- all because of an ongoing territorial conflict.  I mean they just had missiles lobbed at them the other week, fer cryin' out loud. The only way to really be secure is to not have people that want you dead, and in general you can achieve that via diplomatic means. In any case, they are still as vulnerable as anyone else to an incident at a security checkpoint.  You don't need to get ON a plane -- detonating a device at an airport will not only shut it down, but also all connecting airports. And you don't even need to do that much; in the U.S. there have been several cases of people running through the checkpoint (late or whatever), for which SOP is to dump the entire terminal and rescreen everybody, snarling air traffic for hours. Heck, you can force a plane to land by leaving an iPod in the toilet. You know what else is asinine?  If I were a flight attendant I would not feel safe with an F-15 escort.  Their only purpose is to shoot down the plane.  I wouldn't call in an alert (almost) no matter what; let's check the scenarios: 1) a device causes some damage to the plane; maybe you can land safely -- but an F-15 might have orders to shoot you down over a field just to be on the safe side, because you might crash into a heavily populated area.  If I'm on the plane I would really like to try to land voluntarily... 2) someone or some group tries to hijack the plane; they fail because of A) passengers fighting back, B) air marshalls, C) reinforced cockpit doors.   3) an actual hijacking occurs.  The passengers still have a chance to take back the plane -- as long as an F-15 doesn't shoot it down first. 4) an actual hijacking occurs and passengers are unwilling or unable to retake the plane.  There's still a chance that this particular hijacker wants to actually go somewhere, like in the old days; an F-15 escort basically means you're toast. I am much more concerned about an F-15 than about someone with a box cutter.  It's just slightly more likely to bring down the flight...   
I'll believe that you're female... but human?  No way. (I am sooooo tempted to add "since aliens can't fake human breasts yet..." but I do try to fake being a decent guy.)
This site has horrible logic. Anyone who reads it and says "wow, yea [gG]od *must* be imaginary" needs to take a course in logic.
Video clips &amp; still photos from Flint Sitdowners Park located in Flint, Michigan, home of the Great Flint General Motors UAW Sit-down Strike of 1936-37. The Park contains The Flint Sit-down Monument.
because they're trying to raise money for a memorial to the people killed by islamic terrorists. not only is advertising standard in fundraising, the subject matter could not be more relevant.
you're an ass.
Four hundred huge offshore wind turbines are providing onshore customers with enough electricity to power several hundred thousand homes, and nobody standing onshore can see them.
This is garbage 
Religious fanatics don't concede, they combust.
Uh.. in an article from 1891?  I like sources that don't predate RADIO
&gt; As in merry? Or lame? Merry. Lame. And oh so gay! ;-) degustibus, cooo-*oooo*-ooome out of the clooo-*oooo*-oooset... la la la
What's a hypotenuse?
&gt; how do you know having an IQ of 25 constitutes suffering? When did you stop beating your wife?  I didn't say anything about IQ. Regardless, suffering is inherent in life. &gt;I used to work with people with birth defects and deformities. I was always amazed at how "normal" their emotions were dispite their intellectual limitations There is a wide range of "deformities" that has nothing to do with intellectual limitation. There are also plenty of people without physical deformities that do not have "normal" emotions. &gt;Moreover, many parents of such children (and eventually adults) love them dearly and dote on them constantly. And many don't.  For many parents, having a child who will never "grow up" is a perpetual burden. &gt; Who are we to condemn their joy and love? Why would you condemn their joy and love? It is quite easy to counter anecdotally with stories that didn't turn out so rosy. I think everyone deserves a fair shot at not having birth defects.  If later you think you'd be happier with handicaps, you can self-inflict whatever condition is to your liking. 
&gt; What country are you from? Do I really need to list all the inventions from America? You stupid lame ignorant jingoist ass! Thank you for a post too dumb to dignify with a response.
&gt; Bashing Christians, however, is easy since they're not violent. Especially not in Waco. Or throughout history. A regular bunch of Ghandis the whole lot.
*there is nothing even close to that in the Ruby world* I beg to differ. [Method Finder in Ruby](http://www.nobugs.org/developer/ruby/method_finder.html) is only like fifteen lines long, and the real meat is only five lines. Enjoy.
&gt; Randy Borntrager, a spokesman for the Ohio Democratic Party, said the party wants Blackwell to stop setting rules that affect his own campaign. Sounds reasonable to me.
One of the dumbest things I have ever seen on reddit... ... somebody should send her a link to Project Gutenberg.
&gt; Why does America hate everybody else? The nation carries within it a subtle but pervasive undercurrent of racist xenophobia?
&gt; &gt; He said that if British-based terrorism continues, America is likely to respond harshly. &gt; A cynical smile is all I can really muster. Do you realise what this means? After the Americans are finished, Europe might actually be able to forge and stick to a unified foreign policy!
Keep in mind that these things are compounded. So if we've had this problem for, say, the last thirty years, super-sized meals are now 237 times as big as they used to be. I think your numbers might be skewed.
&gt; Carter's meddling in Central America led to a civil war that killed 40,000 people, left 100,000 homeless, and installed a Soviet-supported totalitarian government that for ten years was a source of unrest in the region. On November 4, 1979, a group of Khomeini's progressive moderates stormed the embassy in Tehran and held Americans hostage for the next fourteen months. The regime that replaced the disposed shah became a major backer of the fundamentalist terrorist movement. As a reward for his efforts to wind down the arms race, the Soviet Union invaded Afghanistan--astounding the president, who nonetheless told a group of moderate Democrats that current events would do nothing to alter his policies. Carter had done more in three years to weaken the country and destabilize the world than all the other presidents since the Cold War had started. It was Senator Moynihan who gave him his epitaph: "Unable to distinguish between our friends and our enemies, he has adopted our enemies' view of the world."
Give it a try. It contains 340 cryptic characters. To this day it has never been solved and the case has been closed since April 2004. The FBI and the goverment’s best code breakers have been unable to solve this cipher.
But immigrants *can't* be the cause of some kind of environmental crisis, since (correct me if my math is wrong, here), every time immigration adds to the population here, it subtracts from the population somewhere else.
But it is the only way GvR is able to fix some of the (very few) language mistakes he did early on.  In the long run  python will benefit from these improvements.  See  [video](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-6459339159268485356&amp;q=guido+rossum). 
Way to string five perjoratives together and contradict yourself.  You responded to my comment but failed to make any point.  Resorting to insults shows the weakness of your mind and argument.  You insulted my country.  I didn't respond by insulting you or any country.
Why is mentioning stupidity racist? Do you think stupidity correlates with race? And you think that this assumption makes the parent post racist?
M-x yow "Not enough people play SKEE-BALL..  They're always thinking about the DIEBOLD EFFECT or and NET NEUTRALITY! My ELBOW is a remote FRENCH OUTPOST!!" That's what your post brought to mind (and I hope you don't take affront at this).
and their neighbours neighbours... or they could band together and form a society.
In biology class last year we were taught that if a small segment of a population is isolated from the main population, then the small population can grow into a larger population and, given enough time, become a new species.  We were taught about genetic drift and how it occurs mostly in smaller populations.  I am wondering how small populations survive these types of genetic disorders. Do humans have significantly more genetic material than other species?  That seems unlikely, so genetic disorders should appear in other species too. Also, at what point are the members of two different populations unattractive to each other?  I find foreign women at least as attractive as those of my race.  I have read that breeding genetically different organisms of the same species creates healthier than average organisms.  How does this factor into the speciation process?
Actually, growing language like a snowball is lame. One day you won't be able to roll it anymore, 'cause it's too heavy.
First off: how do you make that cool little blue line when you quote someone?  I like it Second: a very sincere 'thank you' for telling me why you downmodded me.  Now, to your point, I will admit (even though you didn't make this argument)that "you can make a case for X" is a very weasely way of saying "I believe X," but I'm honestly not making the case for racial profiling.  Even if I were, however, the article presents only anecdotal accounts of terrorists who presumably would not have been caught via racial profiling.  Am I not allowed to point out that this anecdotal evidence does not damn racial profiling, without being downmodded?  I thought that was used for people who posted nonsensical or needlessly infmallatory comments.  Anyway, although I do not support racial profiling, I do honestly believe that it is a reasonable and possibly defensible response.  Now, onto my main point: are there any middle eastern men who would accept this?  I doubt so, but so far we've seen white people for and against racial profiling, and other people against racial profiling, some of them probably asian or middle eastern.  I was simply wondering if there were any middle eastern men willing to subject themselves to this.  I honestly believe that if i were a middle eastern man, and had nothing to hide, I would, but I could be totally wrong about that.
[A whole list of citations for you as requested](http://www.princeton.edu/~prolife/articles/embryoquotes2.html)   
Very cool photograph of Einstein and Godel together, if only for being in color.
1) I disagree with this assertion, because no matter what we're discussing wacko radicals. The surrounding situation isn't changing that. You can be kidnapped for extraordinarily long times even in calm areas. 2) Yes, that's exactly what I'm saying about Fox News. They are basically one giant organizational Press Secretary for the administration. Nonstop positive-Bush-spin. As for your other point, I gather you didn't read the link itself. Apparently some people find the article worth reading. As I said therein, if it turns out the report is wrong, I'll be damn relieved. Honestly at this point it gives me a headache to keep seeing the ways the Bush-led government is mucking absolutely everything up. ...and as a note, I'm not down-voting a disagreeing comment. I just felt like saying that aloud so people aren't confusing the debate for petty bickering or whatever.
And on the left sidebar, an ad for "conservative t-shirts".
Did you comment the wrong person or miss the sarcasm?
&gt;There have been no successful terrorist attacks in the U.S. since 9/11 That's not true.  The anthrax attacks occurred after 9/11. And just as with Bin Laden, we still haven't found or caught the source of those attacks. While we should be targeting terrorist leaders wherever they may be, invading another country isn't a requirement, and if it were we'd be screwed since we'd probably be stuck trying to invade Pakistan, Somalia, the Sudan, Lebanon, Syria, Egypt, Saudi Arabia, and a host of other countries.  Also I think it might be worth considering that Bush had the opportunity to take out Zarqawi before the Iraq invasion, and chose not to.  It's hard to find the story now, alas, due to the quantity of stories on Zarqawi so a less that perfect site is all I can find:  http://mediamatters.org/items/200606150004 I do agree with much of what you say, we really do need to take the threat of terrorism seriously, and there are many threats brewing in the Islamic world, though there are also potential threats of terrorist acts in various factions here in the U.S. as the abortion clinic bombings and the OK City bombing show.  Where I don't agree is that invading Iraq has helped in any respect.  I'd say that the invasion helped to solidify the views in the Middle East of the U.S. as an aggressor, a view which helps greatly in recruiting terrorists.  Opinion polls in the Middle East have shown that the view of the U.S. have dropped progressively since the invasion.  That increased hatred will help fuel more terrorism.  Abu Ghraib, Falluja, and other events in Iraq have had very powerful effects on the  psyche of many Muslims.  We should keep in mind that the media in the Middle East is even worse than ours in exaggerating and propagandizing it reports, so the "bad apples" excuse isn't even heard.  Every misstep we make while standing on Muslim soil will be magnified a hundred fold.  There have been intelligence experts who have voiced this concern and noted that terrorist recruitment has grown due to the Iraq invasion.  This is why a certain type of kindness and tolerance to the Muslim world is important - we are losing the P.R. war, and saber rattling and indiscriminate bombing will only breed more terrorists. The Anti-Semitism of the Middle East also is a serious issue, and something that we should try to figure out how to address somehow.  The Muslim world picked up the utterly foul Protocols of the Elders of Zion, and have run with it.  While we have made a few token denunciations, the ideology that that breeds is a deadly poison that ensures endless conflict.  There is an interesting article on Anti-Semitism in the Middle East that does a nice job of describing the problem without partisanship.  If you haven't read it, I'd recommend it: http://www.richardwebster.net/israelpalestine.html I do agree that now that we are in Iraq we must do all we can to try to make what success we can out of the country.  We are indeed honor bound to try to finish what we started, and a pull-out at this point would probably drop the country into a full-scale civil war with likely intervention from Iran.  I do agree that the possibility of Iraq becoming a client-state to Iran is a very serious threat to the US.  Also a pullout would very likely breed a P.R. nightmare for us in the Middle East at a point when we are already losing the war for hearts and minds. [edit - fixed a few typos and clarified a muddled sentence]
I don't think NetBSD is dead and will never be dead because of its influence.  One can start thinking that due to the current problem with the NetBSD foundation there might not be another solution than to fork NetBSD and from now on work with a different policy... but then, NetBSD has already been forked. OpenBSD. Is OpenBSD having the wrong policies ? or philosophy ? (Theo is indeed a strong leader). But OpenBSD is another project with another name... so will be any other fork of NetBSD.  Then you can see that NetBSD lives thru its influences... mainly on OpenBSD... but I bet FreeBSD and Linux has a great set of influences.  And the other point is that, the death of a project is not inherently a bad thing. The death of XFree in favor of Xorg was indeed very good. And it wasn't good because Xorg maintained a sensible license, but because Xorg adapted to a new world with new needs. I think that some day we'll see the death of Linux in favor of a better and more exiting thing (like... HURD ? Plan 9), maybe we'll see the death of GCC or the whole C, in favor of better compilers and better languages.
This is the one single greatest post I have seen on anything in my entire life.
I guess they don't have any high winds that would make something like this a little scary...
The comment-500 issue is the biggest bug we have right now. It's been a real pain in the ass, but I hope it's much better now. We're installing some new hardware this weekend that should also help.
Personally, I'd use dhclient for that...
Reminds me of Soda Lake from Super Mario World. :)
Hello Brother.  Glad to see another member of the Craft here.   I wonder how many Masons there are on reddit...
Economists just use money as a convenient yardstick to measure value.  And I, for one, value my time.  I suspect you do too.
he wasn't presenting evidence - this wasn't a study. He does, however, quote the guy who coined the term as saying  &gt; The Republicans have got to be punished for destroying   &gt; conservatism," he said, explaining why he's rooting against   &gt; the party this November. "If it requires an idiotic   &gt; Democratic House to stop these people from doing what   &gt; they're doing, then good.
Enough of those in the right places, and we could be an energy exporter again. I imagine these would even work out in the Great Lakes, too.
If it takes z minutes to do my laundry and I'm willing to pay someone $x to do my laundry then that means that I consider my free time to be worth, at a minimum, x/z dollars per minute. To find out exactly how much I value my free time, just increase x until I'm no longer willing to pay. Your way of valuing time is a bit backward. You assume that all time outside of work does not have a monetary value just because no one is paying you. Buying convenience IS buying time.
"Party line" was a figure of speech unrelated to actual party platforms, iirc, before that use kind of faded out in the media. I meant that they walk the line set by the popular media and all the alarmists talking about how the planet's melting like the Wicked Witch of the West. I don't think there is a party platform that says global warming isn't happening. But yes, scientists that argue caution in drawing conclusions about global warming do have trouble getting funding. They may still get it, but it's much easier to get it for studies that start off assuming global warming is caused by human activity.
kudos and an upmod for a Sparks reference
Bus transit may suck in some small cities, but not all.   Here in Ames (pop ~52,000) it is quite nice.  That may explain why our ridership (&gt;4M trips/yr) is higher than many larger cities.
&gt;Well, dude homeopathy actually works and is supported by immense empirical research. You are incorrect. Some links (repost): http://skepdic.com/homeo.html http://www.homeowatch.org/ http://www.ratbags.com/rsoles/comment/homeopathy.htm   If it actually did work you would never need to buy homeopathic medicine.  Just get a drop from a friend or a sample bottle, dilute it in a bottle of water, and *bam* it's even stronger! Not to mention, if you think water has "memory", remember water has been around for a very long time...  (meaning every homeopathic remedy has likely gotten into the water supply at one time or another, thus making your tap water a hugely potent source of every homepathic concoction under the Sun.)   
For me the most important aspect is that it is distributed. Some user stories: - I am coding a new thing, I have created the second file after an hour of furious coding. I have energy and ideas for another two or three more hours of fourious coding. But this is growing to big and changing so rapidly as I try different approaches than versioning is a must. Ok: darcs init; darcs add -r *; darcs record... and I am there. Nothing else is needed to be done anywhere, I already have a repository. - I work colaborately with some other people. I have made a change of 100 lines in one file. It is looking good and I don't want to loose it. But comiting means the whole project will just not compiling and everybody will hate me. With SVN I'll pray. With darcs I'll do a darcs record, because untill I do a darcs send nobody will have my changes. - I am trying to make a bugfix. For that I've read tens of lines of code until I've found one line where I changed one character. On those tens of lines I have made aesthetic changes, fixed indentation and even wrote a couple of comments than are useful for the next reader of those lines. In SVN I'll have to commit everything together and the real bugfix will be burried in tons of unreleadet patching. Darcs allow me to record the changes line per line. So, the bugfix gets recorded as bugfix and the rest as clean up.
Yup, if it isn't popular, then it isn't true. Let's use the ratings as a guide, shall we? Fox news is consistently rated higher than MSNBC, yet it's viewers have been found to be (1) less educated than viewers of other news channels (including Comedy Central's The Daily Show with Jon Stewart) and (2) more prone to believing in falsehoods than people who get their news elsewhere. Just because you believe something to be true does not make it so. More on ratings: Fox has been hemorrhaging viewers, whereas CNN and MSNBC have been making significant gains. Further, if the reason Olbermanns ratings are low is his partisan hackery, then why are Bill O.s and Hannity's ratings so high (considering the fact that they are textbook partisan hacks)? Oh, I forgot - they report the "truth"(tm). Fair and balanced indeed.
Screw ethanol. Hemp biodiesel, people! Totally renewable, grows in every single state of the union, nobody starves, and a whole host of uses for the byproducts (including paper and cloth). It's not the end-all be-all solution to our energy woes, but at least it's a good start. ([Deep-sea wind turbines](http://reddit.com/info/fvle/comments) are another good start, too.) Burning food is probably the worst alternative to burning dinosaur bones.
Anyone have anything about sugar cane?
I can guarantee that, while it may be nice, none of them ever forgets that they're in prison.  They may prefer it to their alternatives outside, sure, but that doesn't change the fact that they can't leave.
I used darcs for a project at work. I started the project by myself, there was only a week to finish (before the boss could find out we were doing what he told us not to do... we know it was the right thing and after that week he, the boss, loved it).  At first I was codding by myself, then another guy joined. We just used get and push to go by without wasting time in setting a server for a shared repository.  After the week passed and the boss approved the project, we did set up the server because it was useful, but not before, when we concentrated on codding.
Really ? that's indeed good news!
Crazy glitch in yahoo chess where black takes his own piece!
Wow, they really do update wikipedia articles quickly.  Thanks for the pointer.
Check out our thoughts on building technology solutions in small business
Oh, it's been so long since I've seen Orgazmo!. I'd almost forgotten about this scene. Interesting sidenote, a couple of them showed up the day I was moving out of my college apartment. They were about a minute into their spiel when we called their attention to all the boxes and random effects strewn across the porch and front yard, and how that day *really* wasn't such a good day to be bothering us. Nowhere near as offensive as the old lady, but then again nowhere near as much fun.
&gt; So yes, I murder cows because I eat their meat. I'm going to hell, and I don't care!! But, hey, on the bright side, I can confess my sin and be forgiven :P Who feels more, a cow or an 18-day-old clump of cells?  Is it worse to kill your (healthy) dog or take the morning after pill? 
That's your opinion and it's worth what we paid for it.
To me it looks like the "official" total height is calculated including the needle for the Petronas Towers but without the needles for the Sears Tower. When the person has drawn the chart they have scaled it as though neither includes the needle in the height.  I don't think that someone would conciously scale down the Sear Tower unless they were very petty and actually cared about relative building height, which I'm sure most graphic designers don't.
Oh, by original it seems to mean a very old version... from 1998... :( what a pitty.
Hey!  Downmodding is un-Christian! 
Opens up a pretty big loophole don't you think? The 9/11 terrorists themselves flew "trial runs" multiple times before finally stepping up to the plate.
This guy has some serious cognitive deficits. Look at two of his conclusions, right next to each other at the end: &gt; Attempts to promote mass transit through coercion will inevitably fail. Trying to make mass transit more competitive by raising auto registration fees, parking fees, bridge and tunnel tolls, gasoline taxes, and the like, will inevitably be seen for what it is: artificial manipulation of the marketplace... &gt; Voodoo Economics won't work. I have to pay taxes to build roads and defend our oil supplies whether I drive or not.... Pretending that I somehow avoid those "hidden costs" by taking the bus is beneath stupid.  Uh, dude, your car use is massively *subsidized* by the government.  The level of government spending on cars and oil (and that would have to include a good fraction of the Iraq war) massively exceeds the amount spent on public transportation.
I can think of a very good reason to use a kernel debugger: When your machine crashes because of someone ELSE'S code. A debugger can help you trap the error without having to reboot.  Then you can find out what piece of code is dying because of the error, and backtrack to where the error arises. If you're using your machine and it just reboots, merely thinking about it is not going to help if it's in the 99.9% of code you didn't write and haven't even looked at yet.   
Stupid Cubs fans, it's not Dusty's fault. Here's what you do: 1) Stop buying tickets to see a terrible team. This sends the signal that you demand a winning team on the field. 2) Get a new GM, no, new owners. -- A Sox fan
Amen brother patriot.
Jesus did a Summer of Code stint.
...that's not possible. Getting an abortion requires being female.  Becoming a Mason requires being male. Actually, I guess you could get an abortion, a sex change, *then* join the Masons.
Yeah it's annoying as hell. I tried it awhile back over the java version. It's far to slow to be viable in speed chess. I can't believe Yahoo actually made it worse than it already was with all the stupid UCI plugin java bots. See this internet chess server comparison.  http://www.jimmyr.com/online_chess.php
You said: Forget for a second why God doesn't heal amputees, a far tougher question to face is this -- "why doesn't God heal me?" First off, thanks for giving me an answer. I appreciate it.  My response is that you're missing the teeth of the question. For any one particular case, it's easy to offer the explanation you do: "Maybe you weren't meant to have your prayer answered this time." But when you broaden the question and make it statistical, that's when it beomes meaningful. You change it from a question of individual destiny to a question about God's behavior towards a certain arbitrary subset of people. The class of amputees isn't going to be any different than the class of cancer patients or coma victims. So why are amputees excluded from the same kind of supernatural healing that many believe cancer patients and coma victims have been given? To be honest, I think it's an observation that makes a solid point, and the best Christian response is simply, "I don't know. You're right, amputees don't receive the same kind of supernatural healing, and it does seem unfair, and I really don't know why that is."  It's okay to say "I don't know why." But so many people refuse to acknowledge the point. They know that no matter how hard they pray, God will never cause a limb to be spontaneously regenerated, but they pretend not to know it. They come up with excuses, or alibis, or denials. None of these is an adequate response to the question.  Personally, I do find it to be a telling detail that certain kinds of injuries are never healed, ever, and that those kinds of injuries also happen to be the ones that we are least able to deceive ourselves about.  Having said that, I don't think the question alone is a faith-killer. You could very easily respond that much of what people believe is answered prayer is really just coincidence, and that the truly miraculous is also truly rare.  But you've gotta come up with something better than, "Sometimes God doesn't give you what you ask for." Because for amputations and many other types of injury, sometimes is never. And if some types of unavoidable injuries never get healed no matter how devout or pure or holy the prayers of the injured are, then that religion makes false promises, and isn't worth your faith.  
that's what we're doing
If you haven't heard of angela merkel you are a retard. Or at least you don't care about the ongoings of the rest of the world.
[Nein, George W. Bush is not a Nazi](http://reddit.com/info/d6hf/comments)
fuckit.. home schooling!
By your implied argument that would make C the end-all-be-all of programming languages. Do you really think that?
There are already populations that have been way more isolated for far longer than these guys, and we still consider them human. So it'll be a while -- though their controlled breeding program might really accelerate things. It depends; if they're actually breeding for any characteristics in particular, they might end up being a new species some time soon.
GM might have a hard time just dropping Buick &amp; Pontiac, but they could just quite updating those model lines -- in a few years they'd be unpopular enough that it wouldn't really matter if they "existed".
heh aren't these "red" states?  gotta love the get-r-done lovers
I love this one: "Wow that is amazing.I picked 3 cards at once didn't repeat it out loud and you were correct.passing this site on to my freinds. regards Cheryl U.K." So, this girl choose 3 cards, saw no one of those appeared on screen, and even this way, she didn't suspect a thing? Brilliant
...if you live in the US (BTW, I have, but I'm a geek)
youtube didn't embarrass them.. they simply provide a medium. the govt's embarrassed themselves on their own stupid, f'ing account.
&gt; I suspect Osama bin Laden's purpose in blowing up the twin towers wasn't to tear America apart, but to make us so paranoid that we tear ourselves apart. I think it was simply the most damaging attack possible within his comparatively limited means. I wouldn't argue against someone who claimed that the resulting paranoia will cost the US more than the original attacks, but if the default goal of war (destroy stuff and kill people) would have caused bin Laden to do exactly what he did, Occam's Razor suggests we don't need to attribute more subtle motivations to him as well.
interesting book:  nazi doctors provocitively, yet realistically stating, it can't be said that they didn't at least provide several scientifically weighted contributions to human science. 
Maybe because that is A LOT better than spending eternity being burned and tortured on hell... (because thats the alternative, right? "if you don't belive, then you are going to hell") think about that ;)
Freedoms always seem to become minor, unimportant freedoms just before we lose them, eh?
Whether or not you think we live in a police state depends much on which part of society you live in and have grown up in. If you're poor in this country, and/or have dark skin, and/or are an immigrant, then the police state is VERY real -- and not just in a subjective way. In a very concrete way that involves constant surveillance; police-on-citizen violence that is just frequent enough to maintain fear and resentment; and a series of bureaucratic/judicial mechanisms and horrid loopholes that doom anyone with the bad luck or poor judgment to get caught up in the system.
&gt; As is always the case, a comparison to Hitler is a gross exaggeration. I'd say it's an exaggeration, but not a gross one, and that makes the current situation remarkable.  We're not nearly so far down the Hitler road as Germany in 1932, but we're further down it than we've been in my (42 year) lifetime. I can't remember Supreme Court justices speaking out before about the excessive power of the executive branch, for example.  Supreme Court justices are usually pretty quiet.
blitzkrieg!
Hammy, I liked what you said. You should definitely try diplomacy first,middle and last.  unfortunately as you know this is not a perfectly sane world. The problem Israel has is pure hatred that's fueling from within the Palestinian and arab world.  The arab (non democratic) leaders use it as a uniting force to keep them in power.  I think the situation is much more complex that you could fix things only with diplomacy. I wish we could. And you have some points about the f15.  They put them up there to shoot down the plane in case it's aiming to a big city or a high rise...  Not escorting them would be a not so smart idea. 
I don't think he's saying it's strange because it emulates the real world, he's saying it's strange because, oh I dunno, _would somebody think of the children_?
I guess redditors think you should choose a pursuit in life based on it's pay.
two words:   "waaah waaaah"  it's the f'ing way it is today. live with it.  accept it.  stop bitching.   aint gonna change until the usa focuses on some other bullshit.. and drags the rest of the world with it.
Or you (may) have been living under a rock.
Ha ha.  Reminds me of the PerieAIR cans from Spaceballs.  =)
Linkjacked (and images stolen).  Here's the original story on MIT's site: http://reddit.com/info/fvyj/comments
See [here](http://arxiv.org/abs/hep-th/0608226) for the original paper and [here](http://motls.blogspot.com/2006/08/alain-connes-theory-of-everything.html) for a summary from LM. (I hope that LM forgives me for not asking his permission to site his summary).
There are degrees of "police state" and I would not say we yet live in a Stalinist society.  However, I would say we have lost major freedoms since the 1960s (and that's just the period I am personally familiar with, having been born in the mid-1950s).  The recent issues under the Bush administration are only the tip of the iceberg.  This process has been going on for a long time. Our 1st Amendment rights have been eroded since you can be locked up for telling people how to do various things (as [Dmitry Sklyarov](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dmitry_Sklyarov) was).  The government and business are collaborating to put the state over the people which is a dictionary definition of fascism (a police state). If you research the changes to search and seizure laws for example, you will see our 4th Amendment right is largely gone. I understand the argument used by the government but I maintain that being forced to provide biological samples is a violation of your 5th Amendment.  Not to mention, of course, that because of government pressure most people now have to take a drug test at work.  Another case of business/government collaboration. Also look into the principle of "civil forfeiture" ([this site](http://www.fear.org/) may be a good starting point) you will see the government can appropriate your assets with no recourse to you in a way that is certainly in agreement with the spirit of a police state. Sentencing someone to 20 years for possession of a single joint qualifies as "cruel and unusual" so there goes the 8th Amendment.  Civil forfeiture is probably also a violation of the 8th Amendment since they can take 100% of your assets regardless of how minor the offense may have been.  [Here](http://www.thenewspaper.com/news/12/1227.asp) is a related example where the police have been given the right to extort money from motorists in Florida. We have also lost our reasonable expectation of privacy.  It may be that loss is the result of purely technical reasons but it is a lost freedom nonetheless and the government has not sought to protect that freedom. Finally, the 9th and the 10th Amendments are routinely disregarded by the government. In closing, I would say a good starting point are [the books](http://amazon.com/s/ref=nb_ss_gw/102-1345857-1514510?url=search-alias%3Daps&amp;field-keywords=%22andrew+p.+napolitano%22) by [Judge Andrew P. Napolitano](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Andrew_Napolitano).  Don't be put off by his appearances on Fox (if you would be), his books are very good. Oh, I would like to add one thing: I worked for an international company that went into the former Soviet republics soon after the collapse of the USSR.  I found from talking to Russians, Bulgarians, and Romanians that Orwell's *Nineteen Eighty-Four* is considered by those people to be an excellent view into what it was like in the USSR. No one could trust anyone.  Husbands turned in their wives, children turned in their parents.  The laws were so convoluted that anyone could be arrested at anytime on the merest pretext. The result was not only an on-going state of fear but an utter disregard for the law in general.  The attitude was "the world is corrupt; I have to be corrupt just to survive and who the hell cares anyway?". I have seen a lot of that sort of attitude develop here over the past 40 years or so.  Not to the same degree but the trend is clear and in the wrong direction. *This is not my most coherent post but I am tired and this is a subject that gets my thoughts far ahead of my fingers.*
I am trying to understand how the part-time opening of a border crossing equates to the terrorists' original demands to 'release all Muslims captured by Israel or the U.S.' Opening a border crossing was never a demand made by the captors. Your just another liberal partisan hack. That's cool though, the world needs people like you to remind the rest of us why we continue to fight: So you can go on having the FREE SPEECH to make such scurrilous accusations against the only real pluralistic nation on the planet.
I think perhaps you are a repulitard, only republitards tend to say things like that... Sticks and stones, bitch!
“Senator Byrd wanted time to read the legislation, understand its implications, and see whether the proposal could be improved,” Gavin said.  Yeah right. Stevens apparently wanted more time to perform a "cost-benefit analysis." Seems that having the light of truth turned on made them all forget about their little grievances and run for cover underneath the fridge with the rest of the cockroaches. I would love to read more stories like this!
housetier hates myspace
Hongfujin Precision Industry Co. -- parent company of Foxconn -- has been told to allow workers to set up a state-sponsored union (although, the reports don't say by whom Foxconn has been told).This is a pretty empty victory (if you can even call it that). Chinese workers aren't allowed true trade unions as we know in the west.
There are absolutes in the world. There is a "right" and a "wrong" and the fact that you and Olberman can't see that just proves that the real lunatics are YOU! I shudder to imagine a world where blowing yourself up in a crowded market is on moral ground with assassinating the leader of Hamas. I know you are saying to yourself, "Those 2 examples are morally equivalent". And that is damned scary in and of itself. But just like those that appeased Hitler, you will be proven wrong.
And related: http://www.damninteresting.com/?p=447  http://www.visionandpsychosis.net/what_is_Subliminal_peripheral_vision_psycho.htm Very interesting! can anyone provide more details?
I've had it with these mother#$%^!n' experts denying that there're mother#$%^!n' security holes on mother#$%^!n' Museum!
You can also just be eccentric by the standards of the police and be harassed in a big way. My friends and rode motorcycles as teenagers and the local police didn't like that.  We were repeatedly pulled over to make sure our bikes weren't "stolen" (sometimes checked more than once a day) and they would park on the street in front of our houses at night and shine the spotlight in our windows. We were not "gang members" (this was in the 1970s when modern gangs weren't widespread), we weren't into drugs, and we sure weren't outlaw bikers - we were highschool kids.  We didn't do more to deserve this sort of harassment than to get a minor speeding ticket every once in a while (which we probably wouldn't have gotten except for the harassment). Things have gotten a lot worse since then.  Of course, now that I am an ugly middle-aged guy in a minivan I get smiles from cops but I remember what is behind the smile.
wow, what an amazing array of rigorous logical arguments to verify the *existence* of what is essentially *defined* as unverifiable! 
dang it was a win-win situation for the terrorists!
dang! it was a win-win situation for the terrorists!
You'd be surprised. As a magician I've noticed that, assuming they don't figure it out immediately, many engineers, physicists, etc. tend to be far more baffled by a simple magic trick than other "normal" people.
Whoever made that site needs to find a good doctor. It's a load of crap.
This article grossly oversimplifies and at times flatly mistates the consequences of Goedel's work.  It may be difficult to present the incompleteness theorems as popular mathematics, but it's unethical to muddle the facts just because your intended audience can't tell the difference.  To be fair, perhaps this author is vindicated by his own ignorance. For instance, the Halting Problem implies a weaker statement of the First Incompleteness Theorem.  Not the other way around (as the article claims).  [Reference](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Halting_problem#Relationship_with_G.C3.B6del.27s_incompleteness_theorem). There's no sign anywhere in the article that the author comprehends why Number Theory is susceptible to the incompleteness theorems (hint: not every formal system is!). And if you're at all familiar with Goedel's work (e.g., if you even began to read [*Goedel, Escher, Bach*](http://www.amazon.com/G%f6del-Escher-Bach-Eternal-Golden/dp/0465026567/sr=8-1/qid=1157086652/ref=pd_bbs_1/104-4284050-3435159?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books)), the following condemnation of the article should be more than enough to persuade you it isn't worth your time: never once does the author mention Russel and Whitehead's *Principia Mathematica* -- the would-be mathematical opus whose hopes were dashed by Goedel in 1931. WTF Sounds like the author could use a dose of [this](http://www.amazon.com/Godels-Theorem-Incomplete-Guide-Abuse/dp/1568812388/sr=1-1/qid=1157086819/ref=pd_bbs_1/104-4284050-3435159?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books). A much more careful (and readable!) treatment (which also includes a bit about ol' Albert) can be found [here](http://www.newyorker.com/critics/content/articles/050228crat_atlarge).
housetier hasst die GEZ
Once again the word 'terrorist' is bandied around willy-nilly. Strictly speaking they are 'kidnappers'.
If people really thought about depreciation they would crap in their pants.  Consider that a car reaches a rock bottom value of a few hundred dollars (near enough to $0) once it has 120,000 miles on it. Take $30,000 as the new price and divide by 120,000 miles.  You can see that the car loses $0.25/mile driven!  If you pay $3.00/gallon for gas and you get 20 mpg then your gasoline bill is only $0.15/mile which is only 60% of the depreciation cost. Add to these figures the cost of maintenance, parking, insurance, etc. and a car is very, **very** expensive to operate.
if you're afraid of white people in historically white countries, feel free to get the fuck out! :) i'm sure it's nice this time of year in Zimbabwe, Iran, and China.
This is *old*. That particular gaffe happened when Columbia broke up on re-entry. I laughed a little bit at that, as depressing as the whole thing was.
How can you justify war in the middle east if you go round telling everyone that that's where all the terrorsist are, and that the logical assumption is if all the terror is there then all the terrorists must be middle eastern! Like duh. 
Brings new meaning to "WWJD?"
Truu. What I would really like to know at which point they turned the imperial mode on and started extorting countries and bombing people? It's really sick how the US pumps rice and other agricultural products to developing countries just enough to keep the local economy and agriculture out of competition and thus stops the development. Also the armtwisting in policies over abortion, HIV meds etc. No money for you unless you do as we tell you! They have become Rome in their minds. You think Bush can play the fiddle?
&gt; They put them up there to shoot down the plane in case it's aiming to a big city or a high rise...  Which never happens with iPods left in toilets, people peeing on the floor, etc.  Chance of non-event causing the plane to crash: 0% Chance of F-15 shooting plane down due to accident, miscommunication, commercial plane radio failure, jumpy pilot/air marshall panicking due to dark-skinned people playing with their cell phones and radioing in an emergency, etc: more than 0% 
surprise surprise!
&gt; I call Bullshit. If the kid had a t-shirt of an aborted fetus it would have been ruled 'distractive' just like this boy's shirt, yet I highly doubt the court would have upheld his "first amendment rights". I think you're wrong about that. &gt; In my highschool any shirt that offended anyone was not to be worn for the simple fact that it distracts people from the primary reason for going to highschool (learning, remember?) and it tends to start fights. Ask yourself this: what, exactly, are kids supposed to be learning in high school (or any other school, for that matter)? Most people would agree that, apart from the obvious subjects taught as part of the official curriculum, an important part of school is learning to socialize with your peers in a mixed public setting. If that is not accomplished in adolescence to at least *some* degree, then students go into the world -- to college and/or the workforce -- woefully unprepared for what they will face. It's easy to get along with other people, and focus on what you're doing, if they all behave according to your rules. But if you are unable to do your job because Bob is wearing an offensive shirt, or Mary has a miniskirt on today, you're probably not going to have that job for very long. So, yes, there is a risk that a shirt like this might distract students from their studies, or start a fight. Just like there's a risk that a tough lesson plan might go over a student's head. And it's the teachers' and administrators' jobs to help students deal with those problems, by helping them with the tough lesson or teaching them to ignore the t-shirt (or at least not hit the guy wearing it) and focus on their work. Or, you know, we could just give them A's no matter what, and protect them from anything that might distract them in the slightest way. And wish them luck when we send them off into the world.
Scientists watch supernova in real-time.
You are such a dumb fucking cunt. You can't prevent yourself from spewing your shit all over Reddit let alone getting together with all your dumb fucking cunt racist buddies to stop a terror attack. Your armchair fox-schlepping ignorance is holding the true America back. As a nation the uS has fought for freedom and racial equality and cunts like you want to turn back the clock. Can you squeal like a pig boy? 
Amazingly relevant for most of the wars today
Hail Satan!
If you have a Jewish hertiage, it doesn't matter what you believe, god-wise.  You still have a better chance than the general public of being a carrier for Tay-Sachs because your (not so long ago) ancestors did believe and needed to marry someone else who believed.  And those people were scarce because of the diaspora, so they married other Jews and likely had a common relative somewhere up the line, closer to the present than two people of different religions would have that common relative.  Because, if you go back far enough, we all have relatives in common.
Pretty nice in China today. No fat ignorant fuckwits around. I could walk down a street and see thousands of people who are a) classically educated b) proud of their history and culture c) can drive around with their car doors unlocked d) substantially better off under a communist regime than they were under a corrupt KMT extension of feudalism e) not hated by pretty much the whole world f) mainly concerned with their own business. The list goes on. Get a passport dickhead. 
Mohammedans?  What statement are you trying to make ?
I'm sorry I didn't realize that I couldn't evaluate your beliefs.  Would you like a hug? Listen, your responses involved actual attacks on me, personally.  That is literally the definition of "ad hominem": attacking me ("dumbass") instead of what I'm actually saying.  You can try to redefine "ad hominem", but it is what it is, and you did the name-calling. As for the "inability" of government to protect or defend citizens in the event of a disaster, I'm sure you won't call 911 ever.  Have fun. (I mean, do you have the least evidence for that statement, or is it just ideology?) As far as your comments re: social programs, I appreciate your sympathy for my ignorance, lack of education, lack of information, lies, destructive recitation of facts, and general sadness.  However, if you're interested in debating whether or not various social programs were created solely to garner votes, or motivated by a genuine interest in increasing the wellbeing of other people, without attacking me personally, I'm more than willing to engage you.
You Israel hating anti-semite, how dare you!
It's really good idea!!!
Ну так иностраннцы уже и так знают этот саит!
You've made your point. Clearly we disagree, and that is fine.
Amazing adventures of two "roving reporters" who go off on a digital walk of Japan. Covers the adventures of the road. Some really wild stories.
http://www.click2houston.com/automotive/9141773/detail.html
Oh - stupid fucking cunt again.
ohhhh got em!!
Downmodded to -21? ??
Well spoken, Mr. Olbermann, bravo!
I'll start out by saying I support the legalization of marijuana. However, I do agree that toking up isn't completely harmless as many people believe. I've noticed that pot can bring out the effects of underlying mental problems in certain people. Also, frequent use can lead to dependence, toleration, and withdrawl symptoms. And as much as I'd like to deny it, pot can be a gateway drug. That said, I don't personally believe smoking cannabis every once in a while is going to send you to the looney bin. There are thousands of intellegent people who have smoked responsibly for years, with no apparent health hazards. In my opinion, alcohol and tobacco have been far more damaging to our society than pot ever was.
Oh diddums.
Hm, number 5 is dangerously low on the ladder; I'd better avoid flying there, I guess.
No, they'll just make people take off their shoes before they enter the tower.
The first two minutes are kind of slow.  Stick with it. Friggin hilarious!
True, true... if only they understood the concept of lining up (or queueing if you prefer) it'd be a perfect place.
What's the story with the assymetry in buildings nowadays? Is it supposed to be "modern" and cool? Looking at the pictures in your middle link, I kinda like the Empire State building the best. It's *strong* looking, not affraid of its height. The other ones look like the arbitrary whim of an architect trying to look "deep", including the Sears tower and Dubai's new behemoth.
Wow, looks like a lot of reddit people are desperate to be pc.
It's called literacy. You should try it.
Americans consume like no other nation -- using three times the amount of water per capita than the world average and nearly 25 percent of the world's energy, despite having 5 percent of the global population; and producing five times more daily waste than the average in poor countries." No wonder they are such fatties. Fat, fat fatties! Who produce loads of waste! I'm not usre that as much waste comes out their bums as out their mouths but who knows? 
I have a pass for the Short Bus. 
While I can't argue with the plutacracy bit, [democracy](http://wordnet.princeton.edu/perl/webwn?s=democracy) and republic are not mutually exclusive systems. Democracy doesn't mean everybody gets to vote on everything. The U.S. is a representative democracy structured as a federated republic. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Democracy_(varieties) 
&gt; Clearly we disagree, and that is fine. No it isn't. 
Great stuff...I've heard quite a few of those lines before, and even used one or two myself.
&gt; I'm not saying it would be bad to tell them what we believe is happening to them and suggest alternatives, but any coercison would be, IMHO, eugenic. How's this for coercion: [CNN.com - Reluctant child bride was warned she'd lose 'salvation' - Aug 31, 2006](http://reddit.com/info/futl/comments)
just remember that this video is also part of His plan
Steroids huh?
We can do something about it here. In fact, because we DO do something about it here, you can make the claim that other places do it far more.  Let's keep it up. 
the CN Tower is 553 metres tall (or about 1815 feet), which makes it significantly taller than any of the other buildings discussed.  However, it is often discounted because it's not an "office" building, but is, instead, a tower. The Dubai building will be taller when it is completed... but until then, the CN Tower remains the world's tallest free-standing structure.
Let me check my handbook... 
Monkeys.  They're pretty funny. Oh, and midgets.
Walking on Water needs to be a system requirement.
doesn't anyone agree with me?
No wonder they had problems.  I don't think it was rated past 12 parsecs. I suppose they meant "sound" instead of "light". 
Iron critical to ocean productivity, carbon uptake
It's worse to kill your healthy dog, and a cow feels more than the 18 day fetus.
&gt; I love it when non christians tell us what our religion says. As stated elsewhere, many non-Christians, especially in the U.S. are quite familiar with the Bible.  In the case of Atheists, more so than the average Christian in many cases. &gt; Christian's aren't bound to the mosaic law. The old testament implies that the coming of Jesus will not change the law: &gt; Ezek 37:24 - And David my servant(the Christ/Messiah) shall be king over them; and they all shall have one shepherd: they shall also walk in my judgments, and observe my statutes, and do them. And the new testament says that the coming of Jesus did not change the law: &gt; Matt 5:18-19 - For verily I say unto you, Till heaven and earth pass, one jot or one tittle shall in no wise pass from the law, till all be fulfilled. All God's laws are perfect (Psa 19:7), last forever (Psa 119:152), and are eternal (Psa 119:160). Christians follow the teachings of Paul, not those of Jesus. Paul effectively canceled God's laws for Christians, he's the one who declared that God's Law was canceled by the sacrifice of Jesus.  This was to attract more followers to his new religion, and it directly contradicts Jesus. There are no more than a few hundred real Christians today, and they are considered complete whackos by the mainstream "Christians."  Those in that mainstream are followers of Paul or so un-religious in their behavior as to be effectively unaffiliated, regardless of their automatic inheritance of their parent's faith. 
That mini isn't going to fit in any cars -- it's sized for a yacht. The micro is actually less efficient than a small otto cycle engine and much much less efficient than a diesel. Conventional airfoil impeller gas turbines have a hard time scalling _down_. Perhaps we should be looking at [tesla's varient](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tesla_turbine) for small scale gas turbines. 
Directed towards real estate agents, but applicable across the board.
Perform a public service; vote to legalize cannabis.
Yes, I do think we're living in a police state: http://www.cato.org/raidmap/
so you'll never forget!  Never!  We will never forget those who died!  All of them, over 3000 of them.  What?  Who?  over 100,000 dead in Iraq?!  Shut up!  I will never forget those who died on 9/11.  Never.  I cry and weep for them always.  Katrina?  Who?  What?  Fuck off!  I will never forget.  9/11.  We will never forget...  Protect us George, protect us great one.
The best way to deal with a troll is to ignore it.
really? is that a threat hammy?  do you insist i agree?
lol, ok bro, or sis, go and do something if you care so much.  messages on reddit.com are clearly below your moral sense.
Those who've pushed this case forward should be honored as citizens.
My argument is that if you're afraid of dying in a terrorist incident, you've got better odds of doing it at the hands of an Islamic terrorist in our modern world than any other type of person.  Hence, from a purely numbers game, it's a good idea to do racial profiling, especially in airports. My second argument, which you (and, apparently, everyone else) have ignored, is that it's not a purely numbers game.  There's right and wrong at play too.
This has been done by multiple authors around the net.  The earliest I know of from my research is the [Cave of Magic](http://www.caveofmagic.com/).  Note the similarities with Pickover's site; none of these folks ripping each other off can be bothered to give any credit to those that came before, so it's always hard to tell who the original author was. It's a great trick, though.   
&gt; the only real pluralistic nation on the planet. Canada?
yeah, you would think that he would try and test it himself first, before demonstrating it in front of his congregation
:)
You sure do like to flood reddit with links to your own sites full of linkjacked shit.  Good job.
I'll take a language with more features over small and useless  (aka "scripting") language all the time.
&gt; Oh and I know [Paul told you](http://www.paulgraham.com/avg.html) that he made his app in Lisp and then he made millions of dollars because he made his app in Lisp, but honestly only [two people](http://www.reddit.com/) ever believed him and, a complete rewrite later, they won't make that mistake again. Ouch!
only the japs could do it!
So, Hitler lost an election and became a dictator because of that? (I thought he became a dictator because he was a disturbed and crazy person, but whatever) Well, I advice you Americans to not vote for Kerry or Gore in the next elections - who knows what they can come up with...
In other words, NOT the speech he gave.
no comments
Again, how is this a discussion?  You again attack Olberman and now myself providing only name calling and grandstanding.  Where is your argument or rebuttal?  Yet again, in a pathetic display, you have easily proven Olberman's point for him!
That worked so well for the [Bonus Marchers](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bonus_Army) that I think you should try it.
can't you just send a check to the artist and just download the song.  sure it wouldn't be the most legal...but at least the artist is getting paid.
one thing common in all of the worst professors... they never give any sympathy
Yes, and when the PHP/Apache combo started out way back when, people were saying stuff like "perl/Apache - like so many unfashionable things, it just works." But, the PHP guys stuck with it and PHP/Apache started working... ;-)   
omg  So what is the secret: I know it isn't optical scanners; I tested for that, by choosing from an oblique angle
&gt; really? is that a threat hammy? do you insist i agree? Clearly unfamiliar with Monty Python.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Argument_Skit
The point is that coercion is responsible for the reverse-eugenics in the first place. 
There's a fine line between sarcasm and cynism. Cynics are boring me to pieces - all they're saying is: I'm an intellectual - therefore I can't stand the world.
Unconfirmed and speculative journalism rocks!
Thank you, I love cookies.
d
Wonder if rush would object if I said Ditto ?
But who's counting?
Alexa Rank è stato aggiornato dopo alcuni giorni di instabilità
Why do the leftofascists have such a hard on for the terrorist organization Hezbollah? Isreal is only defending its own territory.
What are these big enterprisey things everyone supposedly builds in the oh so serious world where people get fired?   I contend that _most_ "enterprise apps" actually have fairly insignificant scaling issues.  In fact most of them are just IT drones formally replacing adhoc balls of mud built by amateurs out of access, excel, email, and spit.  If they get used by more than a few hundred people they're a big adoption success. Certainly there are large complicated mission critical systems which have to reliably munch shit loads of data and deliver it to thousands or millions of people.  But they're a lot rarer than then the enterprisey folks think. 
Lakehead is in *Thunder Bay* for chrissakes. Have you ever been to Thunder Bay? And does it really matter if it was established '8 years later'? I had to laugh at the SU president's comment. Maybe I'm painfully ignorant, but I did my Master's at Waterloo, and have never heard of Lakehead. So in my mind, more or less anything that gets them on the map is good. The main goal is probably to retain some of the better students in the area, who are thinking of going to more of a 'name' school in the area, like Waterloo, Toronto, or McGill. In general, in Canada, school's reputations don't have quite the weight they do in the US, although I think that's changing, unfortunately. Gah. It's just not a big deal.
Quite right.  Though "Senator Byrd wanted time to read the legislation":  I've seen him and Particularly Stevens speak and I'd be interested to know how literate they are.  Though to be fair he does support Stem Cell research. I hope he has a better grasp of how those tubes work.   
The first time I tried it I wanted to see how I can get from downtown Portland to  Vancouver using public transportation. I know C-TRAN buses go there but their website leaves much to be desired. It told me to go to the airport, then walk an hour over the Columbia River.
&gt;Last summer when we had a group of interns build Copilot , we had to decide what language to use for new code. I know that typically on new projects there's a long evaluation period where you decide what technology to use, along with lots of debates that include some crazy person actually wasting quite a lot of time evaluating Squeak and Lisp and  OCaml  and lots of other languages which are totally, truly brilliant programming languages worthy of great praise, but just don't have the gigantic ecosystem you need around them if you want to develop web software. These debates are enormously fun and a total and utter waste of time, because the bottom line is that there are three and a half platforms (C#, Java, PHP, and a half Python) that are all equally likely to make you successful, an infinity of platforms where you're pretty much guaranteed to fail spectacularly when it's too late to change anything (Lisp, ISAPI DLLs written in C, Perl), and a handful of platforms where The Jury Is Not In, So Why Take The Risk When Your Job Is On The Line? (Ruby on Rails).   Ok, intresting... &gt;Finally -- as to what we use -- Copilot is C# and ASP.Net, as I mentioned, although the Windows client is written in C++. Our older in-house code is VBScript and our newer in-house code is C#. FogBugz is written in Wasabi, a very advanced, functional-programming dialect of Basic with closures and lambdas and Rails-like active records that can be compiled down to VBScript, JavaScript, PHP4 or PHP5. Wasabi is a private, in-house language written by one of our best developers that is optimized specifically for developing FogBugz; the Wasabi compiler itself is written in C#. Damn, at least listen to your own advice Joel.   
The supporting evidence is absurd. The tool who came up with that page includes the patriots behind the Boston Tea Party in a list of terrorists.  How many people were killed at the Boston Tea Party?  Zero. None.  0  How many were injured?  None. So why the heck would you include that in a list of terrorism? A non violent protest from *1773* makes it on the list because the moron who came up with it wants to slur America and figures mindless parrots won't even check. There is not one death in the last six years.  Not one death at an airport or on an airplane or on a train or even in one of the major American cities.  The list includes people who haven't killed anyone as well as radicals from the 60's. Pathetic that this b.s. made it to the #1 spot of Reddit.    
One fairly humongous drawback of C# is that it only runs on windows. Last time I looked at the stats, most web servers were running some kind of UNIX.
Mono runs just fine on Linux and a variety of other platforms.
To be honest I expected to see a picture of G. W. Bush.
Mono is a workaround.
That's how I realised that CNN had to be mistaken.
Inconvenient girls are aborted to make way for the one boy allowed per family.  Falun gong gets persecuted and people who want to use the internet get the Red China version or face jail.  Mobile execution buses bring death to the villages.   China supports the North Korean regime and sells weapons to Iran knowing they'll disseminate them to terrorists. The people of China are fine, the government is morally bankrupt and brutally oppressive.  If cameras weren't rolling the heroic man in Tiananmen Square would have been crushed.
The best source I've found is [here](http://www.ipcc.ch/pub/un/syreng/wg1spm.pdf) Of course, the case is much more clear cut for ID. It's completely bogus science which goes against most of what is known in biology, and the rest of science. The TO website has it easier. Climate science is fuzzier, and often the issues are more the interpretation of the facts, rather than the facts themselves. Oversimplified, ID is about lying, global warming denial is more obfuscation. I think the whole tobacco industry's "smoking isn't addictive or bad for you" action is a better metaphor. ("Carbon dioxide: they call it pollution, we call it life") It all wouldn't matter much if the stakes weren't so high. If ID folk get their way, well, science in the US takes a nosedive. If the current global warming consensus is correct, and nothing is done against it, the world-wide damage will probably be very serious.
In Eastern Europe, lot of people use mass transit.  The reason ? Few have a car .
The Saddam fanboy who just moved here from Iraq in the last two years who is enjoying his 15 over being give a free t-shirt.  He shouldn't have been issued a visa, but maybe that will get rectified soon.
Fickle crowd, also the answer is listed several times in this thread in which your's is quite near the bottom. I don't believe people bother checking timestamps so you are knee-jerk downmodded for stating the obvious. Yes it's silly.
I wonder what their bathrooms look like.
&gt; What are these big enterprisey things everyone supposedly builds in the oh so serious world where people get fired? Try building a ticket vending software (I have). Try situations where there are suddenly 100k people on the system at the same second when popular concert sales begin. When you have solved that, connect the system to existing accounting database and reporting software. I'm not trying to say that ROR does not scale with some workarounds but it sure is easier to do scalable things with scalable frameworks that are designed to be also used with legacy databases. I would not yet use ruby on rails with massive enterprise software because I don't think that is what ROR developers had in mind. And this is not to say that ROR doesn't have its own sweet spot but at the moment at least it is not massive systems that have to connect to legacy databases.
&gt;David "The Mastermind" Toska Well his name is a bit of a giveaway.
Java is better :)
But really funny!
How dismissive of years of hard work that you can download and use absolutely free...  Beyond that, it's pretty good technology in a lot of ways.  What other free software language has a JIT?  I guess I'm biased because I know one of the core guys, Paolo Molaro, and how much effort he's put into it.
that is one cool looking little gadget (although my experience with sony devices was terrible until today)
so the klan is a terrorist organization? I'm against racial profiling but that's not the best example.
Depends on how far you look back...
Yet another aggregator like popurl or digg view 
So you need to use safe enterprisey stuff like C# and Java to build a product, except when your biggest seller is called FogBugz beacuse then you're supposed to develop an entire fricking programming language to do it? And a programming language developed in house is of course just as stable and enterprisey as the major frameworks tested and debugged by thousands of developers? Yeah that makes total sense. edit:spelling
I just recently found out Linus lives in my neighborhood. I totally need to befriend him so I can legitimately wear one of those "Linus is my homeboy" t-shirts.
I work at a company that creates software for hospitals, so I've seen a lot of these "enterprise" systems and most of them are total crap. They all lack a decent UI, and have horrible performance since they spent all their time worrying about using a framework that scaled instead of actually measuring performance of the product and optimizing for the actual workload. As if that wasn't enough they usually don't make life any easier for the users since they spent all their time ensuring they were "enterprise ready" instead of spending time with the users and figuring out what they actually need. Even in the extremely enterprisey world of medical informatics, where things are so enterprisey that if you get it wrong *someone could die* (bet that doesn't happen often with most web apps), what language the programmers use is almost completely insignificant.
His job is to teach you something not to be your nanny. The "real" world can/is a no sympathy place, at least in buissness, so the sooner you adapt to this, the better off you'll be. Some of the best teachers I've had were like this. They loved their work and they instilled the same love for it into us, but they never would compromise when it came to being fair : a D was a D, an A an A and an F an F.
A linguistic anthropologist is still a geek. It is exceedingly difficult to have any technical conversation, let alone one as  abstract as this, with a non-geek woman as most of them could not give a shit about the subject matter and would cut you off immediately.
I'll agree with that, but the important point from the grandparent post to take home is the last sentence: "But they're a lot rarer than the enterprisey folks think." So yes, you're right... Ruby on Rails is not right for that 0.1% of applications that you're talking about.
Three people. *puts his hand in the air*
If it's legalized, kids will smoke pot to conceal the fact that they smoke tobacco. :D
This is the *worst* article I've ever seen reach #1 on Reddit.  The title is wrong.  The picture is of a dead man.  The picture is of what a terrorist looked like **11 years ago.**  The list of evidence is absurd.  The Boston Tea Party took place in 1773.  Nobody was hurt or injured.  It was a peaceful protest of British tax policy by American patriots. The list includes McVeigh and Nichols, but places Nichols later to make it seem like they are connected to separate acts of terrorism.  They were both found guilty for their roles in the OKC Bombing which killed 168 lives and probably involved other perpetrators. Al-Hussaini Hussani, an Iraqi national, was with McVeigh in the Ryder truck at one point.    Eric Rudolph killed three people.  The Unabomber killed three people.  Killen was just convicted of manslaughter for the deaths of three in 1964. Clayton Waagner never killed anyone.  Rollen Stewart never killed anyone.  Metesky never killed anyone and was found insane in 1957. David Lane, in prison for life, didn't kill anyone but played a role in the death of Alan Berg. James Charles Kopp killed one person, an abortionist. Luke Helder was the college musician who tried to make a smiley face with pipe bombings, never hurt or killed anyone.  Byron De La Beckwith killed Medgar Evers in 1963. Michael Bray bombed abortion clinics, didn't kill or injure anybody.   The groups mentioned are the Army of God (members already mentioned earlier in the list), the Ku Klux Klan, and the Weathermen, a 60's leftist radical group. The list ends with the patriots who didn't harm anyone when staging the Boston Tea Party. It's almost as if this page is a clever joke to expose the idiocy of the gullible. All the deaths on this list combined don't add up to 200.  Not a single death in this century and this is supposed to tell us what terrorists look like?   Reddit has jumped the shark with this.
Студия ДУЛАНДИ - - предлагает полный сервис по разработке сайтов, продвижение, создание сайтов в Москве, разработка сайтов, веб-дизайн сайтов, создание сайтов, раскрутка сайтов.  г. Москва, ул. Радио, д. 20 (м. Бауманская) (495) 518-47-26Создание сайтов в Москве, разработка сайтов, веб-дизайн сайтов, создание сhttp://www.dulandi.comайтов, раскрутка сайтов.
To add some data points: when I lived in Vancouver, I only took the bus to go downtown, because there driving and parking were a nightmare. Busing however, sucked, mainly because it was unpredictable, not faster than driving, and often uncomfortable (no place to sit, freaky people, hot &amp; sticky, whatever). I would have liked to bus more, but I worked late, and a bus coming as 10:13 and 10:38 (and then not coming at those times) just didn't cut it. In Munich (a *smaller*, although probably denser city) they have lots of bike lanes, special lanes for buses, the subways come every 10 minutes (every 5 during peak hours) and run until around 2am. I take my bike to work, and public transport into town, almost exclusively. They also have group tickets, so if a family or 5 friends are traveling together, there are signficant discounts. I only drive when I'm going further out (e.g. to the mountains) or carrying something heavy. Oh yeah -- parking in the city is a *bitch*. That said, a ticket costs a fair bit, but there are also discounts for students, seniors, unemployed etc. It's pretty awesome. I think it costs (the city and users) a fair bit, but it also boosts the quality of life immensely. And this is a city with around a million people. My impression is, in North American cities, they are unwilling to invest in the infrastructure to make public transit (and biking) more attractive. But they will build overpasses and parking all over the place. It's a little sad.
I wonder where he's going to get Wasabi programmers?
Self-sealing doctrine. "If baba did not heal you, it's your faith that must be lacking". 
He didn't dismiss any of the work put into it. Mono itself might be sturdy as a ziggurat, but remains problematic because it has been built on the lip of an active volcano.
Dude, have you ever actually tried to explain this kind of thing to someone who is on the brink of computer illiteracy?  It took me months to explain to my fiancee, satisfactorily, that I develop web applications... Of course, that could be because I spoke primarily in abbreviations.
&gt;At the risk of belaboring the obvious, almost 70 percent of the German people voted against Hitler And how does the author conclude this, he simply adds up the percentages for the three other candidates and subtracts that from %100.  This is a good example of the "you're either with us or against us" thinking that most of you decry whenever Bush says anything like it. In this case it's plain wrong.  There were three choices other than Hitler.  If people were simply voting against Hitler then they would not have bothered voting for anyone other than Hitler's main rival.  As the results indicate, some people were voting *for* people other than Hitler, as opposed to simpling voting against Adolph.
I guess those Orbitz guys are all retards, then
Yes nemo, but the truth is that google is going to steal the audience from gutenberg.org which has been putting out-of-copyright books, music and other stuff online since before google even existed. I'm really beginning to hate google: they're just another bunch of freaking megalomaniacs.
Monty Python?
Japan?
By all rights, that article should dissapear into a puff of logic.
And System.Collections.Generic, so you also have List&lt;T&gt;, IList&lt;T&gt;, IEnumerable&lt;T&gt; and co, and you also have arrays, T[].  Given an API that returns/accepts a list of strings, you might have to handle string[], IList&lt;String&gt;, ArrayList, IEnumerable, IEnumerable&lt;string&gt; depending on the age of the API and the whim of the designer.   This is one reason the code I wrote was longer - string.Join takes a 'string[]' as its second parameters, not an 'IEnumerable&lt;string&gt;' which would have been much better, so I had to add '.ToArray()'.  If I had been using an ArrayList, the conversion would have been even nastier: '(string[])foo.ToArray(typeof(string));'.  In Python and Haskell, you tend to just have lists for most of these (or in Python, things that look enough like lists that you don't care).
The comment about the most powerfull woman in the world (Angela Merkel) is ridiculous. To imply the government of Schröder was anti market is just plain wrong and Angela Merkels approval ratings match that of Bush.
They don't.  They dislike Israel, not like Hezbollah, and the reason is _because_ Israel is not a terrorist organisation like Hezbollah _and yet still manages to act worse than if it were on occassion._ Yes, compared against a terrorist organisation that targets civilians, Israel isn't that bad, but why the hell can we even make that comparison for a prosperous, modern country like it?  If the US was funding and arming Hezbollah rather than Israel, the left would be even more critical of Hezbollah - the fact is we expect _more_ from our allies.
precisely we all are in the same boat.
That is a reasonable worry, I think, but "it's a workaround"  sounds very dismissive to me.  Companies have successfully used Mono to move to Linux from Windows for their web stuff. To tell the truth, I'm not really that excited about Mono, and don't even use it, but I have a lot of respect for the work that has been put into it.
To scare you into giving up your freedoms and supporting unjust wars of course
For values of "currently" that match 1999, that is.
So what would that make the US? Evil'r still?
just my humble opinion but I consider "enterprise" software to mean software that is used inside a large enterprise usually with legacy systems so my definition might be different than his.
This is indeed what most Palestinians do, they fly out of Egypt or Jordan. That is if they can get issued a passport by the occupation authorities...
When he's interviewing them he says "Whazzup?" and if they answer "Wasabi!!!" they get the job. Easy.
Wow, nothing like a good language war to liven up a friday! My thoughts: I guess he's right if you are really working on something that is just "keeping up with the joneses", and there is more downside to failure than upside to success, so playing it safe is your best bet. However... that's not much fun, and I'd certainly rather be spending my time with something like rails that makes programming enjoyable, and significantly faster than in a clunky java environment.
Hey remember when this was the top story yesterday, before somebody stole it from Crooks and Liars and put it on YouTube? Yeah, those were the good ol' days. Yesterday.
His stated objective was to turn the US into a 'shadow of itself', which, given the current paranoia, national security nonsense, department of homeland security and infringement of constitutional rights, is a homer.
And has been ever since ancient Rome.
spam!
Spam!
You're a spammer!
You're a spammer!
Fucking fuck, spammer!
Spammer!
I'd argue your last point. With a debugger, I can more quickly see where that null pointer is being passed in from. I can probably even set a breakpoint for exactly that case. Then I fix the problem. Easier means more likely to occur. If I can't narrow down why it's happening, I may give up and put the band-aid on. It may turn out that passing in a null is reasonable and the band-aid is the right thing. It's tougher for me to know, which is bad. Maybe it's a meta-thing. Since apparently there *are* debuggers, they're just not delivered with the kernel, it's filtering out more on people who have the initiative and will to install their own. But he doesn't want to give that away.  Yeah, that's the ticket.
Spammer!
Does inbreeding explain why such a small segment of the Earth's population has so many geniuses?    At least 171 Jews and persons of half-Jewish ancestry have been awarded the Nobel Prize,1 accounting for 23% of all individual recipients worldwide between 1901 and 2005, and constituting 37% of all US recipients2 during the same period.  In the scientific research fields of Chemistry, Economics, Medicine, and Physics, the corresponding world and US percentages are 26% and 39%, respectively.  (Jews currently make up approximately 0.25% of the world's population and 2% of the US population.)  [Source](http://www.jinfo.org/) Does inbreeding explain Natalie Portman? I'm going with God's chosen people over inbreeding based on the Jews I've known and their continuing survival as prophesy predicts.   
Spammer asshole!
Thanks, bugbear. I was hoping someone could post some links about vertical axis wind turbines, which I saw some articles on about a half year ago -- I was unable to find any good ones this evening. Apparently, they are cheaper to assemble for off-shore use (no blades), and can get huge, and can withstand higher winds.  This stuff still won't work in the US as long as the power grid doesn't reach into remote areas outside of Texas, or as long as rich-folk object to having their sailing grounds marred (like off of Cape Cod, which may have been resolved).
A recent survey revealed that people pay less attention to adverts on television these days.
People have enjoyed Spolsky's articles over the years becuase they _want to have their own company_, just like Joel. Spolsky is all about that little fantasy all cube slaves harbour about what they would do _if they were the boss_. One should not read Spolsky to actually gain technical insight.
Following the trend, my friends and I are all ladened with debt, but we are workers and in most cases sensible with our money.
IMLigg è una iniziativa di Internet Marketing Blog simile a Digg.com lanciato oggi in fase beta ha molte funzionalità interessanti ...
It certainly wouldn't be the first time that has happened.  And it'll give that region some additional U.N. seats, for what it's worth.
creeepy
Thread and process priorities are **nice**! Operating systems that can't schedule properly? Significantly less so.
Thanks for the replies everyone. I'll have to check those links out.
Biking to work is more dangerous than driving for most of us.  I learned about the higher risk of being on a bike at a young age when a German Shepherd attacked me while I was riding in the neighborhood on Thanksgiving.  Suffered a minor concussion and have a little scar.  Dog attack is unlikely on a bike, but next to impossible while in a car with the windows up. Even the best bicyclists can't stop an ahole driver from clipping them. For an example of just how vulnerable you are on a bike while on roads, consider [the cops who died while riding to raise money for fallen colleagues.](http://www.cnn.com/2006/US/08/22/police.bike.wreck.ap/index.html)
I don't like top-10 lists in general, but I don't see a problem with sponsored links, or self-benefiting links, as long as the content is useful. Like video-on-demand for both cable and the Internet, sponsors are starting to create their own content. Def Jam, Reebok, and GM, for example, have an on-demand channel on Comcast that features music videos ad-free. Budweiser is moving into [content production](http://adage.com/article?article_id=111379). I never saw the BMW movies, but I heard they weren't terrible. Advertisers are on Reddit, obviously. They're worried as hell about opt-in media and long-tail media, but seem to be responding pragmatically. We'll downmod them if they suck.
The connoisseur is defined more by what he cannot enjoy than by what he can.
&gt; The Saddam fanboy... Troll alert.
While kdawg nails it imo, there could be another reason... According to a recent poll 30percent of americans don't know which year it happened in... http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20060809/od_afp/usattackspolloffbeat_060809145351;_ylt=ArnrtaXH3JkyylylP
I have a few anecdotes of my own, personal experiences and such, that wholly contradict yours, that indicate pot to be not only harmless, but beneficial and overall positive. This is my own actual experience and those of the people I trust - my friends. Anecdotal evidence sucktivates.
When you visited the site, it didn't.  It was a spam search engine.  If you tapped in sex, then yes, you would have found porn - but if you had typed in potatos, you would have got a gardening site - a load of hype over nothing!!
Christians don't worship Christ crucified.  The crucifix serves to remind us of Jesus' sacrifice and all that it entails.  It's a memento mori.  It's a reminder that we all have crosses to bear in life.
No kidding... Who would want to be a Fortune 500 CEO anyway? There are better ways to spend one's time, let alone make dollars fast.  I'd be more interested to hear how many of these CEO's were liberal arts majors versus engineers or scientists.
&gt;"I'm not going to walk/bike/bus to work because it costs me wages," is obscenely inept. Maybe the author didn't convey its idea in the best way. The idea is that people value their time. Maybe it's not the same as their wage, but time does have its value. So you may change the "cost" of time and get different results that the author (example: if you value your time less, you will need longer commute to conclude that is't better to drive). I found the article sound on principles, but I agree that the figures used are questionable.
He has said that Saddam was his ruler and that it's hard for him to accept that he's gone.  The guy's family received perks as Baathists.  Look into it.  I'm not trolling.
An alternative explanation (which is common to all of these high profile art thefts) is that serious criminals often steal these works of art to prove to whoever that they are serious, not cops etc. (and this is why these paintings are usually returned to the insurance company or the museum, coz who could really sell a painting like Scream without attracting some major attention). What pisses me off seriosuly though, is that the goddamm MFs that stole it managed to fuck up both Scream and the Madonna. Bastards!!!
Good article on Parallelism
BUSH is too afraid of mr.AHMEDINEJAD why?  surely the later knows a lot about mr.BUSH's lies !!
Look also here: Fear, Uncertain, and Doubt by Joel Spolsky (Loud Thinking)  http://programming.reddit.com/info/fw8g/comments 
I'm tired of the grade inflation fallacy. It's dead wrong, for two reasons. First, everyone in America knows that the average grade for most classes is a B. Grades are used to compare students, and it is ruinous to have to take a class that doesn't grde on the same scale as similar classes at other universities. It's been a long time since a C was average for most classes. The few classes and programs that do give a C average (organic chemistry, for example) are specifically designed to give a substantial fraction of failing grades or the equivalent (you won't get into med school with a D on your transcript) to weed people out. That's what a C average means, by the way: nearly half of the class will fail or get a grade so bad they might as well have failed. Second, emphasizing grade inflation ignores the substantial work and performance increases expected of students compared to the past. Both at the elementary school level (where the amoutn of homework has skyrocketed) and at the university level (where all schools have substantially better students than they once had - think about Bush getting into Yale in this day and age) schoolwork is more demanding and there's more of it than ever before. As a result, what we're seeing is not grade inflation but achievement ratings that reflect real gains in performance. Physics majors who graduated from my university in the 70s attest to the fact that they would not have been able to even get in now. Their "C"s are far less impressive than the Bs being earned now.
The explanation at Wikipedia is a typical case of 'mathematics are supposed to be hard'. Why not express it in plain english? Well then anybody could do it!
This seems odd to me. Looking at the code, it appears to be: - start two normal priority threads - each of which starts 50 lower priority threads which exit as soon as they run Since the windows scheduler (by design) starves lower priority procs/threads by design, I would expect this to result in the two normal prio threads pinging back and forth in the scheduler until they've both started all their threads, whereupon the lower-prio ones would be scheduled and things would clean up. The only difference the described change would make is to give the created threads a chance to run and exit, just reducing the overall number of threads. So...if this is really running at 100% cpu for a long time on a single-proc box it seems to suggest: 1 - the thread scheduler sucks badly when there are of the order of 100 threads in total 2 - thread creation and scheduling are contending for the same lock 3 - it is a spinlock (100% cpu)   The numbers (100 threads) seem too low to cause this sort of behaviour (two-minute runtime). This can't be linear behaviour...can anyone suggest what might be going on here?
You call it a fallacy, and then "It's been a long time since a C was average for most classes." :) Seriously, do you want your doctor to have been an average student before medical school?   Not everyone can be above average; Lake Wobegon has no university.
This looks like something made in photoshop
and a bunch of other Events.. make your own or find something to do
Which they need if they want to fly out of the country from Ben Gurion anyway...
The students at good colleges are a minority of people.  If the kids in a science class all mastered the material and demonstrated this knowledge then the kids deserve commensurate marks.  It's goofy to start giving out lower grades because somebody mistakenly believes C means average.  At most places it's clearly defined as satisfactory, not average. Med. school is pretty hard to get into, especially for certain demographics. I'm not too worried about the C a tool at U of W gave someone to prove a point. Got to love the irony of a guy who teaches at the U of Wisconsin at Green Bay proclaiming elitism.
In Europe, we roll our joints with tobacco as we (well, not all of us of course) feel that the weed burns more even and the smoke is not as coarse. And in those places where we mostly get hash, well you have to use tobacco to smoke it. But this means that a lot of kids out there get addicted to nicotine coz a lot of times when they don't have weed, having a ciggie is like "a small joint". I've actually never had a cigarette in my life, though I've smoked plenty of joints with tobacco, but I've got countless friends that started smoking ciggies because of this.
What is NaDa™ ?  - NaDa™ is a simple document that will make you feel good.  - NaDa™ does not take much space on a hard disk drive, it is only 1 byte.  - NaDa™ does nothing and does it in a very efficient way.  - NaDa™ does not waste precious processor cycles because it is actually doing nothing.  - NaDa™ does not use any memory.
&gt;I Disagreed With the Professor's Stand on ----  The time to deal with this issue is when it comes up in class. I have no respect for anyone who complains on the course questionnaires. &gt;But the professor might put me down, or the students might laugh at me. Not too likely, but even if it happens, so what? If you don't have courage in the safe setting of a classroom, when exactly are you planning to develop it? When your boss asks you to falsify figures or lie under oath? When someone throws rocks through your minority neighbor's windows? When the local hate group burns the synagogue? Learning to stay quiet is a valuable skill.  If you have a clearly opinionated, self-important arrogant ahole for a prof. then by all means don't sabotage your grade by challenging him during the class. Trust me on this. This teacher thinks when he gives a kid a C he's defending Wisconsin against the evils of mediocrity.  Clearly he's deluded. I'm so tired of teachers bored by the subjects they teach who then waste valuable class time on rants.
Well, I'm certainly not defending the author of this article.  Anyone who thinks that asking questions in class is somehow in the same class with (or a prerequisite to) standing up to thugs burning churches has lost touch.
I dunno about that last point... Most of my pot-smoking friends are very aware that smoking something (anything!) is probably not what our lungs would want us to do. Though we all know certain people that are extremely messed up IN PART because of weed (extreme paranoia, mood swings, low libido, no appetite etc.), but these people were borderline to begin with anyway. But since we're talking statisitcs here... when we talk about things CAUSING whatever, that is not really what is meant by scientist. They say that the statisitcal SIGNIFICANT probability of getting ill is increased (and the studies referenced in the post talk about the statistical significance of the good sides of the active stuff in pot).
If this guy was like the professors I've had, here's what I'd say. This Course Covered Too Much Material ... that is utterly useless, maybe having some marginal value only in the past you live in, and should be looked up when needed, not memorized and forgotten. I Disagreed With the Professor's Stand on (most things) ... but I didn't bring it up because then your resentment at your authority being questioned just dropped my grade a letter. The university may get money from other places, but that money goes to research. The tuition, and some money from the government FOR EDUCATION, is for teaching the students, and you are not giving them their money's worth. Instead, you pull together a bunch of crap you think is nifty and that you had to learn so we should too, and use the same outdated lesson plan again. Despite your protestations that I do need to know this, you cannot even come up with contrived situations where this is the best way to have learned things. Your misguided crusade for memorization suggests you need to read some Feynman. For example "I don't know what's the matter with people: they don't learn by understanding: they learn by some other way - by rote, or something. Their knowledge is so fragile!" You can't teach understanding because you don't have it yourself. Instead cognitive dissonance means you believe memorization is important because you're a professor and you're good at it. Your attempts to tie your course to some grand universal ideal - Mathematics! Science! - is BS. You teach dusty arcana of your narrow narrow specialty that will be irrelevant soon. If you taught people important universal structures of things and how to generalize them so that they can fill them in with numbers and conventions from Google and Wikipedia you could argue you taught people what they needed to adapt to unexpected needs. All I Want is the Diploma ... because you AND the companies that hire people from here are both morons, one teaching useless things, and the other hiring college graduates for having gone to college, not for having any knowlege or skill they actually got there. Yet your delusions of grandeur make you waste people's time and think that the people, like you, who have memorized useless arcana and spend lots of time doing boring useless things for a shred of approval from Authority deserve to have good jobs and power despite being the worst suited for anything they'll have to do. Bitter? Hell yes.
What is smoking responsibly?
As I understand it (from Joels older posts), FogBugz has customers who want to run it on their Windows server (VBScript/Javascript - ASP 3.0) and other who want to run it on *Nix (PHP). Seems like a pretty smart approach to do the work once but then generate code for the respective platforms. Perhaps wasabi is executable (probably not hard to do, given it's just a matter of calling .NET apis for, say, a mini web server) but I doubt they're actually shipping it to customers. And note he says the wasabi _compiler_ is written in C# - these days it's pretty easy to create mini-languages, particularly if you're targetting a particular problem domain (like web apps). In fact, from looking at what most people are doing with Rails (the actual _application_ code), it wouldn't be too hard to parse and generate, say, PHP. And that might not be such a dumb thing to do, FastCGI being what it is, while Apache + mod_php, as an execution environment is stable - treat PHP as "byte code". The big problem for Rails (and Python) is the lack of a solid web execution environment. FastCGI ain't it - in fact reddit is testimony to that - it stutters at least once a day and I sense background processes are running, checking for "zombie" FastCGI servers, plus a general need for regular attention from it's developers. "Enterprisey", in this context, isn't about being exceptional or better. It's about platforms which "just work" - that don't require extreme attention to detail and so that you're not having to call your lead developer on Saturday night, after your helpdesk just fumbled your customers call for the third time. Reddit is, without doubt, a far more challenging technical problem than most enterprisey software but most companies deal with challenge and risk poorly and are looking for safe, boring solutions - sexy one liners, functional programming and, to an extent, even development times just don't sell here.
HURD offers no technical advantage to the BSD kernel, so why use HURD? HURD/L4 is dead. Maybe HURD/coyotos, but we'll see. Plan9 comes after the death of UNIX (not Linux) and this seems far ahead.
Popular One-Click Digital Software Management System Now Free for Desktop Linux Users
No, they've taken the necessary precautions: "*These directions are for planning purposes only. You may find that construction projects, traffic, or other events may cause road conditions to differ from the map results.*" It may be a stretch to say that this covers lack of construction projects, but it's surely an "other event".
I also think he is overrated. Just because you have a company that makes money, doesn't automatically make you a guru. Maybe his strength is his mediocrity? Edit: see below
omg *what* a dumbass that was one of the most clueless and stupid articles i've read yet
In other words, there's a difference between a personal God and an impersonal magical force. Impersonal magical force does what it's told. God does what He wants.
the what guys? honestly, who cares?
Microsoft has been unclear about the licenses involved with .Net and Mono. Many suspect a bait and switch. [Here's a great blog post](http://www.gnome.org/~seth/blog/mono) I've been showing to people as it gives a great distilation of the biggest problem Mono faces.
Indeed. The original article is the dumbest thing I've seen Joel write.  Ruby is a language a smart Java programmer might make.  Python is a language a smart C/C++ programmer might make.  Scheme/Lisp with macros is the language a smart Scheme/Lisp programmer might make.  Haskell is a language a smart mathematician might make.  Wasabi is a language an arrogant git who only thinks he can do better might make.
Is this a f***ing bot?
the original borders were very poorly drawn..
While I'm not saying that the Boston Tea Party was an act of terrorism, nobody has to be hurt for it to qualify as terrorism. Merriam-Webster has a very simple and elegant definition of what terrorism is:  &gt; the systematic use of terror especially as a means of coercion  So like I said, the Boston Tea Party may not be an act of terrorism but don't make the mistake of thinking that terrorism means killing or hurting people.
It's about changing your own mind, not God's. Like he said, "yet not my will, but yours be done."
clue: have you considered actually evaluating your risks and gains in a rational manner? you know, not basing business decisions on crap like 'being enjoyable'? what a thought
Well, in this case it is violating Lebanese territory. Sort of what the article is all about. Israel can protect themselves from within Israel if they really wanted to.
If they wanted something cross platform, why didn't they develop in PHP to start with? It runs on both Windows and Linux. I'm sure Wasabi is great and helps them churn out excellent cross platform web apps faster, but his point was, as far as I can tell, that churning out code faster *doesn't matter*. Because he's using an immature non enterprise environment to do it, he'll suffer from strange bugs caused by the compiler, and subtle performance issues due to leaky Wasabi abstractions and other problems he wouldn't have if he just wrote it in PHP to begin with. I actually agree with the premise that good libraries and boring features like Unicode and stable performance are important, but as the Wasabi example proves, in some cases  the boost to productivity outweighs the cost of using something not proven and non-enterprisey! Otherwise they wouldn't be using Wasabi. Sometimes getting a prototype up and running and trying things out gives you so much valuable knowledge about the problem that it outweighs the cost of using a language or environment that is slow or lacks feature X. It might force you to rewrite stuff, but you wouldn't have learned what parts needed rewriting without having built the prototype.
Site Search Usability
Of course only terrorist acts on US soil counts, because no hispanics EVER did anything outside of the US right? http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/ETA
*A version of OpenOffice that will run natively under Mac OS X’s Aqua user interface* And I prematurely thought OOo could not become any uglier...
Hi, you seem to be a pretty bitter guy - if you're not being sarcastic -  but going beyond that, if you want to consider rational reasons to use Rails (it had crossed my mind...) there are plenty: *) Rails works.  Other people have been using it successfully. *) It's faster to develop stuff with.  My experience is that it reduces code down to its essential concepts and lets you express them very succinctly.  That makes me develop better code faster. *) Rails and Ruby are garnering a lot of interest, which in turn gets more people using them, and contributing to them.  This is a virtuous circle that will continue to strengthen Rails and Ruby. *) It's enjoyable.  By making something that people like to use, you'll attract talent.  I don't know if I'd call myself talented, but I sure wouldn't want to work at a place with an attitude like "crap like 'being enjoyable'".  If you like your work, you'll be more productive in most knowledge work fields. 
that's right folks, before us Irish brought you free energy, we also brought the very best in car safety ads.  you wanna know how we got the crash to look so lifelike? (hint: we saved some on forgoing the expense of crash test dummies)
astute commentary by Fischer on EU's half-pregnant policy.  EU  will end up doing more,  or being sent back home in disarray.
A little too much Action Jackson...a little too little heart wrenching tragedy..
namhuy forces articles from his/her site down your gullet
Because a third of Americans can't even remember in which year the attacks happened.
&gt; First off: how do you make that cool little blue line when you quote someone? I like it There are some different formatting tricks that are allowed in comments. You can find out more [here](http://reddit.com/help/commenting).  &gt; Second: a very sincere 'thank you' for telling me why you downmodded me. You're quite welcome.  &gt; Am I not allowed to point out that this anecdotal evidence does not damn racial profiling, without being downmodded? I thought that was used for people who posted nonsensical or needlessly infmallatory comments. You're allowed to do as you wish. People downmod for different reasons. Most people it seems downmod comments they disagree with, whereas others downmod poorly formed arguments. Some do both, and a few people will upmod comments they disagree with just because they were well written.  &gt; Now, onto my main point: are there any middle eastern men who would accept this? I doubt so, but so far we've seen white people for and against racial profiling, and other people against racial profiling, some of them probably asian or middle eastern. Honestly, I can't imagine *anyone* willingly subjecting themselves to this. No one wants to be treated like a second class citizen. Discrimination is just wrong in my opinion, even if you could make a statistical case for it. I think it would be a huge step back in our country's progress, and I think the only people that would be agreeable to it would be those that would benefit from it (white people), which is a sign that it's a bad idea.
&gt;the university level (where all schools have substantially better students than they once had - think about Bush getting into Yale in this day and age) I agree Bush is no intellect but he would STILL get into Yale today because of his "connections".   And your notion that schools have better students today is completely refuted by both statistics and common sense: quality does not increase when 2 or 3 or 4 times higher of a percentage of "students" go on to university then in the past....standards DECLINE under those conditions.
This jail would be a great setting for a MMORPG
All of the government anti-marijuana ads I've seen have been jokes--literally.  The explicit text says 'drugs bad' but the subtext is hilairous druggy humor.  Its one of those things you recognize, but cannot necessarily explain to the uncomprehending, sort of like sarcasm.  One I recall says "Drugs only make you *think* you're good looking".  Hearing an authoritative gubmint voice who is trying  ostensibly trying to earn your respent is hysterical when you realize he just effectively said "you are ugly".
Kaplan's analysis of why Bush's vision is incorrect is quite astute, but his own *realpolitik* vision is no better than Bush's. His overwhelming focus on "stability" ironically misses the main source of instability in the Middle East - the imperial presence of the United States and its colonial proxies - just as his analysis of what the US is doing in Iraq completely fails to understand why the US invaded in the first place. Until the US and its hand-wringing pundits come to grips with the real reasons the US launched the War on Terror and the War on Iraq, it will continue its failure to act with ethics, integrity, and pragmatism.
From the article: &gt; Students are also products, and employers outside the University are also our customers. These customers have a right to complain if our graduates are lacking in skills, knowledge, and motivation. They have a right to complain if we certify someone as being a potentially good employee and that person turns out to be unqualified.   For anyone wanting a little sanity after being disgusted by this "teacher's" article, here's [something from dissident MIT prof Noam Chomsky](http://www.pentaside.org/article/understanding-power-on-education.html): *"Well, that's pretty much what the schools are like, I think: they reward discipline and obedience, and they punish independence of mind. If you happen to be a little innovative, or maybe you forgot to come to school one day because you were reading a book or something, that's a tragedy, that's a crime -- because you're not supposed to think, you're supposed to obey, and just proceed through the material in whatever way they require."*
Bullshit, sympathy is the professor helping you out because your mother just died and he was kind enough to give you a copy of his lecture notes for the past week. Sympathy isn't giving in to someone saying 'boo hoo this is too hard for me'. If it's too hard for them then why did they apply in the first place? Professors generally know all the excuses, they've heard them for the past god knows how many years and probably used them as well. Sometimes they probably do come down on the hard side, but life is tough get used to it. Nothing worth having comes easy, if it does it isn't worth it. The less you have to work for something the less it's worth to you and society, if you could walk into a university and give these excuses to get sympathy then where would the world be? Everyone would have these degrees and you'd be in the problem the UK is in with our GCSE's where it's nearly impossible to do bad in them. I didn't revise one day and I got into the A*-C bracket they want everyone to get in, I got all my grades in there without any effort. I'm a fast learner and I have a good memory, but even I know I shouldn't have got in the top 50% of the top bracket. Would you want this happening with PhD's? How about getting a doctor who was entitled to a degree because he paid for it? Would that make you trust him when he opened up your thorax when you said you had back pain? It would be nice to get people with degrees to be less arrogant, I mean scientists are just the engineers of 10 years from now. Scientists invented the LCD screen, you don't call one out to get the TV repaired though do you?
Don’t let the name fool you, though, this is just the same old rogue anti-spyware wrapped into a new disguise. VirusBurst is also from the same makers of SpywareQuake, SpyFalcon, SpyAxe, SpywareStrike, etc, etc.
The most scary part of the article is the one about people not really noticing or caring, because most of them were not directly affected. I guess one day they found themselves suddenly very much affected - but then it was too late.
I remember a guy in Germany drowned because he trusted his car navigation system and cross a river where a bridge hadn't been built yet. It was night.
What exactly is the point of putting Joel's essays on a list for topics of interest to the readers of Joel on Software?
&gt; situations where there are suddenly 100k people on the system at the same second when popular concert sales begin. Sounds like a situation where an application written in Erlang could show its mastery. Interestingly, Erlang is a language without the "gigantic ecosystem" around it that Joel talks about, but still it is used at enterprise level (Ericsson) where Real People Could Get Fired.
It is like confusing state-capitalist bolshevik authoritarianism with the idea of communism. It is like confusing Pinnochet with Adam Smith.
The limit has already been reached and no new beta testers are being accepted.
Mr Miller represents the more reasonable face of RCs, and recently the Catholic Church has shown a more enlightened stance on matters of science. The possibility of adopting IT into Catholic doctrine is a retrograde and laughable move. It can only add weight to the Fundamentalist groups advocating IT in the USA and elsewhere. At a time when large numbers of university students accept the Genesis account, and many do not really understand the basis of evolutionary science, I despair for the future of our science based civilisation.
I like how he dismisses the importance of jobs - "This is your job", "Give up your job and make do with fewer possessions", etc. I suspect that for many students - myself included - giving up our part-time job doesn't mean simply fewer possessions.  It means less healthy food, fewer purchased textbooks, or dropped courses.
Exactly, ITA Software prefers that it stay that way with most people.
True, but when you need it, you *need* it. No way the bank I use (BB, largest brazilian company) is going with RoR. Not in a decade. BTW, their site uses Java. More important is, why does enterprise matters so much? We can't have a conversation about languages (or *anything* that's connected with IT) without citing how some multi-billion dollar company does. I think there's two reasons. One, in a lot of companies, IT exists to serve. Make production faster, smoother, more efficient. The CEO sees it as a tool. And secondly, 22's recently graduated that want to be billionary try to emulate the big guys. Not millionary, not Viaweb's level, I am talking bigger. Viaweb sold for what, 37 mi? That's a lot of money for a 2 person startup, but do you know much Cargill paid JD Edwards for its customized SAP ERP? 37 million. And companies like JD, IBM, Sun have to make dozens of multi-million deals. Not "build something, sell, retire", but *daily*. In fact, to match IBM's 2004 revenues, you need seven 37 million deals everyday. And that fascinates a lot of people. Anyway, I am happy using my PHP/Mysql, Python/Postgres, and I don't plan switching. Just commenting.
Well there are ways of doing things within the law. Put a Creative Commons License on your work and you will be safe legally. Using CCL you can even allow for people to make money off your work, or you can let developing countried make money off it (but no one else), and a host of other options. So it is not untested territory legally.
&gt; instead of spending time with the users and figuring out what they actually need Exactly! Upmodded a hundredfold. I develop internal web applications for a large corporation, and I'm continually amazed whenever I encounter either a) the "adhoc balls of mud built by amateurs out of access, excel, email, and spit" (nice one, dbenhur), and b) the creaky, clumsy, unfriendly applications built by consultants who clearly had no idea what the end users were going to be doing with them. In all honesty, the former are usually less bad than the latter, despite their brittleness, simply because they were actually built by the people who had to use them.
I want to run, I want to run
Heres a [link to Google transit](http://google.com/transit?f=q&amp;hl=en&amp;time=&amp;date=&amp;ttype=&amp;q=930+nw+25th+pl+97210+to+4747+n+channel+ave+97217+8+am&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;z=13&amp;om=1)  for the screenshot.
(:
OK, Joel, you've jumped the shark.
&gt; Some Topics in Class Weren't on the Exams &gt; The point of a class is the material, not the exam. The exam is a check to see whether you learned the material. It is a complaint about the exam, not about the material.  If an exam doesn't cover important parts of the course, then it is not a reliable indicator of whether or not you learned the material.  One irritating thing it does is let people who don't know anything about X still get a certificate saying that they do, thus devaluing everyone else's certificate. When I was at university I used only learn the parts of the course that were in previous exams.  I ended up doing pretty well in the exams, better than all the people who learnt the course much more extensively than me.  I can now see that this was completely unfair on them.
Oh, you beat me to the punch!
&gt; I love it when non christians tell us what our religion says. It's your book, we just quote it.
Joel was right.  Don't get me wrong, Rails had a lot of nice ideas.  But those ideas have now been duplicated by the other languages (Grails, CakePHP, to name just a couple).  With that in mind, why would someone even look at RoR?  Ruby is slower, has far fewer support libraries, and there are almost no jobs for it.  The BIG 3 web technologies are PHP, .NET, and Java.  Complaining about people pointing out the obvious, like many will do by downmodding this comment, will NOT change reality.
"Whatever?" Law schmaw? Great argument.
Okay, we'll all violate those laws. As he said, rightly, your degree will subsequently be worth absolutely nothing. No standards means no value to credentials. I use most of these rules in my courses. I add 'if you are a disruption in class, you get a chalk brush thrown at your head.' Sympathy? No. Respect for the group, yes. I have sympathy for students with genuine issues. Like deaths in the family. Like even personal meltdown. That isn't the same as reducing standards to the point where every degree we issue is devalued. I guess I'm one of your 'worst' professors. Oh well. I bet you'd be one of my 'worst students.'   
Actually you do not need to buy homeopathic medicine more than once. Once you have it it never goes away. And you can make it stronger. This is all completely correct.  But the thing with Homeopathy is that there are no universal remedies. As I said you start with the patient and go from there, not the other way around. In a way the homeopathic philosophy is what you could call post-modern. There are commonalities, but mostly singularities that are specific to the person. I.e. if you and me are given the same remedy it does not mean that we will exhibit the same effects. This is why homeopathy is very difficult to test using experiments based on modern medical science. Now I am not saying that modern medicine is bogus, far from it, it is excellent in life-prologation, traumas to the physical body, dentistry etc. However, in other areas homeopathy is better (and it should be limited to that space).   
Good point about Joel's hypocritical DSL. However, he was right on about reasons to be scared of Ruby. The lack of unicode support is nothing short of astonishingly backwards, and it manages to make Python look positively fast, which is saying something. Furthermore, when you work at a place Where Somebody Could Get Fired, as he aptly puts it, you do have to worry about the type of things he talks about, especially language ecosystem and library support. [EDIT 8 hours later: If that last paragraph about wasabi is a joke, it sure was dry, and I whiffed on that one completely.]
Yeah, I gotta agree with you that his attitude about jobs is pretty one sided. If you are working more than about 20 hours a week it is pretty hard to be full time at a university. Unless you have a job where you can study at work (like night clerk somewhere). But even at 20 hours a week you need to be really really disciplined - like reading the textbook starting in week 1, never getting behind, and so on. With my students I do a survey in week 1 and if people have other commitments we move things around (exams, the major assignments) so that it works for everyone. Nothing worse than 5 exams in a 4 day period when you already have to work 20 hours that week. That's just common sense to help out like that. Not sure where you went to school, but here in Canada there are pretty generous work study programs too - well paying jobs at the University - but these are pretty limited and usually go on a marks basis so.... once you fall behind you just fall farther behind...   
Reread what he said, perhaps. If you don't have courage to challenge authority in class, exactly when will your courage start? When something far more challenging happens? That was his point, IMHO   
When compared to this [big diesel](http://reddit.com/info/fr8b/comments), yes.  And as I read more, maybe even to a tiny diesel.  So why did smart companies like Volvo and Rosen invest in a turbine?  Maybe to meet a low emissions requirement.
This guitar looks impossible to play without hitting other strings and making accidental sounds. I would prefer this [Paul Reed Smith custom guitar.](http://prsguitars.com/showcase/private/guitars/ps502.jpg)
"... because somebody mistakenly believes C means average..." Please demonstrate that this is mistaken. It was, in fact, the DEFINITION of average for many many years. Class average was 'supposed' to be 67-70, which is a solid C. By definition. For years many people belled their marks to fit this, up or down as required. This is no longer standard practice. We now have a runaway system of 'I want good student evaluations, I'll give high marks' bullshit that is devaluing our degrees because no-ing nudding eqals a 66, duOde. (and yes, I've had stuff like that handed in...) This is in Canadian universities, not sure how it works where you are. I'd be interested to hear though. 
Its called a giant cluster fu*k. Bush set the house on fire, he points to it and says we have to put out the fire or else. So where is the plan after three years? It looks like its to relabel "Iraq is the front of the war on terror" to The front of the war against "Islamic fascism". Its all marketing on the conservative side. How does Bush leave Iraq without the Iranians joining in with the Shia, the Saudis with the Sunni ,and our Nato allies - Turkey attacking the Kurds. Heresy to say it, but I almost wish for a conservative president in 2008 so they get stuck trying to clean up this mess in Iraq and deal with the generation of extremists that the neocons have created.
So what does that webpage look like to a colorblind person?  Are some or all of the pictures the same?
He kind of starts a thought, but never takes it anywhere. Unusual for a PG article. Neutral.
Ahhh, Python with Psyco for example is not so bad. Ruby has no such thing.
I've used ritalin plenty of times in order to help me concentrate to study and it wored excellently. I was very focused, didn't have any attention deficit at all. Actually I would encourge anyone in uni or school to take it coz it really did wonder for many of my essays. I do not disagree that the way the actual drug works is by realeasing dopamine. What I was saying is that it is homeopathic "in principle". This means in its underlying philosophy. There is a vast collectiion of reserch on homeopathy (just google homeopathy and evidence and you'll get plenty). The problem that I have with a lot of these sites though is that they are often either or. I could provide a long list of links and books, but they would get slammed for being in the pro-homeopathy camp (which is fine). As I said before, the problem with a lot of science on homeopathy is that it starts from the wrong premises which is based on how you test pharmas. You cannot do this with homeopathy as there are no single wonder remedies in homeopathy, it all depends on the patients medical, emotional and mental history. The way homeopaths test remedies is by proofing them. I.e. they take it themselves or give it to others. The people in the trial show after a while (the effectiveness also depend on the patient) will exhibit symptoms of what the remedy is supposed to remedy. I.e. you start from the non-sick to test what the remedy is all about. This is what the empiriacal research is all about in homeopathy. Now I do not expect anyone to accept this outrigth (you shoudn't). I used to beleive that homopathy was bogus until I actually started reading up on its methods and philosophy and went to an excellent homeopath that helped me tremendously (I was remedied ailments that I didn't even complain about).   
You could also say time spent biking doesn't count because it goes towards exercise. If only it wasn't for weather and pollution...
Neet little app that can help you to learn to read faster!  (mind hacking!)
Gotta agree. I took a year off mid degree to decide what I really wanted to do. Best thing I ever did. Having now had 25 years to think about it, all I would say to you is replace 'failure' and 'flunked out' with less negative concepts.  You probably learned valuable life lessons despite not finishing. Perhaps you will  go back (I hope so, mature students with some hard knocks experience make great upper year students) and if you do, don't be ashamed of having travelled a different path. School is important but real life skills are more important. I do a lot of adult education work and I gotta tell you that the people like you - with the ability to honestly self evaluate and some humility and some real life skills - really bring a lot to the table later on. If you go back to school you'll have a framework to hang the course material on now - a different framework than other students, and that is good. 
Seems like all that is already part of the process...
digital: that is a good looking guitar!
Erlang IS my favourite language at the moment :-) And I'm no longer working with ticket vending systems btw.
If it was me, I'd be very afraid.  Some guy who eats alone, several times a month, just to chat with a pretty waitress, usually tips 50%, and then $100, and then $10,000. Not to be a pessimist or anything, but what is he going to want in return?  And how is he going to react when he doesn't get it?
Poster is a jerk.  No new useful information.  This is spam.
That's the wrong picture.
They're not *that* rare. Bear in mind that average use doesn't have to be that high -- it's enough to have occasional peaks that are beyond what the technology can handle. That will attract very unwelcome notice. And, y'know, the enterprisey folks who have any real work experience have a pretty good empirical idea of how rare they are or are not. The level of condescension in your post was rather palpable.
&gt;Rather than change the subject to domestic issues, as they have tried in past years, Democrats are hoping to confront Republicans head-on.
Indeed - the wrong picture. The actual picture has what looks like a big cock in it - and it aint flat packed.
In general agreed. One point "If they wanted something cross platform, why didn't they develop in PHP to start with? It runs on both Windows and Linux." PHP has issues running under Windows - under Apache, you're basically restricted to a single process. Under IIS, there are various ways to do it (and even a .NET version of PHP - http://www.php-compiler.net/ ) but none of these is entirely certain - there's mixed reports about stability of the IIS isapi (something like mod_php for IIS) and CGI is slow. In practice PHP on Windows is really only suitable for slow traffic Intranets and development. Also I imagine they want something which will run immediately on a customers existing servers, without installing PHP or other stuff they're not already using. Again that's enterprisey caution in play.
Sulu, give me warp 18. Now!
My grandfather was a Mason, but I think he was a lapsed-Mason or something.  He never talked about it, and I don't think he ever went to meetings or anything. How do you go about joining?
&gt; Okay, then if you really feel that I am twisting the Bible, go pray to God and believe with all your heart that a brand new MacBook will show up on your doorstep today. I don't need a MacBook, so why should I?  But when I pray for good weather, or health, or happiness, I get them them.  Perhaps *you* are focused on material goods and this world, rather than the kingdom to come.  When I pray, I have the faith of a mustard seed, and what I pray for works, whether it be money to pay the bills, or health of a loved one, or anything. Perhaps, if G-d is not answering your prayers as literally as He answers mine, you should reëvaluate your faith and see if you are truly following Him, or yourself.  The sooner you put G-d central in your life, the sooner he can answer your prayers and show you His love!  This is wonderful news, and I hope that you take it to heart and accept Him as a part of your life very soon.
&gt; Experts say the number of children afflicted in the FLDS community is expected to steadily increase as a result of decades of inbreeding between two of the polygamous sect's founding families -- the Barlows and the Jessops. I wonder which "experts" that were. If there is no selection pressure on the particular gene, then there will be no increase of that gene (inbreeding by itself does not increase gene frequency in a population). If 1% of the people have the gene, then - without selection pressure - there is no reason why that percentage should change. Probably there is a negative selection pressure on the gene: effected people die younger and on average will get less children then uneffected individuals. The gene isn't spreading: it is dying out slowly, even in that particular population. The author lacks basic knowledge of biology, has found "experts" without basic knowledge of biology (or cited them wrongly), and uses the wrong arguments to set a religious group in bad light.  For the record: I have nothing to do with Mormons, don't live in the US, and I have no idea if there are any Mormons elsewhere.
Duped and linkjacked http://reddit.com/goto?id=fnbe
On The O’Reilly Factor, former administration official Dan Senor told guest host John Kasich that “many leftist centered activists, political activists” — such as MoveOn.org — believe “we would be better off” if the United States withdrew from Afghanistan.  But when pressed by Kasich, Senor couldn’t name any progressives who have advocated pulling out from Afghanistan and admitted that MoveOn.org has called for withdrawal from Iraq, not Afghanistan.  An admin flack and propagandists that lies without shame. And is self righteous about getting people killed based on lies that haven't made America safer so Hackeet calls him "Herr Senor" and "little unterfurher of propaganda, Mr. Senor there." Well if the shoe fits. And his Mom survived the holocaust, the moral weight of that survivor status doesn't automatically or magically transfer to her son, especially since he is a Likud party sympathizer..
is this supposed to be *funny*?
&gt;**Q:** That being the case, what then accounts for their willingness to bear risk?  **A:** It's their overconfidence in their ability. Their confidence is greater than their risk avoidance. It compensates for their aversion to risk. 
There are actually 2 reasons: 1. It is quite windy in Denmark  2. The Danish have built lots of wind turbine generators.
While wearing a seatbelt will generally increase your survivability in any particular collision, it is generally accepted now that wearing the seatbelt will generally increase your risk of a accident in the first place.  This is known as [Risk Compensation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Risk_compensation). In fact, it's worse than this.  As the driver now feels more protected, and take more risks, vunerable road users (pedestrians, cyclists and motorcyclists) are exposed to much greater risk, but are much less capable of mitigating it.   
xpanic, it is a Paul Reed Smith Private Stock #502 Tiger Eye - PRS McCarty Soapbar Flamed Curly Maple Top Body  Brazilian Rosewood Fingerboard &amp; Neck  Black Onyx Birds With 14k Gold Outlines   Vintage Gold Tuners and Anodized Gold Stoptail    
This isn't going to work for me. To save the environment, I try to use only double-sided paper, and this side doesn't have any indication that they can support that.
Another 'shocking' road safety ad for ireland. These things suck and why do they always stick cheap ass music on them? So it is like!
He didn't mention that in the election that the Nazis won a plurality, the Nazis and the Communists together won a majority. So, a majority of the elected representatives were totalitarians of one stripe or another.
oh, i remember it's the flight ticket site that's constantly ass-slow and never seems to find the results you wanted. good lord, how hard can it be to find two connecting edges on a graph? there's only so many airports in the world, and it's not like you're dealing with billion-node connected graph anyways. 
How to remove the newest rogue anti-spyware application..virusburst
Mono is nowadays on the Open Invention Network list of protected patents. This is why it is now included in for example Fedora, a distro that is traditionally very strict in checking out patents and licenses. Read [this](http://gregdek.livejournal.com/4008.html) for some more info.
"The only way to really be secure is to not have people that want you dead, and in general you can achieve that via diplomatic means." So how do we establish diplomatic ties with terrorists?  Diplomacy, who are you kidding?  Diplomacy to you guys means that we give something up and expect them to be happy with that - and we all know where this diplomacy would start.  Diplomacy to you guys means that we stop supporting Israel. I like the way you are trying to suggest that flight 93 was shot down rather than crashed by the hijackers.  I also want to point out the extreme for which you are willing to go to suggest that it is more likely that terrorist hijackers will be reasonable, rational, and willing to spare life while an F-15 piloted by an American is a lunatic given a hair trigger.  You've made an obvious case as to where your sanity and loyalty stand. All of your statements suggest that this whole policy does nothing but make air travel more inconvenient - as opposed to driving - and does more to reinforce the hate of terrorist sympathizers.  Well, if you want to complain about heavy regulation in an industry that is inconvenient to people's lives tell me what you think about the pharmaceutical industry?  What do you think about the FDA?  Out of any industry they are still the most regulated and people depend on medication to live healthy and fullfilled lives.
i'm not bitter, only more experienced than most of the people posting here ever will be. not that it's any great accomplishment, by any means... anyways, *) so do balls of twine and snot, if you contort yourself enough  *) so? and that helps me get the job done to spec exactly how?  *) so?  *) so? have you ever worked on a real project? you know, where you deploy and generate a revenue stream? 
None of the things you have just stated have happened.  Terrorists hijacking airplanes has, so take your "poor me I'm being discriminated against because people think I'm a terrorist" sorry but and start going after the people creating that image.  Talk some sense into the head of that family memeber that can't help telling everyone about all the virgins he'll have one day.
So they're both assholes, just Israel is a *bigger* asshole.
Well, not exactly.  You may value your time doing laundry negatively.  That is, you may hate it and may well be willing to pay a premium over your leisure time value to avoid it.
"Not even 3%" does not logically lead to "loony".  Minorities, even tiny ones, can be correct.  The first person to conceive of democracy was a minority of one; that did not make him a loon.
I agree... they worship before the crucifix.  That's why it is all over all of their religious accoutrements, from the altars to the graves.  And yes, it is a memento mori.   But you are wrong on the last point, the memento is not a reminder that we have crosses to bear.  "Memento mori" means "object to make you think of death" (which of course is only natural when you are prostrate before an instrument of torture-execution).
The best way to join is to find a local Lodge and visit with them and discuss Masonry with them to get a sense of whether it's something you would like to be a part of.  If it is then you can try to petition.  It helps a lot if you know someone personally who is a Mason since they really want to make sure that you are a person with a good moral character, but that isn't always necessary.  Having a relative who was a Mason is a plus. [added] This is one of the better sites for learning more about Masonry that I have found:  http://www.masonicinfo.com/ It goes over the criticisms historical and current, for instance the discredited book "Protocols of the Elders of Zion" fueld huge anti-Masonic prejudice, and is part of the reason that tha Nazis put Masons in the concentration camps, and why you don't want to waer a Masonic ring in the Middle East where they still take that book seriously. It  also describes nicely what Masonry really is.
I've said that same thing about suicide bombers myself.  Unfortunately Islam is at the moment a politically correct victim religion so this even offends you I"m sure.
Probably.  Someone, somewhere said, "Mach 18", and then someone else asked what that meant, and by the time it got to the guy who was typing in that chyron, it was "18 times the speed of light".
Really?  I can clearly see a name and insignia for the Memorial foundation.  Could it be something as simple as asking for donations maybe?  NO!  9/11 IS ALL ABOUT MAKING PEOPLE FEEL HATE!  THEY DESERVED IT, IT WAS THE LUCKY SHOT OF PEOPLE THAT FINALLY GOT THEIR CHANCE TO HIT BACK AND THEY SHOULD BE GLAD IT WASN'T WORSE AND LOOK AT TRYING TO CHANGE THE THINGS THAT STARTED 9/11 - LIKE GETTING RID OF BUSH! Yeah, the irrationality of those people that become mesmerized by the event.  Man, how can people be so easily pulled by those puppet strings?
[more info here](http://adsoftheworld.com/media/print/world_press_freedom_day_the_napalm_girl_of_tranbang)
And Pyrex rocks. But I mean that Ruby makes the pure Python VM look fast, which takes some work.
But one could read his articles trying to understand how to *manage* technical stuff. Stuff like: Owner of a company? Your employe wants to use RoR? Just Say No.
Why would you be afraid of dying in a terrorist incident?  You've got more chance of winning the lottery.
Useful.  The page provides a short how to, with links to more detailed descriptions of what you need to do to secure your computer.   
Well, that 30% probably has to be internet culture.  These are  the people that will claim the whole event was a hollywood production in years to come. This is another way of making you international terrorist supporters feel good.  You can at least tell yourselves, "Sure, it was barbaric - but look at all the stupid, well-fed, ill deserved people they got rid of!"   
That doesn't make any sense though- people use prayer like God is a genie and they make wishes.  If God will never grant a wish that he wasn't planning on doing anyway, then why pray?  I understand that you are saying your will should be God's will, but that still means there is never any point in praying for Him to do something, because he's either already going to do it, or he never will.
If that's the definition then the US/UK government and their respective media outlets are the most effective terrorist organisations I know of.
Hah!  What do you call the ad campaigns for racism?  Its been over thirty years since segregation has ended?  If the black population of the US were to be its own nation they would be the world's 17th richest nation.  Let me redefine your statement:  "This is all about inspiring racism because it could have easily been Tim McVeigh that hijacked those planes, in fact, it was a Tim McVeigh - because the whole thing was a controlled demolition so that Halliburton could make money off of a racist war." Let me get back to my Katrina memorial coverage and unvieling of the new momument.
In before Greenspun's Tenth Rule
With the National Guard and Reserves already committed, where are the troops going to come from to satisfy the increasing long-term commitment and handle rising exhaustion of troops out there? How much longer before there's a return of the draft?
If Google has a better product then they will succeed.  Competition is supposed to create a better marketplace for us.  If Google has more books and a better way to view them, then they deserve to succeed.   I don't think that Google's really trying to strangle Gutenburg.  I think they are banking on the value of their service for scholars and students, since books.google.com lets you look at current books.  I bet that those links to buy the books give Google some money, and they are banking on people searching current book and purchashing them.  The old book thing it just a cool free service they can throw in.   Gutenburg still has some definite advantages at this point.  Not all old books that are out of copyright are aviable for download as PDFs (I was very dissapointed to find this), so Gutenburg is actually better in that respect.  Also the PDFs are based on scans, which is clunky compared to plain text.  Gutenburg current big advantage is that is lets you get raw text of books.  With that you can put it on yor iPod/PDA/eBooke reader of choice, and you have a lot more flexibility with how you read it.
What kind of culturally insensitive asshole is your Dad?  Who would think that you would see something like that here on reddit?  Reddit:  The place where if Islam and terrorism are placed in same sentence the racist alarm goes off! So, all your life the first time you have seen a crucifix was in France.  At that it was an ancient church?  A church that was built around the time when a majority of the population was illiterate?  A church built around the time when TV and film weren't around? How someone like you ends up with the wealth and funds to travel around the world should be an embarassment of whatever nation you belong to.
The problem with this strategy is that from a terrorists point of view, it is easy to defeat.  Now all you need is to convince a white middle aged woman to walk on to the plane carrying a bomb.  She'll walk straight past the guard who's busy harassing the asian guy with a beard. Incidentally, one of the suspects in the recent alleged attacks in Britain was a white guy who converted to Islam just 6 months ago.
Now nobody's going to post it, out of spite. Except that they will *now*, out of spite for me. And that statement was, in itself, another self-defeating prophecy. So now people will either post or not post it. You should thank me for bringing the chances up. (And there they go back down again...)
You should read my post above because its speak perfectly to you. Where do you get that 100,000 figure from?  Also, where you this outraged at that number when Saddam had, according Amnesty International, topped the 500k mark?
And taken by [Morgenstern](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oskar_Morgenstern)!
I think it's downright hilarious that one of my more algorithmic snippets of code has seen a factor fifty (50, or alternatively, 'OMGWTF') speed increase, and I regularly get a factor two to three or four.  In my opinion that speaks rather badly of python. It means the "just think pythonic and clean" thing is only half true. Like in Java, you have to consider what it's doing behind the scenes, what the compiler handles well and less well, perhaps the faults of the gc, etc. Like java, python is fast if you don't do (things x, y and z) too much, and no one tells you what they are other than a vague 'yeah, something with objects and memory management'.
"Any sufficiently complicated C or Fortran program contains an ad-hoc, informally-specified bug-ridden slow implementation of half of Common Lisp."
Guess which one was in your post.
Wow, this is really something that can revolutionize the internet and how links are displayed.  I hope this catches on with the search engines...
Good read.
"Give up your job and make do with fewer possessions" I think that's a little obnoxious, to tell you the truth. There are some students whose parents either can't or won't help them pay for college. And financial aid, grants, and scholarships can't always close the gap.  I have a great deal of respect for those students who can balance school, work, and extracurricular activities. I believe the effort and dedication it took to strike that balance will pay off when they hit the job market.
My experience is now several months stale, but I had a terrible time trying to use Rails on shared hosting. Crashes, 500s, memory hogging, inexplicable FCGI errors... it would work fine for a few weeks and then hurl itself back into the chasm of broken responses. I realise that it's the "enterprise" market targeted by Rails' developers--people who have dedicated boxes and can control all the variables. But if they ever expect to break into the space occupied by PHP, they're seriously going to need to lower the barrier to entry. Yes, [try ruby](http://tryruby.hobix.com/) is cute and all, but there are a lot of things about Rails that make it very intimidating to an intermediate-level developer with a passing interest.
Download from Mozilla here: [https://addons.mozilla.org/firefox/743/](https://addons.mozilla.org/firefox/743/)
Exactly! You should -earn- a grade or it becomes meaningless as a market of accomplishment. Disrupting events happen in real life all the time. School should prepare people for dealing with the work-life balance.
I'm not being anti-american, I'm just stating the glaringly obvious.  I find it shocking that you believe there aren't food shortages.  There are tonnes of people who can't afford to eat.  Just because the food is there doesn't mean it's so abundant that everyone can afford it.  And that's just in your part of the world.  There are plenty of places in the world where there isn't enough food to go around.
I was going to leave it as an unspoken subtext for those sophisticated enough to know, but clearly you are not a part of that crowd: Beziers, France, was a major center for the Cathar Christians long ago.  The Pope sent thousands of mercenaries there to kill them all, and this "Christian Army" slaughtered (no doubt post-rape) around 30,000 civilians, women holding their children being hacked to death with knives and axes.  The very church I was in was full of Christians praying that this holy place would give them sanctuary, and 800 of them were butchered within its very walls.  This is where the term "Kill them all, let God sort them out" was first used, because the soldiers asked the commander how to tell the Cathars from the regular christians... the commander meant that God would separate the two after they killed them all.  BTW, the reason the Pope killed all the Cathars is because they practiced humility and charity, and made all the "real christians" look so bad that people were converting right and left. You should read more and take an interest in a broad range of ideas, then people might give you enough money to travel the world (or even pay you to do it).
dugg!
...no unicode? What century do they live in? That's just asking for sorta-kinda-multibyte-maybe and just generally   nasty implementations, like that in PHP where using a string function is like playing russian roulette with your string.   Weird too. Older languages I can understand; since it's a language primitive that everyone and their dog uses you can't just drop in another implementation and hope no one ever thought 'hey, that's just bytes, innit?'. But most other languages of the ninetiesishes are unicode languages, methinks? Everyone has nice and transparent unicode support now, for slightly varying values of 'transparent'. And frankly, we *need* it.
dead link
Random, you make several excellent points! A professor should be understanding without compromising the standards. If the standards are compromised, the value assigned to a grade is ruined for everyone.
Ok so this is a so so entry by Joel but still informative none the less. However I like this article by Steve Yegge much better check it out people if you haven't read it. http://www.cabochon.com/~stevey/blog-rants/choosing-languages.html
Psh. Back in my day we had to walk 30 miles upstream both ways to get to the salt mines. Anyone caught stealing would be iodized right where he stood!
What is your definition of "sympathy"? Do you believe it's the professor's role to violate standards in order to accommodate the special needs of an individual student?
Did this shock anyone who has seen the NBA?
&gt; We can't have a conversation about languages (or anything that's connected with IT) without citing how some multi-billion dollar company does. Good point.  Part of the reason PHP is popular in the first place is because the people who created it focused on something that scaled down to where it was easily usable by people who weren't god's gift to computer science.  Sure, they've written lots of shitty code, but for many people, shitty code that accomplishes something is far, far better than beautiful, elegant code that was just too hard for the person in question to grok and get working. 
The interesting thing is to see if it will break out of its niche.
Thanks for the interesting link. Reading the comments, it's reassuring to know that the OIN can help ward off lawsuits, but I think I still fall on the side of avoiding software patents altogether. As I live in Europe, this position is still possible.
In case it is not clear to everyone, the dishes they are eating out of are shaped like toilets (in Japan). You squat over them and face toward the quarter dome. Quite gross. I'm guessing none of these couples is on a first date.
Hmm... Number of Countries: 196 Number of Continents: 7 Not too shabby, that... 
Okay, I'll explain. The 'lights' case was based on the idea that when cigarettes are lower in nicotine content, people just end up smoking more of them for the same high, so their cancer risk is unchanged. This is why the cigarette companies aren't allowed to certain health-related keywords in their ads. But this new report seems to conclude the opposite: That more nicotine increases addiction. If that's the case, the Kessler ruling last week was factually misguided. Whoops!
&gt; They loved their work... There's the rub.  Every professor thinks that thier topic is the student's priority one.  Multiply that by four, throw in a part time job and you have a real problem for self supported (lower class, cut off) students.
I see Chinese writing in the pictures, but no Japanese writing. It looks as though you're wrong.
Thats a good idea about 'compiling' RoR code to PHP.   As for Reddit being a challenging technical problem, I don't really see it.  Sure theres probably more going on behind the scenes than I realize, but why can't the hot page and the new page be essentially static HTML that is just generated every minute or so?  That would make it blazing fast.  As it is I can't believe how often reddit is slow as f*ck.
I think it's safe to say that Bush is now almost completely insane.  I'm not sure that he is even capable at this point of distinguishing reality from fantasy. What's remarkable is that his descent into utter nonsense has happened so gradually many people have barely noticed.  If immediately after taking office he had proclaimed that he was pursuing a war against a modern, deadly combination of the Nazis and the Russian Commies, a powerful, evil force that posed a grave threat to modern civilization, his delusion would have been apparent to everyone. Instead, the progression from 'we're gonna smoke em out of their holes' to 'this is like World War II plus the Cold War combined' has been gradual enough that there are still people buying it.
Overrated has no bearing on him personally. You seem to be claiming "some people enjoy reading the things he puts out" implies "everything he says has to be right at guru level". He does his thing, and yeah, it's biased.  Show me one coder that isn't biased, who won't ever say something that will provoke a "well, but". I'll save you the time - they basically don't exist. We each do our thing and poke ideas at each other, 's all.
have you ever functioned in a real society, you know where people have tact and don't make brash judgements about the experiences of other people around them?
And in a perfect world with a well-subsidized public university he'd almost be right. But in a state like New York, whose financial aid system has gradually been bled over the past 12 years (the extra costs pushed onto the students), giving up a part-time job was to literally make the choice between food, rent, or clean laundry. Credit cards filled the gap for me, and now it's coming back at 20-25% interest. Extra loans could have covered this, had a co-signer been available.
Exactly! I went to a service academy (West Point) and gave up 8 years of my life to "pay" for school. "This is your job." God, the more I read that line, the more upset I get. It must have been nice to live in a world where all you had to worry about was school.
Excellent article!
Read [this book](http://plus.maths.org/issue20/reviews/book1/) before you decide whether or not *any* trader really knows what the market is going to do next.
That would be one more bit of evidence for those that believe that 9/11 was self-inflicted.
Many programmers make money with [CRUD](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/CRUD_%28acronym%29), so I'm not sure if profitability is any measure of his worthiness as a commentator.
Let me start off by saying that the polygamist groups that hide out in Arizona, Wyoming, Utah, and New Mexico are not Mormons. A "Mormon" is a member of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints. These people are a faction of that organization that broke off around the year 1890 when the Church ceased the practice. I'm usually reluctant to comment on articles like this because I know what follows. Some of you will just lash back with hate-filled comments and snide remarks trying to incite a similar reaction. Let me just save you the trouble. When you make comments about Joseph Smith, or the Church today because of the actions of the polygamists, you are no better than those that hate Muslims because of the 9/11 terrorists. You are no better than members of the Ku Klux Klan or any other terror organization. The LDS Saints are wonderful people that teach love, patience, faith, and righteousness. I am a member of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints. I have a wife, and two kids. I work at a bank. I pay my taxes. I help out those in need. I pray to my Father in Heaven. Just like every other Christian in this world.  I'm sorry for the way polygamists treat the women and children that get caught up in these horrible groups. It's sad and I know that they are breaking the law. They should be punished for their actions...but they are not Mormons. They do not represent us.  If you want to know what Mormons believe just "google" the Thirteen Articles of Faith. It sums up all that we believe in.
How much more reasoned and rational than the Joel article! Also an interesting read from his take on the life cycle of programming languages.
Better not look here, then: http://cryptome.org/nyt-ukterror.htm
Doesn't "borderline significant" mean the same thing as "may or may not be significant"?
There's a balance between efficient markets and inefficient markets, and it's entirely based on the perception of the markets' efficiency. If everyone thinks that prices are already perfect, nobody will do any research, and prices will instantly become imperfect. If everyone thinks prices are random, they'll do lots of research, buy only the underpriced stocks and sell short overpriced ones, and the market *will* become as efficient as it can be. So you're only right insofar as people disagree with you.
It’s amazing how prevalent that attitude is.  I am still finishing my degree but have been working a full time job in the field I am getting a degree in throughout my time in college.  I always get the *school should be your job* line.  Many students are whiners but many professors are arrogant pricks.  I have found the mix of the two very amusing.
Do you know of any research that compares the number of injuries and deaths from people driving without seatbelts with  those who do? I do believe that something like risk compensation is real, but I wonder whether seatbelts actually cause more harm than they do good. I doubt it.
Byrnesy,  True, but Taleb's point is that people (and not just traders, BTW) you get rich doing something automatically think they know something others don't or found a repeatable pattern. So, regardless of how well (or poorly) this guy has done in the markets uptil now, it doesn't mean his advice or insight is necessarily valuable.
and yet they still encourage us to wear seatbelts. it must be an evil conspiracy.
Never understood the whole 'low libido' thing. In my experience pot only enhances that for both parties ;)
Where does he say to give up your job? He said to lower your hours. also, this is just a list of alternatives to free up more time for course work. I suspect that item #2 "Cut back on social events" would provide more time than cutting work hours for most students, however.
I agree with most but the part about rote memorization is just bullshit. People complaining about that don't complain about the memorization part, they complain about the information that is memorized, much more detailed information than necessary.  In the real world today it is much more important to know a skeleton of information of just enough detail to find the specifics on the internet or in books (and to find the right book). Sadly the school and university systems make you memorize all the little details that are really unnecessary because they are easy to test for in exams. Lets take an example. I, as a CS student, need to know what the higher order function map does (a fact they certainly never told me in either school or university lectures), I don't need to know if the function or the list parameter comes first as that part is easy to forget but also easy to look up. I also certainly won't ever need to know the proof for anything in a RL situation (I am not saying they shouldn't mention it in the lecture, but it shouldn't be on the exam) where I can't look it up.
"i'm not bitter, only more arrogant than most of the people posting here ever will be." fixed.
give us a hint. what soundtrack would you prefer? crash test dummies mmm, mmm, mmm, mmm?
Oh, I know. But "Some schmo says X" is not nearly as compelling a headline as "Ancient, wise sage -- veteran of many battles, and deeply-scarred victory over ill fortune and awful circumstance -- offers counsel."
Wow, people are really taking the Wasabi thing seriously and freaking out about it. It was a fuckin' joke, you retards! Grow a sense of humor, *please*.
&gt;So how do we establish diplomatic ties with terrorists?  Of course you don't do that, who suggested it? I call straw man! It's clear that the current wave of terrorist won't be "destroyed" without destroying entire nations. Anyone with half a brain understands that (example) current US behavior in Iraq just fuels conflict and multiplies terrorist number. The more you destroy, the more you create, because they do have children, relatives etc. So, current approach leads only to long lasting, but sure-fire destruction of everything (well, not really, because "terrorist countries" will run out of oil first, at which point West will simply leave and build a fence). And we all know that this is the easy way to operate. West has so vastly superior military power that it's ludicrous even thinking this power isn't sufficient to destroy all there. "Diplomatic means" mentioned above is directed to the governments of "terrorist countries". We know full well that, for example, Saddam's regime didn't really support Bin Laden. The same with Iran etc. If you can make these countries cooperate you are already more protected by their own police. How much, I don't know, but currently, they either a) don't care who of their own does what in US or b) can't care as they have more problems of their own to care. I mean, this should be sooo obvious for anybody: it's been called "divide and conquer" and done routinely for centuries. I'd go on a limb to say that (however nasty it sounds), in our case, it's more human strategy than any other we have...
Yeah, well it used to. After too much smoking it kinda reaches a point of... well. The same with no appetite. I did an MA in Holland for a year and I indulged...a lot. In the beginning I had the munchies like no other, but after a few months I totally lost appetite for anything but really really fresh and healthy food (which is hard to find in the Netherlands imo). But pausing for a while helps both problems. THANK GOD!!!
This one gets the bad headline award for the day. Congratulations!
I agree with every single one of these points. Here's a mostly non-paraphrased exchange I had with a student of mine in the Logic 101 course I taught: * He: Sir, I think we're expected to know too much.  * Me: Really? Well, if there's something you're having trouble with, I can help you.   * He: No, I mean, there's too much to know.  * Me: Well, I disagree. You haven't been up on your homework. Maybe that has something to do with it.  * He: Well, I just don't think this is very important.  * Me: I have to give you a grade, regardless of whether you think this is important. Why did you sign up?  * He: Because it gets me out of math credits.  * Me: I see. Well, unless you'd rather take the math, I suggest you work a little harder... here.  Cry me a river.
&gt;Rails works. Other people have been using it successfully. I've been reading mailing list posts that claim it doesn't scale to a large deal of traffic without major issues. You may want to follow Rails a little more closely to see what's up. e.g. You could lurk on mailing lists or newsgroups.
CakePHP, Grails? Are you serious. Those lame knock offs of Rails that fail miserably. I see people bashing Ruby and Rails for a number of things. One that is young, so the logic is to dismiss it outright instead of growing the new technology. I could recall a time when PHP was a 'risk', after all some language written but a young guy looking for a job - whos gonna bank on that. Or that Java was too slow, not scalable, and untested. Sound familiar? The second reason I see people bashing Rails/Ruby is that people are just absolutely threatened by it. That the media war of Java vs. Ruby has created a populace of uneasy Java developers who show outwardly a pompous posture of superiority while internalizing their fears for the future of java. Which has been under concern by many prior to Rails comming into the spotlight.  I find it a lame argument for not developing and building upon a new technology simply because its new. I'm not saying to rush out to oreilly, buy every Rails book you can find and start deploying applications inside your corporate environment. My point of view is to not overlook the potential of Ruby/Rails purely because its new and harbours a small community. Because in another 2 years, you just might be asking yourself why you didn't learn it.
I think it has something to do with gaining karma quickly.
I'm pretty sure that last paragraph in the original is at least partly a joke, and maybe a troll. Anyone?
Check out the guys arm in the first scene.
For a long time, the goal of US foreign policy has been to prevent significant change in the world order. Traditionally, the US has used covert operations to do it, for example, Reagan's support of Contras in Nicaragua. The new neocon twist is that the US would use it's power to overtly influence nations wherever and whenever it feels compelled. If you look at the Middle East through that prism, it becomes clear that Bush's stated goal of stopping radical extremism isn't the real reason that the US is there. But the American people would never accept the truth, which is the US needs to stay in Iraq to prevent any real democracy from taking hold. That would be way too unpredictable and might lead to a real Middle Eastern power, well financed and sitting atop the most precious commodity on the planet. That's why Bush's speeches appear more and more crazed and the rhetoric more noble. It's becoming harder to sell the war given the reality of the situation, which is that promotion of "a free and democratic Iraq" is the one thing he wants to avoid at all costs.
That was beautiful and surreal. It's even funnier if you speak German. This is not my father's Gamasutra.
He is talking about the Principia and related works (eg Frege) when he says: "[Godel's] discovery undercut the foundations on which mathematics had been built up to the 20th century."  Like most people, Godel never read the Principia anyway.   This article isn't written for logicians or mathematical historians, it's for laypeople.  That's why there are so many pictures.  Anyway, anything less than book length is going to have to skip over many aspects of Godel's work since they are so broad and foreign to everyday ways of thinking.  K. Godel is the greatest logician that ever lived, logic comes from logos, thought.  That means he is on the shortlist of smartest men to ever walk the Earth, summarizing his thought in a article is like reducing the whole Bible to half a page. To all you unrecognized geniuses out there: it is important to keep your intended audience in mind when writing something.   Also, the incompleteness theorem does imply the unsolvability of the halting problem.  It is really a mark of Godel's genius that he solved this problem before it was even be formulated, since nobody had defined "mechanical procedure" until Turing.  That is why Turing is considered the father of the computer program.   The reason it is possible for both ideas to imply each other is that they are equivalent.  It's just a lot easier to prove the Halting problem, which is why it is usually used as an introduction to incompleteness (see Gregory Chaitin's page).
&gt; But "Some schmo says X" is not nearly as compelling a headline as "Ancient, wise sage -- veteran of many battles Bah, you're thinking like a journalist, not an investor. ;) Even Robert Merton -- Nobel Prize winner, helped develop the Black-Scholes equation -- can't consistently beat the market, and had to [close his hedge fund](http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid=20601087&amp;sid=api7F5j8W_nY&amp;refer=home) recently. Now, stop replying, becuase I have to get back to work! ;)
"Leprechauns, unicorns, Bigfoot, the Loch Ness Monster, hobbits, orcs - and students who know the material but don't do well on exams. Mythical creatures." Um...I remember a study coming out on Digg or something not long ago which gave evidence that smarter people really do perform poorly on tests.  So, mister cocky professor, shuvit. EDIT:  Here it is: http://www.livescience.com/humanbiology/050209_under_pressure.html On Digg, Slashdot, and Reddit.
Blog of Andreev Goran. Blog for fun, mobile phones, macedonia, veles, games, software, hardware and more...
Do you actually think when you write this stuff, or is it just whatever knee-jerk horseshit reaction happens to flash across your brain?
I agree with this to a certain extent, but too often, I've seen students tolerate opinions they agree with, but whine all day long about the ones with which they don't agree. While no one likes a "rant," there's nothing wrong with professors and teachers offering their take on things... especially when the material is challenging.
I love you. SVO :)   
I liked them all except for the one about "I didn't want to stand up to the professor." &gt; If you don't have courage in the safe setting of a classroom, when exactly are you planning to develop it? When your boss asks you to falsify figures or lie under oath?  If my boss asks me to lie under oath, I can quit and get a new job.  Millions of people do it every year.  By the time you are 30 you'll probably have already developed the skill. If you run afoul of office politics, you can always bail and move to greener (or at least less-brown) pastures. But very few people change schools.  If you run afoul of campus politics, you can be screwed.  Transferring is of course possible, but it's much more difficult than changing jobs. Most 20-year-olds simply cannot afford to take a stand on principle against their academic instituion.  Now, most colleges are a *lot* more forgiving of dissent than companies are, but it doesn't always apply at the classroom level, and do you really want to gamble that *this* professor isn't going to be one to hold a grudge?   
Craving really fresh and healthy food doesn't seem to be that bad of a thing. But I've never been to Holland..
I guess we'll have to take his word for it... which I don't.
Yeah I was just the same for years of smoking until I saw some  shit you wouldn't believe and on further investigation it turned out not to be unusual. Anecdotal evidence is how we make most of our day-to-day decisions. The link between tobacco and cancer was anecdotal for decades.   
LOLOLOLlOLOL!!!!!!1 M$ is teh suxors!!!!1
Admittedly it took me a minute or two to realize what was going. I get it now. Ah.
Well, there it is, proof: After all these years we've finally determined that Israel is wrong and everyone opposed to Israel is right. Congratulations, you have won the internet.
I know anecdotal evidence is not scientific, but from my experience most of the kids working to put themselves through school didn't have a "life should give me something just cuz" attitude.
I've read that sentence about ten times and my brain still refuses to internalize it.
Is there a FAX machine version  so I can FAX blank paper?
Isn't Autocad written in Lisp?
this looks like making a lot of work just for the gimmik
Can we get them to raid Ted Stevens, too? Please..? Maybe a full body-cavity search, all tubes included?
and here I thought the oldest was in my wallet....
Yeah, I'm in totally the same boat. Now in my 6th year of college (2nd as a senior), I've had to take my time because I'm a salaried worker and can only take night classes. At the smaller schools and universities, they seem to be more understanding (I guess they need the money more). At the large schools, they could care less. The fact that the systems I help develop handle thousands of users responsible for millions of dollars in business doesn't seem to matter. I hate that the fact I'm "only 23" makes all my professors assume that I wasn't there running around on BBSes with them in the late 80s and early 90s while they were in college.  "No mom, I didn't know that when the computer dials it still counts as long distance... but I don't have $600."
looks weird, resembles too many things (tube, injection, vibrator and whatnot..)
FYI, in Germany the number of traffic deaths dropped from 15,207 in 1980 to 5,361 in 2005. What's your explanation for that? It's definitely not because of less traffic. The most likely reason is the introduction of seat belts, air bags, anti-block systems, etc.
Can't be serious. It's like a motor car company releasing carriages again
&gt; That said, I don't personally believe smoking cannabis every once in a while is going to send you to the looney bin. Pretty unlikely I reckon. I'm really talking about people who smoke every day or go on major binges (e.g. smoke or eat enough to start tripping) - but that probably describes most people I've known at some stage.
In Canada, student loans are also readily available. No interest until you graduate, and even then very relaxed payment schedules. "I have to work 20 hours a week so I can pay for my studies." "What about student loans?" "Oh, well I don't want to graduate with debt." Like the article said, choices have consequences. If you don't want to graduate with debt, that's fine. But working while you're studying (in Canada, at least) isn't something you're forced into. It's a choice with consequences.
&gt;My point of view is to not overlook the potential of Ruby/Rails purely because its new and harbours a small community And yet you dismiss CakePHP and Grails so readily? Some people will want to use a framework (yes Rails is a framework, too) to develop web apps in other languages, should they not be able to do that? 
I know, I mean, what is all this fuss about the knapsack problem anyway?
Agreed. This was more bloggish than usual.
&gt; Isn't Autocad written in Lisp? No, AutoLISP was bolted on the core app. I'm currently helping a bunch of people who are desperate to migrate their application from AutoLISP to Java-over-COM because maintaining the AutoLISP application for many years has been a huge drain for the small development company and they haven't been able to add features for quite a while.
Come on. US team is the world champion in United states.
Reading the article, it seems we are dealing with 20 children with the disease currently. When they double their numbers every 22.5 years like the Amish, then in 90 years there will be 80 children effected.  Of course it is sad, and maybe something can be done like DNA-testing. But it's hardly a national disaster. I have trouble with the tone of the article. One can have objections against the Mormons. But it is strange to use an inbreeding problem which currently effects 20 children as an argument. Well the actual argument is that Arizona taxpayers pay for health care. It is more interesting to calculate how long it takes before half of the US population is Amish or Mormon. And discuss how one can prevent that from happening (if desired). Maybe drop a small atomic bomb on them?
And apparently Iowa, North Dakota, Wyoming, Delaware, Vermont, Maine and Alaska are the only safe havens.
Well, wikipedia [says about socialism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Socialism): &gt;As an economic system, socialism is usually associated with state or collective ownership of the means of production. This control may be either direct, exercised through popular collectives such as workers' councils, or it may be indirect, exercised on behalf of the people by the state. I don't know what "black-and-white thinker" is supposed to mean in your mind, and I don't know if you're disputing my comment about the ownership of work under socialism. But the rest of the world tends to think this way about socialism, and besides trying to demonstrate your own intelligence, I'm not quite sure what you're getting at.
&gt; More important is, why does enterprise matters so much? Because the cost of copying software is zero, and once you create a solution that solves the problems X, Y and Z, it's a waste of money to create a new solution to solve only problems X and Y and train people to use two solutions where only one would suffice. It might be a lot of fun to learn how to solve X and Y and it might be really boring to learn Z, in the end it's much more important that you get the job done, feed your family and help the world than to do the job poorly to entertain yourself.
Yes.
If we are serious about colonization of other planets, someone has to develop similar devices for humans...
It is becoming nearly impossible to find words to describe the downward death spiral of the usurper puppet Bush. I appreciate the efforts of all those who try, since they are expanding the English language thereby.
nice! excellent analysis. your intellect is truly intimidating. islamic terrorists are a subset of islmamic people. therefore 100% of islamic terrorists are muslims. would you go fishing in the desert? do the math clown. and easy with the pig references - that's offensive to muslims.  
Eh, not really. Despite the various forms socialism takes, nearly all agree that "social control" of labor and capital is necessary. Hence the whole "individual not owning their own output" thing. Confusing socialism with communism would be more like whether the state jails opponents, or merely shoots them.
If someone wants to use those frameworks, that is just fine. I'm not stating the Rails is the only and absolute framework to use. However the author of the previous post stated that it was not even worth looking into RoR due to the fact that those other frameworks exist. Not taking into consideration that those frameworks are inspired by Rails. Was I a bit harsh with my statement? Yes. I just don't think that those frameworks that try to emulate rails can do what it does as effectively. And using those frameworks as an argument to say we don't need Rails is self defeating.
&gt; completely intact, as is its orginal users' manual, written in Latin. Classicists! Worried about the declining interest in Classics? Perhaps you should challenge your students with texts beyond Caesar, Cicero, _et alia_. (^_^)
How many times a month do you frequent the same hair stylist, grocery store, coffee shop, tanning salon, gym, doctor's office, restaurant or other service and see that sweet hottie that is always so nice to you? You see her and she always treats you like a king with a big smile and you get the vibe that maybe - just maybe - you could make a move.
if your in the back without a belt you will most likly kill the person in front of you as you fly about the car - as what the advert displayed.
It's not really a "shock" -- they did pooly at Worlds in 2002 (something like 6th or 7th place), barely got the bronze in the last Olympics, and looked bad (even though they won) beating Germany in this tournament. I Suppose some will say "but they didn't have Shaq, Kobe, et. al.", but I'm not sure it's a given anymore, even with those guys. I feel bad for Coach K, though: he seems to represent the right ideals for running the team, and I hope USA Backetball doesn't dump him for this loss.
Yeah, seriously, it _has_ to be a joke, right?  Right?
Well, if its true its not actually that contradictory.  Its not like Wasabi has its own runtime, it 'compiles' into PHP... so its really more like an advanced IDE.
...and don't forget to flip-off every Hummer you see. Bonus points for Escalades.
I have flown over two million miles over the last 15 years. In all that,I can think of little reason I would need to take aboard a liquid of any kind. Besides, United now serves Starbucks. David S. Freid  http://www.eastsidejanitorial.com
HomeGrownRadio trawls the rubbish to bring you the best free internet radio stations on the internet
by your logic the USA has the moral equivalence of the KKK and islamic terrorists.
Rails has a bigger footprint hosting-wise because it provides more out of the box. Really, I think Rails is targetted more at the Java low-to-mid end than it is at PHP.
Ruby is fairly nice. I've been recently introduced to the language through the test framework, WATIR. So far i'm lovin it.   
Still no support for IE7. As much as I hate IE, I need that...
This free interoperability demo introduces users to the simplicity with which the newly converged WS-RT and WS-RP specifications and existent OASIS specification standards will be able to interoperate with each other. It includes an online demonstration hosted on alphaWorks with an AJAX-based Web service client, a tool for interoperability testing, which sends SOAP messages to a WS-RT/WS-RP Web service.
You are far too worked up about grades.  When I am interviewing someone, I give their GPA a cursory look, but rarely if ever do I look at individual grades -- whether or not you are considerd for the job is almost entirely whether or not you are a useless tool in the interview or if you seem like the kind of person who relishes learning and doing.
Well I'm from the Albany area, and it's a nickname I picked up during my impressionable youth while listening to the local classic rock station's morning DJs. (Mason and Sheehan, if that's relevant to anyone here.)  'Tis part of what explains my irreverence toward just about everything.
How toilet paper can make you happy.
Last night we reached office at around 9:00 PM armed with sticky note, aluminum foil, memo notes etc. This operation took about an hour and $10.
&gt; You contradicted yourself by first saying I was finding "extensions to your thoughts which don't exist", and then confirming that, in fact, you did support keeping people on life support (with qualifications). Thus, those thoughts did exist. No. I said that the extension that I unilaterally support keeping all braindead people on life support didn't exist. And it doesn't. If you had asked "so you support keeping some braindead people on life support" you would have been correct, but asking "so you support keeping braindead people on life support" was incorrect.
Shamelessly, this is my own personal blog.
Once a quarter there is a wave of "news" and postings about SaaS, Web 2.0 and the end of Enterprise Software as we know it. Now we have recent posts have the grim reaper running amok in the software world again...
Seriously... Ben Stevens is not U.S. Senator but the president of the *Alaskan* Senate. In other news, my neighbor picked up her newspaper this morning.
I don't submit things because they will get me good karma. I do it because I want to share with the community. I mean, sure, it's nice to see something get some votes, but if you look at what makes the "hot" page, it's clear that _quality_ is not a necessary condition for popularity.
Funny to see the readers of this comment react. You see, it was constructed to be able to be read in two equally valid ways: 1. Flying on an aeroplane is a privilege, not a right. So, racial profiling can be used. If they don't like it, they don't have to fly.  2. Flying on an aeroplane is a privilege, not a right. So, quit bitching about your having to wait in line and asking that other people's real human rights be trampled. If you don't like it, you don't have to fly. From the mods, my guess is that it was read to be #1. Congratulations, and thanks for helping me with this little reddit experiment.
I love Ruby, and Rails seems to work nicely, but I still don't trust it enough for something to deploy in front of people where an error page means a lost sale or a pissed-off customer. That's what Joel said: RoR *isn't there yet*.  It continues to improve, and I hope it will someday be enough that I won't have to think twice before putting something major behind it. But that day has not yet arrived.  Keep on urging the Ruby and ROR communities to improve performance, though, and that day will arrive sooner. 
``He taught me a lot about ethics and values,'' says George H.W. Bush, 82. ``He's a very energetic man of great character.'' Says it all.
I think the thrust of the article is the third reason: Given the high variability in output, Denmark was able to stabilize by partnering with regional neighbors who have both a greater supply/demand stability **and** greater control over supply management. Essentially, they are able to do on a national level what a grid-tied home with solar or wind power is able to do:  Reduce their demand and ocasionally spin their meter backwards. When it's windy enough in Denmark, Norway and Sweden end up generating **less** electricity from hydro power.
Funny.. this reminds of how jews got threatened in the 1930's. .. :(    
How do unit tests fit into this picture?
It strikes me as a matter of investment. You're investing in university, and like most investments it will tie up your time/money for awhile before it pays back. Seeing it that way clarifies things. Just like investing in real estate, if you don't have the seed capital, you can't make the investment. And like any other investment, it may still be worth your while (though much less so) to invest on loan - you just have to be fairly sure the returns will exceed the interest.
This is a controversial debate I started on AsYetUnnamed. Although it never really ended, someday someone will deside to revive it, or so I hope.   Enjoy,  ~Jim
They're saying: "who cares? Go away, spammer."
Polls show that the public sways it's opinion whenever the wind blows.  If the public really questions it's credibility, it'd stop electing party representatives that vote in lock step w/the assministration.  Unfortunately, this is a reality of party politics.  I suppose we'll see if anything changes in November.  I kinda doubt it. 
The part about developing a language called Wasabi is a joke.   "functional-programming dialect of Basic" Does anyone actually believe this is true?
Oh, can't I? You're not the boss of me. I do what I want. There I just did it...and I included some not-so-obvious ideas too!
please- your incessant "racist little shits" comments are just as annoying as smoovement's. STFU, **both of you**!
under the terms of the agreement hezbollah was supposed to disarm. they have refused. hezbollah has been in violation of the cease fire 24 hours a day since it began. that's a fact.
i'm always amused at how some comments on these sites get modded down. This one prob will be too; not because it's a wrong comment or even a bad one but because it challenges weak opinions of the masses and makes them uncomfy. education is good. but education as you are executing it is not education. it's just another social institution programming mindless worker drones. (and poor ones at that) excellent comment bhauth. i think i agree with most everything. it's so frustrating to wonder why so much money is spent on such worthless and insubstantial instruction. all of the profs i've been party to were jokes, and i've never, ever been impressed with any. i have yet to see where college has actually given anyone any skills or knowledge they couldn't have gotten on their own. in less time, and with far less money wasted. if that wasn't enough, i have to work shoulder to shoulder with the disgusting bile coming out of the college money machine. every day. indeed, it's hard not to be bitter knowing we are of the same human race. 
Funny, I was just thinking the exact same thing.  Submitted a story, immediately lost 2 karma.  Lame.
Including, say, Hungarians (whose non-Indo-European ancestors are realtively late arrivals) but not those Jews whose ancestors have been in Europe since the height of Rome, is curious, to say the least. Edited for readability
Reddit is a joke and a scam. I have observed posts being automatically modded down with in seconds of submitting. It looks as though peoples blogs get more points than any submission I've made.  IT's very strange that a video can be in the top 100 on google and youtube, but post it here and its a big fat 0 Either Reddit's user base is retarded or just bogas... Have you ever used Google Analytics for a Reddit post? The bounce rate is 100% on the trickle of traffic they provide. Reddit is nothing more than an ego boost for some developers.
&gt; Actually, i do it too. I'd go so far as to say it should be a required exercise during beginning programming classes. I did do that in a beginning programming class. It was a C++ based class that taught, what I now know to be, a strictly limited and mostly sane subset of C++. The class consisted of about thirty minutes introducing a concept, thirty minutes working out an implementation on paper, and two more sessions trying to figure out why it wouldn't compile. I found after a little bit of trial and error that spending a little more time thinking on paper saved a lot of time sitting in front of a bitchy compiler. Now that I have mostly forgotten all of that C++ and work in dynamic languages I don't do this as much, but it does still heavily influence how I write code.
It works just fine for plenty of things - any errors are going to be because you didn't get to know it well enough, or didn't test it thoroughly.  Nothing out of the ordinary there. Clearly, there are Large Apps for which it is ill suited.  I don't know enough to really tell you where the boundary is at the moment, so perhaps for you it isn't there, but for others it is. It's a disruptive technology - it's "not good enough" to compete with the top end of Java apps, but it works a lot better when compared with PHP apps (because it's cleaner and faster to work with), and with Java apps that don't really need all the horsepower that some of that technology gives you.  And since it's fast to code with, you can spend more time improving the actual applications.
You know, not everyone needs parents to get them through college. I went to a private school that cost $21,000 a year (which I guess is about average now). But my parents didn't give me anything. I took out loans to pay for school.  But the payoff was worth it. Because of my college degree, I got a good job, and I will completely pay off my school loans, as well as a brand new car, in just four years.  It's possible.
I don't doubt it has some issues - it's very young, after all.  Out of curiousity (and not at all meaning to imply that you're making that up!), could you post some links to what you've seen, so as to give us an idea of exactly what sorts of problems were encountered? 
Being smart doesn't equal being knowledgeable (which is what exams test). It can often mean being skilled at coasting on general knowledge, light reading and snap judgement. Which will none of them tell you the formula for volume of a sphere, unless you're so ridiculously smart you can invent one on the fly.
&gt; Here's the problem. If somebody begins the work that will make 'cond' true on a lower priority thread (the producer), and then the timing of the program is such that the higher priority thread that issues this spinning (the consumer) gets scheduled, the consumer will starve the producer completely. Blaming thread priorities for a problem with a high-priority consumer that _spins_ instead of blocking when it's producer is low-priority when running on a system with a notoriously bad scheduler&amp;#8253; If you actually had a good reason for spinning instead of blocking, then you should be smart enough to realize that priority is going to be a problem in such an unusual case.
Not having the video autoplay would be nice.
&gt; I incur no costs on my commute to take the bus as it's actually faster getting home that way than it would be to sit in stop and go traffic. That's the part that makes it a different scenario.  For many people, taking public transportation takes much more time, and that was the point of the article. For example, I live in Pittsburgh.  If I drive to work, it takes between 15 and 30 minutes (depending on whether I want to pay for parking or not).  Taking the bus takes anywhere from 45 to sometimes as high as 90 minutes thanks to an unreliable schedule and unexpected detours and route changes.  This includes a 15 minute (uphill) walk to the bus stop and another 10 to work.  And of course, there's some sort of subjective cost to uncertainty.  Also, the walk and bus-stop-waiting have variable cost depending on the weather.
silly humans.. using pig intestines and milk to prevent diseases &amp; pregnancy, boiling cow bones to make jello, curdling cheese w/the stomach lining of cows, ... seriously tho, would you put that on your d'ck?
I was so worried this would be a photo of under my bed.
""Give up your job and make do with fewer possessions"" "I think that's a little obnoxious, to tell you the truth." He doesn't say that though, he says: "Cut back on work hours and accept a lower standard of living and fewer possessions" which seems far better, and that is of course only one of the 5 suggestions he offers, so it's not like that's the only way out.  His point seems pretty straight-forward: you want to study, work and party but time is too short; either cut back on one/two/all of them, or spent more years in school to get it all.  He is against solving it by "faking" learning, giving good grades to people who don't know the material, which is quite understandable, as annoying as it can be (incredibly annoying some times - dag nabbit!).
_Did God create Evil? Stay tuned for our exclusive interview... what's that, it's just some random people on the Internet with opinions? Never mind._
I'm just providing *my* interpretation of the circumstances--based on experiences in the Toronto public school system--and attempting to resolve that with the judge's differing conclusion. But the howling mob has already decided who won the discussion, so there's little point in continuing.
This is a new site, but its such a great idea. You can post events of food festivals, chat to other foodies, and get your favourite recipes online. You can rate other peoples recipes and comment on them.  Delicious
Most any identifiable group went through a period when there was tight breeding. That doesn't mean we now call them inbred. For instance, by the normal meaning of inbred, we can't say that all Amerindians (minus the Athabascas groups, if you like) are inbred. But if you far enough back, they do come from very limited genetic stock. Why? Because over time, the separate Amerindian groups have developed the sorts of mutations typical of our species and now display considerable diversity. The far-flung circumstances of historical Judaism have accomplished the same thing among Jews. Further, the fact that every few centuries the Jews of any one area would have to flee state-sponsored riots and genocide, dispersing to other Jewish communities, has prevented long-term localaized stagnatnt gene pools.
higher driver age limits?  harder tests?  stricter laws enforcing driver accountability, jail time and loss of license for life?  enhanced training? smarter drivers? have the number of car crashes dropped as drastically as the number of deaths?
What howling mob? I can give you law to back up my argument (_Tinker_, for starters). Either you can do that or you can not. Besides which, this happened in the U.S., so don't you think the outcome here ought to conform with U.S. law, rather than Canadian?
If you act rationally, you take risks to achieve something. What are the business objectives I can achieve with Ruby on Rails that I cannot achieve with Seam on Java EE 5? (Edit: for the uninitiated, this is Seam: http://docs.jboss.com/seam/latest/reference/en/html/tutorial.html#blog )
Yes. And still making aggresive action is Israel. Now if you were still surrounded by murderers, would you disarm?
We have social norms that directly, and laws that indirectly denounce this behavior when it is conducted with alcohol. If pot were to be legalized I would think it would be under approximately the same conditions.
same way the neocons are [leading america into wars](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=3413981665021820769&amp;q=power+of+nightmares&amp;hl=en) and destroying the bill of rights. they most likely were the ones [behind 911](http://www.fpp.co.uk/online/01/12/WTC_Mysteries3.html) too.
I want both Ruby and ROR to be better, which doesn't happen by wishful thinking, but rather via the developers expending an effort to make them better. This includes making them faster and giving them more libraries. There's no fundamental reason that Ruby can't be as fast as, say, Perl.
so white men *can jump
Scary stuff... though, one wonders whether it was the "country" that was 90% white, or just the community in which he lived. Maybe he ought to have taken a trip to Mississippi, sometime.
a very different and very interesting perspective on problem customers. short and too the point.
Is Islam a "religion of peace" as some claim?
We're not talking about absolutes here.  Sure a middle-aged white woman *might* be convinced to do such a thing - but it is much more likely that the terrorists themselves would do it, as they continue to do.  Sure *1* of the suspects in Britain was a white convert - how many were not.  Statistically, it seems ridiculous to say that because some people don't fit the mold, that the mold is worthless and discardable.
Great article on a touchy topic!  The key to fighting returns . . . PROMOTE, PROMOTE, PROMOTE!!!
Wasabi probably allows the use of libraries in its target languages, and it runs on the target languages' platforms.  I believe the main issues with non-mainstream languages are libraries and platforms, not programmers.  Programmers are flexible, while libraries usually only work with one language, and libraries and languages only work well on certain platforms.
That sucks for the guy that didn't wear his seatbelt for being blamed for killing all of his friends when clearly the video evidence shows another car (drunkenly?) racing around a corner and swerving into their lane to hit their car head-on.  Meanwhile, the car behind them simply honks its horn thinking they will get out of the way before he slams into them. And seatbelts are the culprit!?
Warren Jeffs was captured Monday night. If you want to now more about Colorado City, fumerase and Warren Jeffs, check out this new documentary: www.bankingonheaven.com. It's an astonishing examination of this polygamous cult. The lead character had two children with fumerase.
I have two young (read: messy) kids and a wife who works in job where she deals with the public (and so must have nice clean clothes daily).  I don't do wash *every* day, but I'd say that between the clothing and the bed linens I do enough loads a week to average about a load a day.  It helps that I got a water-conserving front-load washing machine.  It uses about half as much water per load, is gentler on the clothes, and the high-speed spin gets out more water so that  the clothes don't spend as long in the dryer or on the line. 
For selling the pot that dad grew.  You pick a word: hypocrite works for me...
When God created creatures capable of choice (angels, humans), he created the potential for evil.  Choose a particular evil: A lie. God identified Satan as a lier and the father of lies. God did not create the evil of falshood, but when he created reasoning creatures, he created the potential that the creatures created could utter falshoods. In this particular instance, Satan is identified as the first creature to exercise this option. All other evil activity can similarly be shown to be choices taken by creatures capable of choice. Evil is not a property of the universe and was not created when God created the universe. It is the result of choices made by creatures with the capacity to choose. In this sense, we create evil.
That headline is as sensationalist as any implying that past performance indicates future success!   To clarify--Robert Merton's company, which runs many different hedge funds, recently decided to shut down one that wasn't raising funds as quickly as they'd like.  It had nothing to do with performance, and Merton didn't even manage it. Also, Taleb's book makes important points in a jumbled and confused way.  I'm somewhat biased against him personally though, because in real life he's a total ass.
Researchers are touting the use of liquid crystalline polymers (LCP) as a viable tool for use in devices such as the sought-after lab-on-a-chip technology.
&gt;So, the speech sends the head buzzing with [*cognitive dissonances*](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cognitive_dissonance).  "You keep using that word. I do not think it means what you think it means."
The 2005 survey is located here http://www.census.gov/acs/www/Downloads/SQuest05.pdf
How much do you get for doing this? I'm just curious.
when i read the bible i was struck by the amount of inbreeding. i think it was isaac's parents who were pissed because he wanted to marry someone who *wasn't* his first cousin! back in tribal days i guess it was pretty common to marry your relatives since there weren't too many other people around who shared your religion or territory. but it does seem that historically jewish people tended to marry pretty close relatives since they were pushed to marry other jews rather than non-jews of whatever population they were embedded in.
&gt;If someone wants to use those frameworks, that is just fine. You stated in your post that CakePHP and Grails "fail miserably".  Do you have proof of these failures?  I have never used either framework but have heard of other people using them just fine. Though my original post may have seemed critical of RoR, I never stated that it is a failure.  RoR works. &gt;However the author of the previous post stated that it was not even worth looking into RoR due to the fact that those other frameworks exist. Ruby's failing is not the language or even the Rails framework.  Rails was a nice "kick to the balls" for all those complicated web frameworks out there.  People studied Rails and copied its ideas back in to the other languages.  And thats where RoRs problem lies: it has been duplicated.  Feel free to study Rails.  Go buy bunches of OReilly books on the subject if you want.  But RoR, like Joel and many others will point out, has no niche in the world. Most companies have legacy code and programmers hired for a particular language skillset.  Dropping all that code, or rewriting it in Ruby, AND retraining all in-house/contract programmers in a new language is a huge waste of time and resources.  This is why there are hardly any employers looking for Ruby programmers. New web shops have to either risk using RoR or going with the Big Three (PHP, Java, .NET).  Virtually EVERYONE uses the Big Three.  If you go with the Big Three you are ensured to readily find support, commericial and open source libraries to fit almost any need, and programmers with years of experience. &gt;Ruby has created a populace of uneasy Java developers who show outwardly a pompous posture of superiority while internalizing their fears for the future of java. All Java programmers I know seem concerned about .NET, not Ruby.  Ruby is actually in a pitched running battle against Python.  PHP just sits on a throne as king of LAMP. 
I think you hit it in the head with your last question.  It seems to me that a big explainer of the data is that cars have become a lot safer since 1980.  Engineers have done a lot more tricks which tend to save more lives in accidents; so even if the number of accidents is comparable to the 1980 level, you would expect the number of deaths to drop.
Efficiency?
s/mediocreness/mediocrity/ mediocreness is redundant to mediocre whereas mediocrity is the property that renders one mediocre. English is funny that way.
Which Joel article? The one I think you are talking about *is* very reasoned and rational. If you are in a big business Ruby is a questionable choice at the moment. In all fairness Python is in about the same boat, although I think it does have more selling points in this space. Ruby is an awesome tool for some startups. It is really good for quick turnaround on anything but really large projects or something that requires a lot of integration with legacy systems. Outside of that space though, the time saved due to Ruby vs. the time spent on developing the libraries you need becomes a questionable equation.
That is a terrible misconception.  Plenty of departments (at least at my old school) worked together to ensure that assignments and exams were well spread out, so there was less conflict.  In other departments, if you had lots of stuff due on one day, several professors would give project extensions if you ask, and do so ahead of time.
I've noticed some articles are instantly dropped by reddit (posted by others). I've clicked a few of them right away, but refreshing the new list and they're gone moments later.   
I hate those ads, they play them on TV and they make me feel ill. I have been in several car accidents with one ending up in ICU, its not fun and I don't like being shown it on TV again and again. So please, wear your freaking seatbelt so I don't have to see these commercials ever again. Same goes for car insurance commercials, those are just as evil.
Umm... ads are NSFW
Free energy?
Very interesting...if a publisher wants a chance on the shelves, they'd better be prepared for the eventuality of returns!
What is it about Republican [cronies](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Michael_D._Brown) and [horses](http://66.102.7.104/search?q=cache:64HpVqsWBccJ:www.awhitehorse.com/editorials/brown_resignation.html+IAHA+%22mike+brown%22&amp;hl=en&amp;client=firefox-a)?
"[Fascism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fascism) is a radical totalitarian political philosophy that combines elements of corporatism, authoritarianism, extreme nationalism, militarism, anti-anarchism, anti-communism and anti-liberalism." Any of that sound familiar, ring a bell maybe?  Not so much a guy in a funny hat getting shot on a huge sand pile, but [someone](http://www.google.com/search?q=failure&amp;start=0&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official ) [else](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dick_Cheney)[...](http://news.google.com/news?q=rumsfeld&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;oe=UTF-8&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wn)
&gt; Robert Merton's company, which runs many different hedge funds, recently decided to shut down one that wasn't raising funds as quickly as they'd like. It had nothing to do with performance Hmmm... not sure about that; if your returns are good, you'll find raising money is easy and vice-versa -- not sure you can say they're unrelated. Anyway, not picking on Merton, just showing that even someone like him can have his down times, too. &gt; in real life he's a total ass. Well, someone can make a valid point even though you don't like them personally, [right](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ad_hominem)? You seem like a pleasant person, though. 
All about bare mineral, vitamin, supplement and health foods
Besides if profitability was the only gauge of value then 'people' who write perl scripts for spammmers are worth more than Linus Torvalds.
You don't necessarily need parents, but you do need a cosigner with very good credit.
I don't know if it's a scam, but it does habe its faults. It really depends on how people go about theor modding. Some people will downmod everything they don't want to read and upmod everything else. I am sure there are vendettas against certain individuals so that some get downmodded just for being from a specific user. Personally I only upmod articles that I really like, or want other people to read. I only downmod articles that I really do not like (I rarely downmod articles at all.). The problem is that there are too many submission so that stuff can get lost pretty fast. That reddit doesn't put stuff to the top that Google and Youtub have on their top 100 is not a problem. If I want to see what is popular tehre I will go there. I think subreddits would solve some of the problems, but maybe not.
Find a few redditors who have similar taste in articles/posts as you and add each other as "reddit friends". Then use friends.reddit.com to view posts only from friends. This will allow your "friends group" to read and vote on each other's post without fear of them being buried in the flood of newer posts. As for me, I hate these posts which keep whining about karma and "quality" of reddit. What are you going to do with reddit karma, buy cookies??? As for "quality" of reddit, we have this idiot commenting on this post wondering why videos from Google's top 100 are not appreciated by bogas[sic] redditors. All I have to say is, Thank God for that!   
I agree with you. But niels said "Just because you have a company that makes money..." and so my reply was in that context.
Well in the US, federal loans don't cover everything even at public colleges so you need a cosigner with very good credit to get private ones.
The article would have benefitted if the author had consulted more sources. There is little dispute that the German Reich was closer to dictatorship than republic from 1930, at the latest [1932](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Preu%C3%9Fenschlag). Hindenburg was anything but a democrat (think a monarchist Norman Schwarzkopf at age 85) but even the Social Democrats rallied their supporters' votes behind him only to prevent Hitler's presidency. After 1930, all chancellors (who execute the actual political power) were appointed by the president, as the article states correctly. Hitler wasn't the first dictator in Germany, only the first one who had the clout to solidify his dictatorship.
We lost through no fault of our own. This team is far and away better than the one in Athens and the one in Worlds. We lost because we had no 3pt-shooting, through no fault of our own. Redd and Billups pulled out and Kobe got hurt. We'll at least get third, and we're slowly makin' our way up the mountain again.
Why post the NYT version?  It's the just the AP article.  They didn't even send anyone to cover the Worlds.   Neither did a lot of the major newspapers, which is why internet journalism has emerged as the best way to follow the WBC.  Screw the Times, I can get the AP writeup anywhere.
the thing i find so frustrating is that my tax dollars go to support this stupid crap. i don't know what the solution is, but cutting off government financial support of their ridiculous lifestyle choices is a good start.
&gt; FogBugz is written in Wasabi, a very advanced,   &gt; functional-programming dialect of Basic with closures and   &gt; lambdas and Rails-like active records that can be compiled   &gt; down to VBScript, JavaScript, PHP4 or PHP5. Can't... stop... laughing... Wow! Just wow. So, we're supposed to "wait until the language has really proven itself" and "don't use a framework you'll have trouble finding programmers for." Unless you're Fog Creek. Then it's OK, because--you know--they're just smart like that. I'd never thought I'd hear the phrase "advanced functional-programming dialect of basic". This is just too much.
&gt; higher driver age limits? Nope. &gt; harder tests? Nope. &gt; stricter laws enforcing driver accountability, jail time and loss of license for life? Nope.  &gt; enhanced training? Nope. &gt; smarter drivers? Nope. &gt; have the number of car crashes dropped as drastically as the number of deaths? Nope. In case you understand German: [http://www.destatis.de/themen/d/thm_verkehr.php](http://www.destatis.de/themen/d/thm_verkehr.php). I'm an MD and I still remember how one of our professors in med school told us about how passionately he and his collegues fought (and had to fight) for the introduction of seat belts in the '70s. One of their opponents back then was the ADAC (German AAA). After the statistics got better and better year after year even the ADAC acknowledged its mistake and is now a big advocate of mandatory seat belts.
That line definitely upsets me. Not that I used the excuse ever, but I did have a job, and frankly, it was _far_ more important to me in terms of practicality. I went to school completely on financial aid, and not having a job basically meant not having any money left over for food after the rent was paid. I walked several miles to purchase the cheapest groceries I could find. Yes, my fancy degree is lovely now, but it would have been useless to me if I starved to death. I guess I could have lived homeless, but that would have been conceding _too_ much just to get an education. I'd bet the whims and notions of homeless life would have really hampered any actual learning.  Not that it can't be done, of course. There are many a story of the struggling student living in 24 hour lounges and taking food and showers where they could find it. I am simply saying I doubt that _I_ could do it. How many of us really could. I worked a job that paid $17.50 an hour. Absurd for a student, I'm sure. But that job required me to commit a certain number of hours each week with almost no exception, except of course, under truly exceptional circumstances. That is to say, it was a proper job. On top of that, 5 classes with labs (2 hours, twice a week; 5 hours every thursday, and so on). I wonder if this professor would advocate taking a lower paying job that would allow me to work more flexible hours (a fallacy: I'd have to work more to maintain any standard of living) or to stop taking classes. To professors: I understand that your job is to educate and our primary function when we sign that paper that says we are coming to your school is to learn. You *must* realize though, that you are _not_ the only professor in the school, nor do you have the only projects and assignments due. Money is important. Just because it flows to you like _water down a hill_ does not mean we enjoy the same luxury. I can't simply drop classes because unlike you, _I_ am on a prescribed schedule from which it is difficult to deviate. If you cannot understand any of these things, then you sir, are a jackass.
It's not just learning to stay quiet that's a valuable skill, it's knowing when to that's important -- pick your fights carefully.  You're right that some profs have an opinion and that your grade depends upon agreeing with them.  I've had 1 or 2, and they suck.  Others, however, respect other peoples' opinions, so here you'd best NOT shut up if you disagree.
Is this the same ad campaign with the commercial that goes something like "Marijuana is safe, because it makes you sit on the couch... I'll take the danger of the real world."?  I love that one.
&gt; It is really good for quick turnaround on anything but really large projects Not all projects at big companies are big.  Would you redo amazon.com in Rails?  No, clearly a bad idea.  Would you use rails for an internal pilot project?  Quite possibly.
The great thing about him making statements like this is that intelligent people who gather info from various, often disparate sources, and make their minds up on issues like the war on terror and Iraq can clearly see that it is Bush and his regime that are either a) deluded or b) making up stuff in an attempt to get themselves out of a corner and maybe c) that their agendas are completely different to those with a social conscience. This will mean that the rest of the world will stop blaming America and focus on blaming the regime, as soem (dare I say most) Americans have been doing ever since they got in power. That's step 1. Step 2 - getting rid of him, and step 3 - educating the people that voted for him so this doesn't happen again seem to be the tough ones. Apologies for the seriously long sentence up there...   
I think it is downright hilarious that you are complaining about being able to write code without really caring much about the speed of it and then being able to get a 2-50x speed increase without changing anything. Please try doing that in other languages and see how often it happens. If not knowing the truly slow things in Python bugs you this much then do your research and figure it out. I personally end up waiting until it becomes an issue and trying to rearchitect the slower points to use more code that is written in C. With enough trickery you can turn a suprising number of loops into list comprehensions, which move orders of magnitude faster.   
I don't really get articles like this and books talking about using Ruby in the enterprise. The kind of companies that are using Java are not the kind of companies that can or will use Ruby due to performance issues, libraries, enterprise-culture (where a lot of companies spend more time planning for a 3-man project than a single person could get done by himself), etc. Those companies aren't really looking for massive productivity gains. Those companies in a lot of cases frankly aren't interested in giving single programmers so much power to either do great things or to screw things up. Java is a very conservative choice, and it fits most companies. It just seems like a very strange market to go after - trying to convert Java users to Ruby. Out of any dynamic language to convert Java users to, I'd say Python, but that's another point all-together. It fits a nice middle-ground between something like Java and something like Ruby, though has warts of its own when it comes to using it in large companies. Frankly Ruby at this point in time is mainly good at one thing: relatively simple web-apps which aren't going to take massive loads and aren't dealing with lots of outside libraries. How many companies that use Java make a lot of apps like that? What would be nice is a static language (like Java) which is fast, efficient, 'safe', but isn't so verbose. Maybe like a statically-typed Python. Does anything like that exist?
Like most of life, it's about choices.  I had to work full time while going through school*, and as a result it took me 6 years to get a B.S. degree. I wasn't about to ask a prof to give me a good grade in spite of not doing good work just because I was busy! *Rant about walking 10 miles to school through 5 feet of snow uphill both ways w/ newspapers on my feet optional :)
the goal was not to point blame, but to illustrate that even if your not in the wrong while driving you could get in an accident, and thats why you should always wear your seatbelt your an excellent driver, but everyone else's driving still sucks and can kill you
Aw. You're too kind. And anyway, the BBC is a fine news source no matter who's doing the submitting. That said, of course I think it's just a blip. The EU advocates even less sustainable policies than the US (Japan is, as far as I know, a bit worse -- their debt load is utterly ludicrous, and they're still in a Keynsian funk). I guess you could read it as a tribute to the indomitable forces of capitalism: Even in a super-regulated, anti-business environment, people will find a way to get a little richer.
developer productivity, agility
Before I respond, let me say that I know there are plenty of bad students that don’t work hard enough, and then try and push their own failures onto the professor. However, there are also plenty of bad teachers and broken systems.  I should probably point out that I graduated several years ago, but I’m sure it hasn’t changed that much since then. &gt;This Course Covered Too Much Material... Because too much material usually means that the approach is shallow.  If all I want is a lot of material flung at me, I’ll read a book.  That’s considerably more material for considerably less money. When students complain of “too much material” they usually mean the teacher didn’t take the sufficient time to explain the material.  That is, after all, what a teacher does.   &gt;The Expected Grade Just for Coming to Class is a B Do you know where this idea comes from?  High School.  You got mostly A’s and B’s in HS or you didn’t get into college, remember? &gt;I Studied for Hours Usually this is just the student venting, and sometimes it’s because they actually care what their professor thinks about them.  Some subjects are just innately harder for certain people.  They may have studied for 5 hours and still failed. &gt;I Know The Material - I Just Don't Do Well on Exams I am really good at taking exams, which results in (believe it or not) lots of A’s and B’s on tests that I didn’t study for.  I *didn’t* know the material, but I still did well on the exam.  Doesn’t it seem possible that the opposite occurs? &gt;Students Are Customers And don’t forget it.  I once had a professor *stop class* to yell at me for reading the newspaper while he was talking.  This was a lecture class with hundreds of people, so I obviously wasn’t disturbing anyone.  And he wasn’t even lecturing *about* the material. I do pay to go to class.  I can do as I like, as long as I do not disturb the other students.  But I must, of course, take whatever grade I deserve from homework, exams, and papers. &gt;Do I Need to Know This? No, probably not.  I learned more about my subject of choice in one week at my job than I did in 4 years of college.  Go figure! &gt;This Course Wasn't Relevant That would probably be a result of universities forcing students to take classes that have nothing to do with their interests or what they want to do when they graduate, wouldn’t it? &gt;Call me elitist… Okay, you’re elitist. My grandfather taught psychology at a university for innumerable years, and I never *once* heard him complain about the students this way.
Efficiency goes two ways: * Programmer productivity  * Software efficiency I don't think Rails meets point #2. Sure, I can quickly build something in Rails, but if 2 months later I'm having to tear that down because it can't take server loads (obviously I'm talking about large apps), or I'm having to write a library from scratch (this goes back to point #1), I've just lost out on that initial arguement about efficiency.
&gt; The kind of companies that are using Java are not the kind of companies that can or will use Ruby due to performance issues, I'd actually be willing to bet good money that there are a lot of people using Java just because they hopped on the bandwagon.  They'd probably do quite well with rails as far as the technology itself is concerned.
i wouldn't have agreed to a deal i had no intention of honoring.
Inconceivable!!
&gt; It seems to me that a big explainer of the data is that cars have become a lot safer since 1980. Yes, but the major reason why people do survive crashes more often nowadays is the introduction (and wide acceptance) of seat belts in Germany.  The med school teacher I mentioned in my other [comment](http://reddit.com/info/fwri/comments/cfy2x) used to show us photos of crash victims who hit the windshield or the steering wheel. Even at low speed the injuries are horrible and often deadly (for the high rate of head injuries).
But Osama bin Laden didn't start a war, he uses terrorism. And the default goal of terrorism is to spread terror to make people do things they otherwise wouldn't consider doing.
I am surprised that the VW Passat isn't in here - go to Beijing or Shanghai and they are *everywhere.*
&gt; you can turn a suprising number of loops into list comprehensions, which move orders of magnitude faster. Isn't that basically how Matlab works?
I tried this software on a paper where both sides are full. The output was not blank. there is a bug somewhere but i can't figure out.
sosuke, with all due respect, perhaps I should edit my post and add &lt;sarcasm&gt; tags around it?  The commercial speaks for itself: Wear you damn seatbelt, fool!  I was simply making an attempt at being funny, if for no other reason than that I've not fully awaken to my day and my coffee cup is still half-full.
The fund shut down after four months.  I guess that you're saying if Merton could really beat the market then there'd be huge demand for everything associated with him, but in this particular case it seems like a stretch.  And I'm not saying your example is worthless, just that Bloomberg's reporting is sensationalist in the story you link. I'll see your "ad hominem" and raise you a "non sequitur".  Wtf?  That's exactly what I was trying to say about Taleb--he's writing about very important topics and generally has the right things to say about them, but does so in the a way that I find annoying.  So yes, he has a good point, but I wish he were better at articulating it and not so smug. Also, he rides a Vespa.  Case closed.
as an atheist, i have to say that every single mormon i've met was nice. they seem to be amongst the most well-adjusted people i've known and tend to be extremely good parents. they don't try to shove their religion down other people's throats and they are tolerant of others' beliefs without feeling like their own are threatened. most religions in my opinion seem to make people more annoying and belligerent, but mormonism for whatever reason seems to do the opposite. when it comes to polygamy though...according to my understanding, polygamy was the norm in the mormon church (since polygamy is after all in accordance with the bible). then when utah wanted to join the union, one of the conditions was that the state must outlaw polygamy, which it did. while most mormons accepted the new dictates of the church, others felt that it was a betrayal in order to kowtow to a secular authority (the federal government), and so splintered off into these various polygamous sects of mormonism. i would think that the polygamous sects are more in line with the religion created by joseph smith than 'mainstream mormonism' would be.
Ah, the CS tests I had in college were mostly (particularly at the higher levels) open book and open notes.  The tests did NOT cover things that were rote memorization (language syntax and crap), but you needed a clue on these otherwise you'd never have time to finish.  OTOH, even if you memorized your notes, you had to THINK, and if you didn't do that, you failed.
&gt; No way the bank I use is going with RoR. Not in a decade. BTW, their site uses Java. If the banking industry is an example of how "enterprise" software is the answer, this whole argument needs to die. I use a lot of financial institutions (2 banks, 8 credit card issuers, 3 stock broker / mutual funds) persoanlly.  Every damn one of them has a website that sucks, _sucks_, **sucks**. They're all badly designed with hostile user interfaces.  They're slow.  They're often down or have significant functionality unavailable.  They're fragile, often throwing mysterious untrapped exceptions.  I haven't made any attempt to probe, but I suspect they're also a lot more insecure than should be tolerable for financial information. If the typical bank's website is an example of websites built for "the enterprise", then the enterprise developers all need to be sent off to flip burgers before they hurt anyone else. 
lol, glad to hear your head is infact on straight, but someone else might already have thought as i did, so now its in good ol' black and white, now that you mention coffee ive got to go top off my cup
I'm not saying I support this guy at all, he clearly needs to go. But, I think the title here is misleading. He wasn't gambling, he owned race horses. You wouldn't say that someone who owned a car racing team was gambling, right?  Maybe I missed something in the article?
Dammit, I thought this was going to be two version of the board game "Risk" adapted for online play.  Can someone post those instead?
sucks d00d, I too have been in a couple of accidents and it's no fun... no ICU, so I can't relate to that but I've had close friends and family that haven't been as fortunate as either of us -- they're no longer here. anyway, I didn't mean to be a ass in my post above, and I'm sorry you have to relive your accident everytime a commerical like this airs.
"[Islamism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Islamism) is a set of [political ideologies](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism) that hold that Islam is not only a religion, but also a [political system](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism) that [governs](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism) the [legal](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism), [economic](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism) and [social imperatives](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism) of the [state](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Facism) according to its interpretation of [Islamic Law](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Islamism)."
[That's as generic as compliments come](http://www.google.co.uk/search?hl=en&amp;q=bush+%22man+of+great+character%22&amp;btnG=Search&amp;meta=).
reusable?  ugh!!!
We need a new space transportation system I agree but how will we continue building without a 'space pickup truck' like that of a space shuttle? It just seems like a step backward with an Apollo type setup.
See, just because so many idiots like you keep saying that, I am 100% convinced that the US is stronger than ever. Oh, and maybe the fact that all the numbers and economics say that as well. Thanks.
So this guy was out of stocks in the 1920's.  In 1921, the DJIA was ~75, it was ~200 by 1928, so already there he gave up a 260% gain (~15% compound APY for 7 years).   It wasn't until 1932 when the DJIA bottomed out at 41, but then it was back up to 200 by 1937.   If he held until 1956, the DJIA was 500, a 660% gain for the 35 years from 1921 until 1956, about a 5.5% compound APY.  Let's take it to 1965 at DJIA 1000, a 6% compound APY for the 44 years. So did this guy really beat this with bonds? Stocks are for the long term...
Keep in mind that finance is one of the only professions that automatically rewards contrarians: If the extent of your analysis is "Everybody thinks X must be true, and X is probably -- though not necessarily -- true," you will eventually get rich. Common knowledge tends to get priced into the market pretty quickly, so if everyone 'knows' that oil is going up, and you agree with them, the best you can hope for is average performance. If everyone 'knows' it, and it turns out to be wrong...
Agree there. Terrorism is a method that anyone can indulge in states and non-states alike.
True, but lets list of the constraints for using ruby/rails in a big company project: * should probably not require unicode support  * should not require extensive support from libraries for integration  * (rails only)should not require the use of a legacy database that does not conform to the rails opinion  * should not require a large development team, as it will be difficult to find experienced developers  * should not require a lot of training for your existing developers, as those resources are hard to find  * should have the resources to purchase multiple boxes to handle scaling for either (ruby)computationally intensive tasks or (rails)ones that require a lot of connections That is a pretty hefty list. My personal favorite (Python) doesn't really do too well against just those requirements either, and it has the eternally-braindead "significant whitespace sucks" argument against it too. In fact all but the first three[1] apply to Python, and I could probably find some more that just go against Python if I tried. IMO it is a good thing to be able to know and admit where your language is just not applicable, or not the best choice. I am not trying to bash on ruby or rails, I just don't think it is time to bring them into big business projects. Getting burned on an early adoption attempt will probably kill the chances of that language ever being used by that company again. I doubt that is what anyone wants. [1] edit: This used to say "the first two", but that statement reflected my own experience more than it did the state of Python. Thanks, evgen.
Well, if I made it to 105, I get out stocks, too. It's not like I would have 20 years to see that money grow.
That's a misleading title.  She never said she intended on marrying Leinart.
Yet people are afraid.  This should be simple and obvious.  Is it really so hard for you to understand?  Terrorism is a very visible way to die.  Hence, people are afraid. Look, now we're debating reality.  People *are* afraid.  All your rationality will not change that fact.  Whether they should be is *totally* beside the point and irrelevant.
&gt; It's like saying... Fair enough. &gt; All dbenhur mentioned was exposing kids to views that may be unpopular--to suggest that statement is a repudiation of public decency laws and their unequivocal abolition is not only false and misleading, but you're trying to find a conflict where none exists. My concern is with people (like j-o-h-n) who seem to be heralding this as a big win for free-speech advocates, when the school **objected to the images of the drugs, not the slogan about the president**. Even the first-level court found this: &gt; After Guiles, who was suspended for one day because of the shirt, sued school officials in U.S. District Court in Vermont, a judge found that his First Amendment rights were violated but that the school could censor some images on the shirt. But then the appeals court ruled that **the school couldn't censor any of the shirt**, presumably because of its political message. The logical extension of this ruling is that in Vermont schools, you can wear whatever the hell you want, so long as it's political speech.
In all fairness, you kind of have to expect the head of the armed forces to be kind of hawkish and prone to hide his doubts, don't you?  Even if he knows it's all over, he can't just come out and say "Fuck it, we got our asses kicked and we shouldn't have been there to begin with, screw this!"  - that would probably be an even bigger disaster on many levels.  Anyway, great soldiers are meant to fight on against any odds, even if they are [utterly hopeless](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Battle_of_Thermopylae).   You can tell from the talk about Iraqi forces taking over (Rummy memo to staff:"don't call it Iraqization!") in a year (as they are being blown up daily and selling equipment and even being lynched in the streets!) that the Dept of Defense is aching to find a halfway decent scheme to just get out of this catastrophic mess.
You and 59 million other voters...
And if you can't put together a coherent sentence, people will be unlikely to listen to anything you say.
Why post linkjacked crap? Link to the actual post!
You're also required to begin your trip by walking through peoples yards and houses/buildings.
So I guess that's where the phrase "Tie one on" comes from. 
&gt; I guess that you're saying if Merton could really beat the market then there'd be huge demand for everything associated with him I've only seen funds get shut down for two reasons: (1) the get into legal/regulatory trouble, and (2) the returns are bad (limited partners want out, new investors are hard to find) So I'm not sure why Merton would just wind it down if it's not b/c of performance.   Did he just get bored, like the Kiko guys? &gt; I'll see your "ad hominem" and raise you a "non sequitur" It's not a non-sequitur: you don't like the guy, and therefore you don't like what he has to saw, even if you (grudgingly) admit what he says might have some value. &gt; he rides a Vespa. Case closed. LOL -- ok, whatever.
That's one of the biggest Technorati problems. Slam your posts with all the tags you can think of and you'll start to push yourself into places you shouldn't be. As far as I know they're working on a way to make the crawler bump away posts that have spam-level tagging, but I'm not sure how that would work.
On the one hand you acknowledge that his essay is not accessible to those who disagree with his views because of the manner in which it is written, and on the other hand you want to argue with me point-by-point about how it is not written in such a hostile manner.   Furthermore, you, seemingly un-self-consciously, refer to those on the right with whom you've talked as being "caught up in a kind of here worship that causes them to defend Bush in a kind of knee-jerk reaction".  It's the attitude itself I find harmful - not whether you can successfully hide your scorn when the need arises. There are two ways to preach to the choir.  One is in private, with those on your own side and without nay-sayers who might spoil a good rah-rah rally, and the other kind is in full view of everyone, where your insults can have maximum effect on both sides.  I don't know which is worse.
Wow. The main problem I see with that US team is it has a lot of firepower but not a lot of defense. The saying is overused, but it is absolutely true, for just about any sport, "defense wins championships".
So, a professor should just give you marks even when you haven't performed because your situation warrents it? And btw, professors don't make as much money as you seem to think they do.
http://technomancy.us/images/joelonshark.jpg
Unless you want multi-hour exams, they can't cover everything in any depth.  So they must sample your knowledge.  If it is a reasonable sampling, then it is a valid test of your overall knowledge.  If the tests sample the same subset year after year then the lazy prof gets what they deserve when they get gamed like they did by you.
The article fails to mention that US GDP grew 2.9% YoY in the second quarter, but 2.6% in Europe.
"should probably not require unicode support" I don't know, I never had problems with ISO-8859-1 for french and english (which I use). "should not require extensive support from libraries for integration" Ruby has a fair share of libraries.  In all honesty, Java, Python and Perl have more, but Ruby's selection is still pretty good. "(rails only)should not require the use of a legacy database that does not conform to the rails opinion" Last I heard, there was a plugin that was easy to use to integrate with a legacy database. "# should not require a large development team, as it will be difficult to find experienced developers  # should not require a lot of training for your existing developers, as those resources are hard to find" Damn!  What did we think moving away from COBOL?!  If programmers learned Java, what prevents them from learning Python or Ruby?  Especially since they are both much simpler than java. "should have the resources to purchase multiple boxes to handle scaling for either (ruby)computationally intensive tasks or (rails)ones that require a lot of connections" I keep hearing the people "against" Rails and Ruby bringing this up as an argument and Ruby people saying that's not true.  Can we get a benchmark or something please? 
hello? finding a route from madrid to new york is a wee bit less algorithmically complex than the knapsack problem, no? i mean, the number of possible combinations here i could enumerate with the fingers of my one hand. 
I imagine less people can afford a Passat. It probably has competition with other less expensive VW cars, such as Jetta and Golf..
You don't know very much about EU, do you?
a statically-typed Python?  A more dynamic java?  Hmm...  [Nice](http://www-128.ibm.com/developerworks/library/j-alj10064.html ) is almost what you're looking for, though I'm not sure it's a language I would choose for my own projects. I personally think Jython or JRuby is the way to sneak dynamic languages in the door.  You're not going to slay the java monster overnight (or even in 10 years).  Being able to tell a non-techie PHB that yes, we're still technically developing in java is priceless.
yes which changes nothing pertinent to the point i'm making
I think I can summarize this whole article in one sentance: "DHH attempts to prove he is incapable of applying context in a discussion." I don't use Ruby. I don't use Rails. I am not entirely qualified to make specific statements about either platform. Given these facts I am in a perfect position to pretend to be a big business project manager making a decision about Ruby and/or Rails. Let me put on my imaginary "big business project manager" cap and tell you what I think. Neither Ruby, nor Rails, can be trusted for a big project. They are both new[1], and haven't had time to prove out yet. Being new it will be difficult for us to hire experienced developers, and even harder to find training for our existing ones. From what I have heard Ruby doesn't have a lot of libraries, so it will probably be difficult to get it working with FOO, BAR, and BAZ, which are critical parts of our infrastructure. The language is supposed to be really slow. Even Python guys are bragging about their language being faster, and Java beats the pants of Python. From what I have seen Rails is "opinionated software". It evidently does not work very well if you try to do something differently from how the Rails developers think it should be done. John told me that it is hard to get it to work with databases that are not built in a specific way. There is no Unicode support, from what I have heard. I don't know how this can be true, but that is a darned important feature. /removes project manager hat Does that help at all? Ruby (and Rails) is (are) awesome for some things, but big business projects aren't it. You will have a hard sell *and* will run into (pick one: lack of libraries, poor unicode support, no developers, slow execution speed) at least once. If you like either work on fixing these problems so we *can* use a better language in the big shops, don't just sit around and call Joel wrong, or stupid, or both because you are not understanding the context he is speaking from. [1] According to most project managers the age of a language is documented in trade rags, not on the language's website. Ruby was pretty obscure up until Rails came on the scene, which makes both of them about the same age. I don't agree with the metric either, but just see how far you get in trying to change the mind of someone who uses it.
Not really, no. I read the news, and I've read a reasonable amount of history, but I'm definitely not an expert. What was your quibble?
But there's a lot of stuff where more than one solution is necessary.  SAP pretty much, in one way or the other, is capable of solving all kinds of business problems.  Doesn't mean you'd want to throw it at a small business... Some things are well suited to large companies, but that doesn't mean there isn't a large range of possible niches below that, where other solutions might be preferable.
IIRC, Ericsson no longer uses Erlang (as in, no longer writes software in it -- existing Erlang software is likely still in use). Nortel is the big user of it right now.
If everybody 'knows' that oil is going up, then everybody buys oil, and oil *does* go up.  Am I missing something?
&gt;i have yet to see where college has actually given anyone any skills or knowledge they couldn't have gotten on their own. in less time, and with far less money wasted. After 20 years in industry, I have to say that my observations are exactly opposite to yours.  There are lots of people who think they can teach themselves everything (and have tried) and they pretty much useless when compared against people who have taught themselves in conjunction with a good university program.  It takes a lot of time and money to reinvent the wheel
Actually just an interesting benchmark for me was this: Last week an article of mine about why I chose Python over Ruby got on the frontpage. Basically it outlined why for a file conversion app, Ruby's speed and libraries weren't cutting it. I rewrote that app in Python the past two weeks, and I finally got it at the same point my Ruby app was. Basically the app works like this: a user uploads a CSV, DBASE, or Excel file and then the app converts it to a tab-delimited file and runs statistical analysis on it (line counts, etc). It has a simple Rails interface. I used Pylons as my Python framework. When all was said and done, for a 7 MB Excel file, my Rails app took 27 seconds (and probably would have been slower if I wasn't actually using a Python Excel library to convert it), the PHP app which I had originally converted it from took over a minute (! - this seemed to be due to a crappy Excel reader, but I didn't write it so I don't know), and my Python app took 20 seconds. By using Psyco I was able to get the Python app down to 9 seconds. That is 3 times as fast as my Rails app. Cliffnotes: * PHP - over a minute  * Rails - 27 seconds  * Python - 20 seconds  * Python w/Psyco - 9 seconds
People 'in bonds' in the sense that they work with bonds don't necessarily have returns that track the returns from bonds. Salomon Brothers made serious money during the 70's and 80's when bond prices flopped up and down drastically, because they were a trading firm, and volatility drives trading returns. And Michael Milken made something like 100% annually for a while during the late 70's, even though the bonds he was trading didn't even return half that during their best years. *Edit: I do agree that as an asset class, stocks are pretty hard to beat. Though on a risk-adjusted basis, high-yield bonds might be better.*
&gt; The BIG 3 web technologies are PHP, .NET, and Java. You're forgetting Perl, the language that built the web. It may not be as popular as it once was, but suggesting it's not important and proven is indicative of a very short memory.
Yeah, I'm just missing where their living in the streets would be better. Bolivia isn't a first-world country you know.
Yes. If everybody knows it, they have bought it, and it has gone up. Think about it: If your idea was correct, then the way to make money would be to look at what everyone thought would happen and bet that it would happen. But if you did that, you would add to the people who thought something would happen, which (according to your logic) would make such a sure thing even more sure. Basically, if you're right, trends will never reverse because every action makes further action more likely.
To put it lightly I think DHH is a bit of a spaz. Somebody writes an article just a little negative or Rails or Ruby and you can almost always expect an over-the-top rebuttal within a day or two. I mean, honestly, DHH didn't even offer much of a rebuttal here. He just ranted for 5 paragraphs. The real question might be - do enterprises want to use something like Rails when the poster-boy for it is so 'opinionated' that he reacts to criticism about his framework like that? It wasn't as if Joel was even being rude towards DHH (which DHH was towards him), nor overly critical of Ruby. He just expressed his own concerns about using it.
The cliff the lemming in front of you fell over.
Pretty accurate list in my opinion.  But there are a lot of little apps out there that fit that description pretty well - and even more waiting to be written now that the cost of writing and maintaining them is low enough.
Does your programmer productivity include both the initial developer productivity, weighed at 20%, and maintenance programmer productivity, weighed at 80%?
&gt; your an excellent driver, but everyone else's driving still sucks and can kill you My dad used to tell me that all the time when I was learning to drive a few years ago, That and parallel parking were some of the toughest lessons I learned.
Until the 'public belief' is saturated at which time it can only go down. That's the problem with speculative bubbles, suckers just aren't being born fast enough.
That post was link-a-licious.
*Your* logic, baby, not mine.
You also want grading policies that best discern the differences between your future doctors.  If everyone is squeezed into the A-B range (A, A-, B+, B) that gives you a whole lot less discernment than an A-F range (A, A- ... D-, F).  And if it keeps up we may well have just (A=good, A-=no good). So the problem isn't the profs who use the whole grading scale...
Doesn't it work because of all the windmills?
So, what kind of peak are we talking about? For example, at a previous company we built a LAMP stack eccomerce app that needed to handle the customer volume driven by national prime-time on-air direct response ads.  Work it out: audience = 25M, 0.3% of that audience arrives in the 15 minutes following the ad air =&gt; 75K visits / 15 minutes =&gt; 5K visits / minute =&gt; ~100 visits /second =&gt; ~85 new sessions/second ~2-400 page requests /second. We managed this with mod_perl in 1999 on three dual pII-400s backed by a quad xeon-500 db server.  Today, RoR + MySql | PostgreSQL sites can sustain ~75-150 requests/sec/cpu. One quad-core opteron box with 12GB of memory would likely easily run the entire stack under this load (not that you wouldn't want a more redundant cluster for reliablility and headroom). So, you see, these frameworks actually can handle pretty high load peaks on relatively trivial hardware. The number of websites that actually need to handle 300 req/sec and 30K simultaneous users is extremely rare, in fact the vast majority of sites don't see more than 30K users in a day -- even sites run by big companies. Most enterpise apps aren't even external facing customer web-sites potentially subject to massive flash mobs.  They're internal facing systems designed to manage the business' internal processes or external facing systems for use by the business' fairly limited pool of partners, suppliers, clients, etc. &gt; And, y'know, the enterprisey folks who have any real work experience have a pretty good empirical idea of how rare they are or are not. The level of condescension in your post was rather palpable. If most of them actually produced software of value instead of routinely overbilling for total crap, I'd be less condescending. I do not deny that there are some big hard systems out there that probably shouldn't be built on lightweight RAD web stacks.  Really.  Total agreement.  But there's a huge body of shitty software engineers arguing that every trivial little thing needs very expensive treatment on badly performing architectures.  These people cost business a lot of money and deliver about 10% of what they should months or years late and they need to be taken down a notch. 
I think it's a plot by the Republican Party to boost its numbers.
Oh great, another meaningless gesture by the Demos. Here's a clue guys, we don't have a parlimentary system "no confidence" votes are meaningless. Why don't you try to articulate a plan instead of this meaningless stunt; unless you actually, you know, want to lose the election.
Squeak would be actually awesome (as opposed to brightly colored) if it was actually documented so an outsider could do something non-trivial after, oh, say, DAYS of dinking with it. Believe me I tried. That community (last I checked) is really steeped in a lot of info transfer via personal contact or something. Outsiders are left with no clues pointing to good starting points. 
&gt; I’ve read a couple of blog entries from folks coming back to Python after jumping on the Rails bandwagon, citing the temperament of the community as one of the reasons. The Rails community has always seemed ... immature, defensive ... I am not sure exactly what the word I am looking for is here. I see a lot of hand wavey arguments in every technical discussion, but I have seen Rails proponents make some truly blatant ones. That, and DHH is a prick. He may write good software, but he can be a real jackass sometimes. This latest spat between him and Joel really just highlights this point for me. Instead of trying to understand what Joel is saying, he cherry picks statements to cast the whole article as FUD. This isn't the first time I have seen this crap. Granted, having one of the lead developers for your project be a jackass doesn't necessarily hurt it (see OpenBSD/Theo) but I just can't stand listening to him and the herd of me-too's involved. As a plug for my personal horse in this race, check out [Kevin Dangoor](http://www.blueskyonmars.com), the lead programmer for [TurboGears](http://www.turbogears.org). I have never seen him be anything but curteous and respectful. He also writes awesome software.
Sweet! The real shark uteri (sp???) just aren't cutting it anymore. FINALLY, someone has addressed this critical issue.
funny, i just submitted a story about paris Hilton [actually hacking](http://reddit.com/info/fy9c/comments) someone's voicemail.
Ruby is pretty slow, even compared to other scripting languages.  Of course, like all scripting languages, you can redo really expensive stuff in C via the API, although that presents problems of its own.
again.. have the number of car crashes dropped as drastically as the number of deaths?  you mention "statistics", what were the numbers involved in those equations? if not, then i might consider that the sole reason deaths have decreased is because of encouraged seat belt use.
can you answer [these questions](http://reddit.com/info/fwri/comments/cfyb4)?
It doesn't quite work that way. There are some great built-in feedback mechanisms. One is that people who blindly follow trends will end up being average or worse, so they won't have as much money -- which means they influence prices less. Another issue is that investor assumptions will be automatically rendered less correct if acted upon: Whenever investors think that a given industry will have higher returns in the future, they lower that industry's cost of capital (think of how easy it was to start a software company in 1999). But with a lower cost of capital, companies will raise more money and invest more money, increasing the supply of whatever it is that they sell, which, of course, will lower the price and thus reduce the industry's return on capital. That's why, historically, the stocks that investors consider growthiest, and thus buy at higher price/earnings and price/book ratios, tend to have *lower* growth later on. Sometimes these feedback mechanisms can break down (in my 1999 example, the high-supply/low-price problem wasn't considered a problem, because investors *expected* losses for a while). When they break down, you do see bubbles, in which more and more capital is controlled by trend-followers. But unless they're doing something economically productive, their activity is eventually going to be punished, to the benefit of whichever contrarians haven't gone bankrupt in the interim. My first investment-related job was working for a company founded in March of 2000 -- the month the Nasdaq peaked. Fortunately, this was a company that totally eschewed tech stocks, and bought lots of traditional, dowdy industrial companies nobody has ever heard of. Their returns were *great*, even though the market as a whole tanked. It takes some serious independence to start a company that uses the unpopular strategy of buying the least popular stocks, but in the end, it pays off.
So where do Christian Arabs fit? Or, you know, the rest of the majority of humanity not covered by 1-7? Is a Chinese Buddhist more or less trusted than an Eastern European atheist? Sorry, feeling pedantic this morning. Season with smilies to taste.
nope. i don't lump free governments in with terrorists. not all killing is morally equal.  take wwii for example.
Georgette Heyer is one of the most beloved writers of the 20th century. This is a review/appreciation of one of her best works.
There are some very similar ads here, slow-mo car-crash, perhaps even more tugging at the heart strings:  http://www.devilducky.com/media/50123/  and  http://www.devilducky.com/media/29124/ (note: the speed you see is km/h, not mi/h)
"Hitler returned to the Reichstag every four years to renew the “temporary” delegation of emergency powers that it had given him to deal with the Reichstag-arson crisis." Its almost too easy. "Bush returned to the Capitol every four years to renew the “temporary” delegation of emergency powers that it had given him to deal with the WTC crisis."
While some people are big fans of Slate, others visit Salon religiously. This is one person's story...
Agreed.  Many of the strongest people I know are the ones who have to work or take on a lot of debt to get through school.
What a great religion, that covers all these aspects!
You mean, like Israel did?
The figures I've seen put them between 100 and 150.  Yeah, it's not really that much money.  A lot of major software companies start you out in that area.
&gt; I don't know, I never had problems with ISO-8859-1 for french and english (which I use). Although it is awesome that it works for you, will you at least admit that your language choices and feature usage may lie in the subset of the Ruby environment that does have decent support? &gt; Ruby has a fair share of libraries. In all honesty, Java, Python and Perl have more, but Ruby's selection is still pretty good. That is the problem. Depending on what you need Ruby may not  have it. Obviously that needs to be investigated *before* you make the platform decision, but it is still a valid point. &gt; Damn! What did we think moving away from COBOL?! If programmers learned Java, what prevents them from learning Python or Ruby? Especially since they are both much simpler than java. Well, there are nowhere near as many books, workshops, and other "formal" resources for Python or Ruby. Big business thrives on these things for training. You can argue all day about how easy it is to learn, but for most managers unless it is in a book (or fifteen) or a class it doesn't exist. &gt; I keep hearing the people "against" Rails and Ruby bringing this up as an argument and Ruby people saying that's not true. Can we get a benchmark or something please? A usually cited reference is the alioth shootout. You can find a comparison of Ruby and Python using it [here](http://shootout.alioth.debian.org/gp4/benchmark.php?test=all&amp;lang=ruby&amp;lang2=python) Note that, in the graph, white bars to the left represent better times with Python. White bars to the right represent Better times with Ruby. The length of the bar represents the speed factor difference between the two. In short, Python beats the pants off Ruby in just about every test. Now change it to compare Ruby and Java to see what happens. I don't really have a similar easy reference for Rails, but I feel safe in stating that being based on Ruby will cause similar problems.
One problem I have about exams vs the material is that many students that manage A's for the course couldn't manage an A in the lab. In the certification world, the people who can do the work often don't have certifications, and the certified people often can't do the work.  They can only spout off the material they learned in class. Not to say that all certified people can't do the work or that all uncertified persons can do it.  It's that the tests often don't reflect reality. Quite often, the exams can be problems because someone who knows the material doesn't entirely understand the exam.  You have to decipher the freaking professor's mode of thought when he wrote the question. From SNL: "Just remember, you can't have too much water in the reactor".
A vote of non-confidence (at-least in a parlimentary system), is when the opposition parties introduce a bill into parliament stating they have no confidence in the Head of Government/Ruling Party to lead the country. This can happen only in a minority government (when the total number of seats of the ruling party  is lesser than all other parties combined). In this case, if all the other parties vote together against the ruling party, then that will be a majority of the vote. This will force the government to dissolve parliament and set a date for an election. I personally dont see how this relates what the Democrats are doing, getting one minister to resign will only lead the White House to appoint another one who shares their beliefs.  In a parliament, no-confidence basically signals that a majority of the people do not believe the ruling party and its ideologies can lead the country any more
About a year ago, my girlfriend and I were making a very short two-minute drive from the video store to our apartment. Usually on such short trips I wouldn't bother wearing my seatbelt, but for some reason that particular day I did buckle up. As we passed through an intersection on a quiet street, a college kid who wasn't paying attention ran straight through a standing red light and smashed into our driver's side at about 40-50 mph. My girlfriend's SUV did a complete 360-degree barrel roll on impact, finally landing on the sidewalk right side up. The car was totalled, but we were ultimately uninjured except for some whiplash. If I ever feel like terrifying myself a bit I can think about the way I would have been violently thrown around the interior of the rolling vehicle if I hadn't been wearing my seatbelt that day. You won't get any argument from me about the value of seatbelts.
Modded down for unknown plugin on Linux.
The country I grew up in, when I grew up in the 1820s, was 89 or 90 percent English.  I liked that country. Now that we are in the 1860s, we have all these goddamn wops and krauts and, worst of all, goddamn filthy papist micks like Buchanan.
israel never agreed to allow hizbollah to rearm. their 70 strikes were the result of hizbolla's noncompliance with terms of the cease fire.  israel is in 100% compliance. hizbollah is in 0% compliance.  
Ooooh, Wikipedia says something.  Wow. People own things in Sweden. &gt;I don't know what "black-and-white thinker" is supposed to mean in your mind I don't doubt that.
Surely no one believe that wasabi paragraph was meant to be taken seriously? functional BASIC with closures? Come on...
I just took a look at your history and you aren't worth talking to.
I missed three Ajax capable IDE's from my list from earlier in the week. 
An interesting hypothesis, but you need some data to back it up. Since  &gt; it is generally accepted then it shouldn't be too hard to find some support.
It was. Man, grade school was awesome. Junior high was nice too. Damn jobs.
I think you missed out on the part where I agree with you completely. My comment was in relation to the counter-factual, &gt; Basically, if you're right, trends will never reverse because every action makes further action more likely. and I was essentially saying that *even* if he were right, trends would *still* reverse.
calculated bastard.. nice!
No, the "entitled" are the kids whose parents pay for tuition, car, gas, food, rent, books, and beer. "My daddy's paying your salary! I deserve an A!"
What sucks is that it takes incidents like the one you went through (and some I've gone through) to make people realize the truth. Generally, people who make a habit out of not wearing seatbelts have never been in an accident. Once they get in one, it usually scares them straight if they aren't killed.
Note the staggering reduction in cost: US$100 to about US$2.65.  Stops two sorts of bleeding!
"I form the light, and create darkness; I make peace *and create evil*; I the Lord do all these things." -- Isaiah 45:7 
&gt;Perhaps it is time Americans ask their leaders:  "How long we can continue this dangerous diplomacy of bias and blunders combined with arrogance and ignorance and how many more Americans and others have to be sacrificed for us to learn that this lopsided policy in the Middle East is like waiting for a time bomb to explode?"   
It never dies? Tell that to my two dead iBooks.
Give the Catholic church another hundred years ...
I don't know about goals, but the ad did focus on blame. Whose fault? Easy, "the guy without the seat belt did the damage". Can we forgive him? No way, how can we when there is "no excuse"? I do not know how many lives are saved by seat belts, if any, and I do not know how efficient this ad is in brainwashing people into wearing them (let's not pretend ads do anything else, especially not something that involves conscious and rational deliberation of the subject), but I can tell you this: I wouldn't blame the guy without the seat belt. Firstly, because there are way too many parameters to establish blame, but mostly because I do not find this blame strategy very productive. Not my cup of tea at all, to say nothing of the horrible bullshit title. Mod down.
I dont know why but I find this very funny. :)  Good spoof.
Oh, sorry. I guess I went a little overboard there; I was just trying to describe how many ways markets bounce back from weirdness.
It wasn't exactly hypocritical. There was an unspoken assumption made by the post... if you're asking which language you should use for a project, that implies inexperience with the choices. It also implies you're not the type of developer that *writes their own language* whent hey need to. In house, he has developers capable of language development, and so they have skills that most (99%) development teams do not. Any advice will be wrong for some people... that doesn't make it bad advice, or hypocritical. That said, I'm not sure I agree with him. Since RoR is a completely open platform, I see nothing wrong with using it right now... you can always fix something if it is broken. I don't consider myself a great programmer, but even I've fixed a couple small bugs in the Rails framework. It's VERY easy to read and understand. Due to the ability to dive right into framework code and make changes, I think that makes Rails a viable alternative faster than it would be for other platforms. I don't have experience with Python, but I suspect the same is true there since it also is an open language. Myrddin
hey look at that, an [Ad Hominem](http://www.don-lindsay-archive.org/skeptic/arguments.html#hominem) attack! that's number one on the list of [fallacious arguments](http://www.don-lindsay-archive.org/skeptic/arguments.html). well if you're going to suck at debating, you might as well suck efficiently. well played mr kulisz. well played indeed.
because old people used to think your soul was leaving your body. Everybody knows that.
No you can't.  You may (or may not) be able to find less than 5 GOOD routes from Madrid to New York, but that depends on your definition of 'good': Direct Flight?  Cheap Flight?  Which airline do you want points with?  Would you rather get up at 3am to get to the airport or sleep in and get home late?  JFK? LaGuardia? Newhark?  How long of a layover is acceptible? &lt; 1 hour? &lt; 1 day?  etc... etc... And now that you've figured that one out, someone else will have a different definition of good. Also, the nodes in the graphs are FLIGHTS, not locations.
I like Ruby and I like Rails, I'd also like it if it ran faster and better, and I think they will get there.  I also like the fact that it revealed to me how bloated and overcomplicated languages like Java and C# have become. I don't think I would like Wasabi, bet your company on one very clever developer I don't like that, lets hope Joel is joking.
great teams win the championships! ΕΛΛΑΔΑΡΑ ΟΛΕ!
Why did VW quit selling the New Beetle?
I agree that something doesn't seem to work. I see old submissions sticking around for two or three days while other interesting new submissions die within minutes. The admittedly subjective impression I receive is that some "institutional" submitters have figured out how to game the system, perhaps by voting for each other's submissions in some way?
No, the professor is correct. Memorization has indeed been skipped at the pessimal time in most educational systems in this country, and as a result, many of my students were helpless when it came to handling information in any respect: recall, synthesis, analysis, you name it, they couldn't deal. The skills you use to find information, which are necessary, are not the ones you use to associate disparate points of knowledge. For that, you need memory. This became such a sticking point with me that I finally started researching memory training a couple of years ago, only to realize that I had gone through eighteen years of schooling without anyone teaching me how to memorize anything, and graded as if someone had. If I ever have kids, I'm homeschooling them.
It's ironic that the Republican's tough talk on defense, including such ridiculous measures as the Patriot Act and warrantless wiretapping (which does nothing more than waste the time of the intelligence agencies), along with their support of the complete failure of a foreign policy, has the exact opposite effect than the one they state as their goal. Namely, the protection of America and it's people.  We can look forward to another heroic effort in foiling a terrorist plot either here or abroad between now and November so that; &gt; terrorism and defense stay front and center.
Whenever I hear that name I want to shout it and strike a martial arts pose...I think I have anime poisoning. BIGTABLE!
&gt;John Beyer of UK TV pressure group MediaWatch said the film was "irresponsible".  &gt;  &gt;He said it could even trigger a real assassination attempt and told the Daily Mirror: "There's a lot of feeling against President Bush and this may well put ideas into people's heads."  So, crazy people capable of assassinating the president just need to see this, and then they'll figure out what to do? That doesn't make any sense at all.
I am not saying Perl, or Ruby for that matter, are bad languages.  I only stated that they are not part of the Big Three.
WHAT are you talking about?  Have you EVER maintained a real Rails app? Ruby code is by far the most maintainable code that I've ever had the (dis)pleasure of maintaining.  Rails is especially maintainable, because of the number of places that I can add functionality in without ever having to alter the original codebase if I don't want/need to.
I mostly agree with this man, particularly his focus on objective standards and responsibility for ones own choices and performance.  However, there are a few places where he's off the reservation. &gt; This Course Covered Too Much Material... There is such a thing as too much material in a course... He says later that a 3 credit course represents 6 hours of work out of class per week.  Fine I agree.  Doesn't that mean that he  should limit the amount of material to fit approximately into that time allotment?  I accept that there will be variation between the amount of material covered in different courses, but surely it should be within a factor of 2. &gt; I Disagreed With the Professor's Stand on ----  &gt;   &gt; The time to deal with this issue is when it comes up in   &gt; class. I have no respect for anyone who complains on the   &gt; course questionnaires. What DOES he expect on course questionnaires?  The entire point is to give feedback without actually being identifiable to the professor.  If he doesn't think that's a good idea then his real problem isn't with the student who does so, but with the University policy that requires such questionnaires. &gt; You can't possibly hope to have creative insights unless   &gt; you have memorized all the relevant information.  Laughable!  Flat-out-wrong.  UNDERSTANDING, not recall, is the key to creativity.  If he has confused the relationship between understanding and creativity to become one with recall instead, it is because understanding's most important component is to REDUCE the amount that must be memorized.  Understand that there are relationships between objects, categorize the relationships and objects into interlocking independent hierarchies, and you can achieve massive compression of data... this is why relational databases work.  Is this kind of understanding based learning taught in Universities?  Of course not; they want you to memorize! The truth is that any field of human knowledge can be divided into 3 portions:   [1] Theory, [2] Raw-Data, and [3] Arbitrary-Facts (such as nomenclature and other trivia). In every field other than Philosophy, Theology, and Mathematics, Theory is usually very simple, and very brief (less than a page) and it's abstract nature makes it difficult to test.  Nobody bothers to memorize raw data as it is usually into the gigabytes or more... genomes, stellar-coordinates, etc.  That just leaves Arbitrary-Facts for the memorization squad to get excited about.  As the name implies, this is material that is largely arbitrary, and thus important only as a convention for efficient communication.  However, because it is easily testable, it gets used as the metric for judging one's entire knowledge of a field.   This brings us to his last fallacy: Too great a faith in exams of any kind.  This is a pardonable error: They are his only diagnostic tool, so it stands to reason he would rely upon them. 
Mission critical should ALWAYS be behind the technology curve and ahead of the great ideas curve.  Having said that, the plethora of options is great because it keeps everybody moving.  Where would Mozilla be if it wasn't for Opera?  Netscape 4.x, that's where. The original Joel article is pretty hilarious when the punch-line is that Wasabi paragraph though :). 
